CHAPTER I.
There unnamed mountains hide their peaks in mist,
And devious wild streams roll.
The Shoshonee
are a numerous and powerful
tribe of Indians, who dwell in a long and narrow vale
of unparalleled wildness and beauty of scenery,
between
the two last western ridges of the Rocky
Mountains
,
on the south side of the Oregon, or as the
inhabitants
of the United States choose to call it, the
Columbia
.
They are a tall, finely formed, and
comparatively
fair haired race, more mild in manners, more
polished and advanced in civilization, and more
conversant
with the arts of municipal life, than the
contiguous
northern tribes. Vague accounts of them by
wandering savages, hunters, and
coureurs du bois
, have
been the sources, most probably, whence have been
formed the western fables, touching the existence of
a nation in this region, descended from the Welsh.
In fact many of the females, unexposed by their
condition
to the sun and inclemencies of the seasons, are
almost as fair, as the whites. The contributions,
which the nation has often levied from their neighbors
the Spaniards, have introduced money and factitious
wants, and a consequent impulse to build after the
fashions, to dress in the clothes, and to live after the
modes of civilized people, among them. From them
they have obtained either by barter or war, cattle,
horses, mules, and the other domestic animals, in
abundance
.
Maize, squashes, melons and beans they
supposed
they had received as direct gifts from the
Wah-condah
,
or Master of Life. The cultivation of these,
and their various exotic exuberant vegetables, they
had acquired from surveying the modes of Spanish
industry and subsistence. Other approximations to
civilization they had unconsciously adopted from
numerous
Spanish captives, residing among them, in a
relation peculiar to the red people, and intermediate
between citizenship and slavery. But the creole
Spanish, from whom they had these incipient
germs of civilized life, were themselves a simple and
pastoral people, a century behind the Anglo
Americans
in modern advancement. The Shoshonee were,
therefore, in a most interesting stage of existence, just
emerging from their own comparative advancements
to a new condition, modelled to the fashion of their
Spanish neighbors.
Their common hunting grounds are on the wide
grass plains, stretching from their native mountains to
the western sea. Elk, antelopes, mountain sheep,
deer and water fowls are their most abundant game
on their own side of the mountains. Along their
smaller streams and mountain torrents they trap the
beaver, otter and muskrat. Ermine, sables, and four
species of foxes, constituted the chief material of
their peltries. They had often descended the Oregon
to pursue seals and the other hairy dwellers in the
depths of the sea. The traces of their footsteps, and
their temporary huts were frequently seen amidst the
dark hemlock forests on the Pacific shore. These
free rangers of the deserts, as they saw the immense
fronts, range behind range, of the ocean surf rolling
onward, to whiten, and burst on the sand at their feet,
had their own wild conceptions of the illimitable
grandeur, and the mysterious and resistless power of
the ever heaving element. They nerved their
Herculean
frames by bathing in the pure waters.
Variety and change are indispensables in the sum
of their wants. To diversify their range and their
monotonous thoughts, they set their faces towards the
rising sun, and marched gaily along the grass plains,
to scale the cold summits and breast the keen air of
the mountains interposing between them and the
hundred
branches of the long Missouri, along whose
valleys
they purposed to course the buffalo. Hence
their wide range of survey, the variegated modes of
their existence, their different objects of pursuit, their
alternate converse with ocean, river, valley and
mountain
,
and the various mental tension necessary to
diversify
their meditations, according to their range and
object, gave them the intellectual superiority, in
comparison with the more stationary Indians, of
travellers
capable of a certain amount of reasoning,
comparison
and abstraction.
Their chief village, or metropolis, will be hereafter
described. The great body of their nation dwelt
near it, so that the mass of the people could be
assembled
,
on an emergency, in half a day. Their free
domain comprised an extent of five hundred leagues.
The country of their compact and actual settlement
is a vale, than which the earth cannot show one more
beautiful or more secluded, the vale of the
Sewasserna
.
This stream, in which the poets would have
placed the crystal caves of the Naiads of the ancient
days, comes winding down in a clear, full, strong, and
yet equable and gentle tide, from the mountains. Up
its pure and ice formed waters ascend, in their season,
countless numbers of the finest salmon; and in its
deep and circling eddies play trout, pike, carp, tench,
and all the varieties of fish of cold mountain rivers.
The Indian, as he glides down the stream, sees the
shining rocks at the bottom, covered with tresses of
green waving moss, at the depth of twenty feet. This
circumstance, along with its transparency,
unquestionably
furnishes the etymology of its name, which
imports
the sea green river. Streaked bass, shiners,
gold fishes, and beautiful and undescribed finny
tribes, dart from their coverts along the white sand,
flit from the shadow of the descending canoe, or turn
their green and gold to the light, as they fan, as it
were, with their purple wings, or repose in the sun
beams that find their way through the branches that
overhang the banks.
A splendid variety of wild ducks, the glossy grey
mallard, the beautiful, blue winged teal, the green
crested widgeon, the little active dippers, the brilliant
white diver, appropriate to those waters, in numbers
and diversities, which the naturalist only could class,
the solitary loon, raising his lugubrious and ill omened
note in unsocial seclusion, the stately swan, sailing in
his pride and milky lustre slowly along the stream,
the tall, sand hill crane, looking at a distance
precisely
like a miniature camel, the white pelican with
his immense pouch in front, innumerable flocks of
various species of geese, in short an unknown variety
of water-fowls with their admirable sailing structures,
their brilliant, variegated and oiled vestments, their
singular languages and cries, were seen gliding among
the trees, pattering their broad bills amidst the grasses
and weeds on the shores; or, roused by the intrusion
of man among them, their wings whistle by in two
disparting
flocks, the one tending up, and the other down
the stream.
It would be useless to think of enumerating the
strange and gay birds, that sing, play, build, chide
and flutter among the branches of the huge sycamores
and peccans. Among the more conspicuous is the
splendid purple cardinal, with its glossy and
changeable
lustre of black crest, the gold colored oriole,
looking down into its long, hanging nest, the flamingo
darting up the stream, like an arrow of flame, the
little peacock of trees, the wakona, or bird of paradise,
the parti-colored jay, screaming its harsh notes, as in
every portion of our continent, the red winged
wood-pecker
,
`tapping the hollow beech tree,' the ortolan
in countless flocks, in plumage of the most exquisite
softness of deep, shining black, the paroquets with
their shrill screams, and their splendor of green and
gold, numberless humming birds, plunging their
needle-shaped bills into the bignonia, bustards, grouse,
turkies, partridges, in a word an infinite variety of
those beautiful and happy tenants of the forest and
the prairie, that are formed to sing through their
transient, but happy day among the branches.
The mountains, on either side of the valley, tower
into a countless variety of peaks, cones, and
inaccessible
rocky elevations, from six to ten thousand feet
high. More than half of them are covered with the
accumulated snows and ices of centuries, which,
glittering
in mid air, show in the sun beams in awful
contrast
with the black and rugged precipices, that arrest
the clouds. From these sources pour down the
thousand
mountain torrents, that fill the Sewasserna with
waters of such coldness, that, even in the high heats
of summer, if you bend from your position under the
shade of the peccan, and dip your hand in the water,
thus collected from numberless and nameless
mountains
,
the invigorating chill is, as if you plunged it in
ice-water. The rocks, cliffs and boulders, partly of
granite and partly of volcanic character, black and
rugged in some places; in others porphyritic, needle,
or spire shaped, shoot up into pinnacles, domes and
towers, and still in other places, lie heaped up in huge
masses, as though shook by earthquakes from the
summits
,
where they had originally defied the storms;
and now show, as the ruins of a world. Yet between
these savage and terrific peaks, unvisited, except by
the screaming eagle, are seen the most secluded
and sweet valleys in the world. Here and there
appear
circular clumps of hemlocks, spruces, mountain
cedars, silver firs, and above all the glorious
Norwegian
pines. They dot the prairie in other places,
showing like a level, cultivated meadow, covered with
a rich and short grass, an infinite variety of plants and
flowers, among which wild sage, ladies' slippers,
columbines
,
and blue violets are the most conspicuous.
The breeze, that is borne down from the mountains,
always sighs through these ever-green thickets,
playing
,
as it were, the deep and incessant voluntary of
nature
to the Divinity. Under the dark brown shade
of these noble trees repose, or browse, elk, antelopes
and mountain sheep. In numerous little lakes and
ponds, where the trout spring up, and dart upon the
fly and grasshopper, the verdure of the shores is
charmingly re-painted, in contrast with the
threatening
and savage sublimity of the mountain, whose
summits
shoot down as deep in the abyss, as they stand
forth high in the air. As you turn your eyes from
the landscape, so faithfully pencilled on these sleeping
waters, to see the substance of these shadows, the
view dazzled with the radiance of the sun beams,
playing on the perpetual snows in the regions of mid
air, reposes with solace and delight on the deep blue
of the sky, that is seen between, undimmed, except by
the occasional passing of the bald eagle, or falcon
hawks, as they cross your horizon, sailing slowly from
the summit of one mountain to another.
In a valley of this sort, spreading ten leagues in
length, from south to north, and sustaining an
average
width of a league, dwelt the Shoshonee, and their
subdued allies, the Shienne. Beside the bisection of
the Sewasserna, it is separated into two regular belts,
or terrace plains. The partition between the two
terraces is a prodigious, brilliant colored lime stone
wall, rising fifty paces east of the Sewasserna, which
meanders through the valley from south to north,
seeking its junction with the Oregon. This singular
wall, from a tradition, that a large party of Black-feet
savages were once driven, after a severe defeat, to
VOL. I. 2
leap it in their escape from their foe, and in which leap
more than fifty of them were dashed in pieces, is
called in Shoshonee Wes-ton-tchalee, or the fatal
leap. It has a general elevation of at least three
hundred feet; and shoots up among the hemlocks and
cedars into turrets, pinnacles, spires, cupolas and
domes, as though here were the remains of some
ancient
and depopulated city, with its temples and
towers
,
defying time, in everlasting stone. Conforming
to a common analogy of such walls, when they form
the bluff of a river in an alluvial valley, it had an
immense curvature within, and the summit projected
in the form of a half arch, nearly a hundred feet
beyond
the perpendicular of the base, forming for a
distance of many miles an alcove of inexpressible
grandeur, shielded from all the inclemencies of the
seasons, except in front, and even that was walled in
with the ever-green branches and the lofty columns
of hemlocks and pines, of a thickness and depth of
verdure, to create a solemn twilight at noon day.
One would think, that the very court and throne of
echo was held in this vast rotunda. The solemn and
swelling whisper of the breeze, as it rose, and sunk
away in the ever-greens, was magnified here to the
anthem stops of an organ. The traveller in the
wilderness
sees a thousand places, where nature has
method in her seeming play. The showing in this
strange spot was, as of a succession of ancient castles
and alcoves, the grandeur and extent of which mocked
all the petty contrivances of human art.
The Shoshonee and Shienne, with a tact and
calculation
very unlike the general heedlessness and
want of forecast of the savages, had selected their
winter
,
and what might be called their permanent
habitations
,
in this noble range of rotundas. Trees, with
straight and branchless shafts of an hundred feet,
marked the divisions between family and family. A
frame of wicker work within corresponded with the
divisions, and extended to the base. The ceiling was
of bark, and wrought with that dexterity and
neatness
,
which that people always put in requisition,
when they intend ornament. Vistas, cut at regular
intervals through the thicket and quite to the banks
of the Sewasserna, at once gave light to the dwellings,
furnished a view and a path to the river and the green
and open plain on the opposite bank, and marked
off the bounds and the compartments of the different
families. Screens of beautifully painted rush work
were sometimes used to exclude the inclemency of
some of the winter days. But, such was the depth
and security of the shelter from the extremes of heat,
or cold, such the extent of the provision in this
work of nature for habitancy, that the temperature
in this generally equable climate must be severe
indeed
,
when artificial exclusion of the cold, or kindling
of fires was necessary for comfort. Such were their
winter dwellings. Their summer houses were on the
upper belt, overhung by the eastern mountains on the
right, and looking down upon the Sewasserna and the
green vale below on the left. Here they pitched
large and cone-shaped tents, neatly formed either of
rushes, or buffalo skins. The terrace above was an
alluvial plain of a soil still richer, and of a mould still
blacker and more tender, than that below. Noble
peccan and persimon trees shaded their tents.
Paw-paw
shrubberies marked off their limits in long
squares; and here, amidst a profusion of wild flowers,
and under the embowering foliage of wild
grape-vines
,
they passed their summers. At present they
dwelt secure from the fear of any foe. But it had
not always been so. The Indians of the remote north,
united with the Blackfeet, and finding friends in their
immediate neighbors, the Shienne, had formerly been
formidable enemies; and in the days of their
fore-fathers
,
rude ladders had been formed by thongs of
hide, and, appended from the hemlock trunks above,
had constituted a rope ladder, by which, when
danger
was apprehended, they fled from their summer
tents to their ropes, and, like opossums evading their
pursuers, they all dropped in a few moments to the
unassailable fastnesses of their winter retreats.
Nature furnished them with inexhaustible supplies
of prairie potatoes and other esculent roots, grapes,
wild fruits, and strawberries. In summer they speared
an ample supply of salmon, with which the
Sewasserna
abounded, pickled their buffalo humps and
tongues, and smoked and jerked their elk and deer's
flesh and hams. Sea fowl, turkies, bustards, and the
smaller kinds of game and fresh venison rarely failed
them at any period of the year. But in the winter,
their provisions all laid in, their tallow, their seal and
sea lion's oil provided for lights, and, in addition, a
huge supply of the splinters of fat pine, they gave
themselves up to visiting, journies of amusement,
trapping the otter, beaver and muskrat, and just so
much hunting, as furnished fresh venison, and offered
diversion. The vast alcove, that arched over them,
defied the storms; and during the long evenings, was
brightly illuminated by the burning pine, and their
lamps, formed of the large, purple sea-shells. Here
the old men smoked, talked over the story of their
young days, and settled in council, when the moon of
flowers should return, whether they had best pursue
seals in the great salt lake, or scale the mountains, and
follow the buffalo over the measureless verdure of the
Missouri prairies. The young men and women sat
apart, and whispered, and laughed and made
appointments
,
and circulated scandal, and managed love much
in the same way, and to the same effect, as white
people
in towns during the same season.
The Shienne, incorporated, intermarried and
amalgamated
with them, still preserved recollections, that
they had once been a powerful people. But they
were subdued, and compelled to live in the immediate
vicinity and constant survey of their conquerors; and
necessity and policy taught them to smother deep in
their bosoms their proud and revengeful feelings, and
to wait for a time auspicious to more decisive
manifestation
.
The chief town, if four hundred
habitations
,
ranging under this arching battlement of stone
might be so called, was nearly in the central point of
the valley. An interval of a mile divided between it,
and the central residences of the Shienne. But, as
happens among the whites, there were clans within
clans; there were large family connexions; there were
associations of like-minded people; there were single
solitary families, that preferred to live alone; there
were families, who could not endure the more
comfortable
dwellings of the villages, and chose to live in
rude bark or log cabins, like the Black-feet. Hence
there were villages on the declivities of the mountains,
and on the margins of the streams, that entered the
Sewasserna from them; and there were hamlets, and
detached and solitary habitations sprinkled over the
whole extent of the valley.
In summer the numerous tents on the upper
terrace
showed at a distance, like communities of bee
hives. In winter, the traveller, who sauntered along
the eastern bank of the Sewasserna, marking the
flights of wild fowls, hovering over the dark-rolling
stream, or the summits of the mountains alternately
showing black peaks, or glittering masses of ice,
observed
,
indeed, this grand and singularly curved wall
on the right. He marked numberless smokes
streaming
above the tops of the pines. He noted the straight
columns of their trunks in front of the nature-built
battlement
.
He saw from this grand and enduring
structure spires and domes of stone surmount the
2*
wall. He traced the straight avenues cut through
the pines and the frequent tracks of human feet. He
saw cattle, asses, mules and horses grazing, or
browsing
on the upper and lower terraces. He heard the
shrill notes of domestic fowls, and the barking and
baying of numberless dogs. But, were it not, that
here and there Indian boys were seen shooting with
the bow, a woman passing to the river for water, or a
warrior listlessly stretching his arms in the sun, he
would not have known, that he was passing by the
proud metropolis of the Shoshonee, which, like Rome,
had its tributary and subdued nations; which, like
every place, where men and women congregate, had
its ambition, intrigue, love, broil, exalted and humble
aspirations, in short the real, equal, though miniature
correspondenceas the Swedenborgians sayof all,
that was in Rome, or is in Pekin or Petersburg, Paris,
London, or Washington.
The Shoshonee
capitol
ought not, however, to be
altogether pretermitted in description. Being the
only permanent building, that was entirely artificial,
they had exhausted their industry, skill, wealth and
ornament upon it. It was at least three hundred
feet in length, its centre resting upon the trunks of
lofty pines; its sides supported by shafts of cedar
trunks, planted deep in the earth. It was roofed
with bark; and elsewhere covered with boards, split
from the pine. Every idea of Indian taste had been
put in requisition, to embellish the Shoshonee
council-house
.
Beautifully painted buffalo robes,
ornamented
with the
totems
of the chiefs and of the tribe,
were suspended as a kind of interior hangings from
the walls. Articles of Spanish furnitureSpanish
flags, crucifixes and other church ornaments, attested
that they had made successful incursions into the
Spanish settlements. Every thing, in fact, that
Indian
ingenuity could invent, or Indian wealth supply,
had been lavished in the fitting up of the interior.
It was all neatly carpeted with rush matting, marked
off in compartments of blue and red, except a large
circle round the council fire in the centre, which was
medicine ground
, and within which none but the
aristocracy
of the tribe might enter.
A more important appendage still to their
establishment
was the common field. It was along the
western bank of the Sewasserna, some miles in length,
and three quarters of a mile in depth. A living
hedge of pawpaw fenced it on three sides, and the
river on the fourth. It was a friable, black, level
alluvion, inexhaustibly fertile, and of a loamy and
tender texture, easy to be tilled. At intervals nature
planted sycamores, and peccans threw out their
verdant
and sheltering arms, to shade the weary
laborers
,
as they tended their maize under the high heats
of summer. Here waved their maize. Here were
their squashes and melons, and such other esculent
plants, as they cultivated; and every Shoshonee had
his limits marked off, and was assessed an amount of
labor, corresponding to his extent of ground. Those,
who were too indolent to labor, shared not in the
harvest. Those, who preferred solitary and
individual
exertion, selected such a spot, as pleased them,
and cultivated, and labored little or much, at their
own choice. The same council-house was common
to the Shoshonee and Shienne; but the latter with
their sympathies of nationality, cultivated a second
common field, in front of their own chief village.
Here would be the place, to describe their
government
,
in form a fierce democracy; but in efficiency a
strong monarchy, or rather despotism, in which all the
emblems of power, all the badges of authority, and all
the words of injunction, and prescriptions of law were
inaudible and invisible. Here might be given the
ceremonies of their worship of the Wah-con-dah, or
Master of life, a ritual simple, mild and unpersecuting,
their marriages, their modes, their traditions, their
manner of intercourse, and the numberless details,
that belonged to their interior and domestic existence.
But this would require an extent and compass of
details foreign to the purpose of this history; and
besides
such development of these subjects, as is
material
to the narrative, will naturally be interwoven with
it in the proper place.
Here, in these quiet and green retreats, secluded
from that world, which calls itself civilized, and by
eminence
the great world, by nameless inaccessible peaks
of a line of mountains, stretching along the western
front of the American continent, had lived
successions
of the Shoshonee for countless generations.
Their traditions reached not to the time, when their
tribe had a commencement. Their minds had not
grasped the idea, that it had not been, as they
believed
,
an eternal chain. Their recent history, in its
public details, showed almost unbroken annals of
successful
incursions and attacks, or of peace, abundance
and prosperity, and their general holiday was the
whole period of the year.
Happy for them, if an impassable gulf, a Chinese
wall, an adamantine barrier could for ever have
protected
them from the ingress and communication of
the white race, their gold and their avarice, their
lawless
love and their withering influence, their counsels
and their new train of thoughts, their excitements,
schemes and passions, their new habits and
necessities
originating from them; their power to inspire in
these simple people disrelish and disgust with their
ancient ways, without imparting better, and, above
all, their accursed besom of destruction, in the form
of ardent spirits. But, in a disastrous era for them,
the white men had found their way into these
mysterious
hiding places of nature. Their ever restless
feet had scaled these high and snow-clad mountains.
Their traps had been already set upon the remotest
mountain torrent of the Sewasserna. This ingress
had been cloaked by as many ostensible pretexts as
there had been immigrants. But every motive had
been a direct appeal to the unsuspecting, instinctive
and ample hospitality of the Shoshonee. Some had
come among them, as suppliants, and really
emaciated
with hunger; and perishing with exposure,
toil and disease, had appealed to their pity and
humanity
.
The unwieldy Spanish fire arms, with
which they had been partially supplied, were
exchanged
for British guns and American yagers,
brought among them by itinerant trapping traders.
Guns and gunpowder and blankets and trinkets and
vermilion and looking glasses were in a little time
almost regular articles of supply from the mouth of
the Oregon. Unhappily, all the visitants concurred
in bringing ardent spirits, to neutralize, and mar all
the questionable advantages of their intercourse.
For some years their most frequent visitants had
been of those strange, fearless, and adamantine men,
the hunters and trappers of the Rocky Mountains,
who followed the steps of the intrepid Lewis and
Clarke from the regions of the rising sun.
Wandering
alone, or in pairs, eight hundred leagues from the
habitations of civilized men, renouncing society,
casting
off fear, and all the common impulses and
affections
of our natureseeing nothing but mountains,
trees, rocks, and game, and finding in their own
ingenuity
,
their knife, gun and traps, all the Divinity, of
which their stern nature and condition taught them
the necessity, either for subsistence or protection,
they became almost as inaccessible to passions and
wants, and as sufficient to themselves, as the trees, or
the rocks with which they were conversant; they
came among the Shoshonee more adroit, and more
capable of endurance, than themselves.
Not long after, boats rowed by white men, were
seen ascending the Oregon and the Sewasserna, from
the Western sea. The dwellers in these secluded
valleys, though separated by immense distances from
the Spaniard on the one hand, and the Muscovite on
the other, and the shores of the widest sea on the
globe at the west, and the eight hundred leagues of
the lower courses of the Missouri on the east, from
other inhabited regions, began to find it necessary, in
order to account for these strange visits of different
people from such remote and opposite quarters, to
resort to their ancient and vague traditions, that `the
little white men of the mountains,' had filled all the
world with pale faces; and had left them, the
Black-feet
,
and the other tribes of red men, with whom they
were acquainted, in these delightful solitudesas in
a vast and happy island, to which the restless pale
faces were laboring to attain from all points of the
compass.
The views of these visitants were as various, as
their characters. Most came to hunt, and trap, and
trade, and barter with the Indians, and gather
peltries
and furs, with the leading inducement to make
money. Some of these sojourners, no doubt, looked
about them with a certain degree of enthusiasm and
excited thought, a certain half chill sensation of the
awful and sublime, as from the green vale and its
devious
stream they surveyed the frowning peaks, rising
in their savage grandeur to the region of eternal
storm and ice. Others saw all this with perceptions,
probably, less keen, than the wild deer, that bounded
among the trees. Some loved the images of
unrestricted
love, of licensed polygamy, of freedom from
the legal ties of marriage, of free and untramelled
roving. But all the adventurers were, more or less,
imbued with an instinctive fondness for the reckless
savage life, alternately indolent and laborious, full and
fasting, occupied in hunting, fighting, feasting,
intriguing
,
and amours, interdicted by no laws, or
difficult
morals, or any restraints, but the invisible ones
of Indian habit and opinion. None know, until they
have experimented, for how many people, who would
be least suspected to be endowed with such
inclinations
,
this life has its own irresistible charms.
People
,
who have long been soldiers, it is well known,
are spoiled for every other profession. They, too,
who have long reclined on the grass in Indian tents,
who have gambled, and danced, and feasted, and
jeoparded life in murderous rencounters and
unforeseen
battles and exterminating wars, and who have
contemplated the varieties of prospect and event in
their interminable expeditions, seldom return with
pleasure to the laborious and municipal life of the
whites.
Among the traders, some had come up the
Sewasserna
with an assortment, such as they could bring
in one, or perhaps two periogues, rowed by hired
Indians
.
Others had packed their commodities, brought
by water to the sources of the Missouri, on horses
over the mountains. A new, and previously
unknown
avenue to their country had been recently
practised, through a singular gap, or chasm in the
Rocky Mountains, and over the wide and beautiful
lake of Bueneventura. By far the most abundant
supply of goods, however, arrived from the mouth of
the Oregon, to which the Indians made frequent trips,
to sell furs, and bring back goods, and trade with the
ships in the river, and supply themselves with ardent
spirits. The frequency and uniformity of this
intercourse
almost equalled the regularity of a mail. The
great amount of furs, peltries, dried salmon, jerked
venison and smoked deer's hams, though sold for very
inadequate values of barter, in a short time
introduced
among the Shoshonee most of the common and
cheap articles of prime necessity in the domestic
wants of such a people.
But though, what is known in these countries by
the common term Indian goods, made a considerable
proportion of the stock in this trade, the greatest
amount, cost and consumption was still in the article
of ardent spirits. They, who brought the greatest
abundance of that, were always most welcome. It
was to no purpose, that an occasional white sojourner,
of higher principles and better thoughts, warned them
of the fatal influence of that seductive poison upon
their race. It was in vain, that their intelligent and
moral chief remonstrated against the introduction
and use of the bewitching mischief. The Indian
trader had not yet been seen among them, who
possessed
sufficient amount of principle, or capability of
moral resistance, to stand out against the entreaties
and menaces of the Indians, and the profits of the
trade. Whatever quantity of this article he brought,
it was soon consumed. But the quantity was
generally
so small, in comparison to the multitudes, among
whom it was to be distributed, that individual
intoxication
,
for a considerable time after the introduction
of ardent spirits, was an uncommon spectacle. Enough
was drunk for the most part, only to thaw out the cold,
stern and saturnine bosoms of this strange people to
unwonted hilarity, ardor, and kindness of feeling.
Hence the coming of a new trader among them, who
brought a quantity of this pernicious beverage, not
unaptly denominated in their language, `the fire
medicine
,'
was an era of general excitement and festivity.
Hence, too, the visits of the whites to their nation
were always associated with these ideas, and were
eagerly welcomed. The visitants, of course, were
always at first in high favor. A temporary wife
from the tribe was either offered by the chiefs, who
regulated the introduction and citizenship of the
whites, or easily obtained, after the selection of
survey
.
If he conducted with any degree of decent
conformity to their immemorial customs and modes of
thinking, the stranger was at once free of the tribe,
and had a range of inclination and choice, as wide
and unmolested, as the Indians themselves. As furs,
peltries and salmon were quite abundant, and easily
transported down the Sewasserna and Oregon, the
traders were seldom long, in selling out their stock of
goods and spirits, at a profit almost to the extent of
their very flexible consciences.
CHAPTER II.
'Tis just, though stern,
That race o'erwhelmed by race, in turn
Should pass away.
And soon, themselves to ruin borne,
The present, like the past, shall mourn;
Like them decay.
M. P. F.
White people
had been seen among the
Shoshonee
,
ever since the Spanish establishments on the gulf
of California. In their excursions to those
settlements
,
they had often brought prisoners, generally of
the lower class of the people. These prisoners for
the most part became attached to the Indian ways of
life, remained voluntarily among them, and soon were
only distinguished from them by their European
countenance
.
Muscovite rovers, traders, and sailors had
more recently appeared in the Oregon; and now and
then one had stolen into the valley. They had also
seen samples of those wonderful people, the
Canadian
coureurs du bois
. But at the time, when this
history
commences, they might still have been considered
VOL. I. 3
a simple, unchanged and unsophisticated people.
This narrative contemplates them at the point of the
first palpable influence of the introduction of money,
and what we call civilization. It cannot fail to
present
a spectacle of great moral interest. With an
apparent accession of new ideas, new comforts, new
wants, and new views of things present and to come,
these simple people are always seen to forego their
simplicity, and become less wise; to change their
skins for dresses of cloth, and to begin to suffer from
the inclemency of the seasons; and to learn the use
of our medicines and modes of applying them, and to
become subject to new and more mortal diseases; in
short, to melt away, through the influence of our
boasted civilization, like the snow wreath of their
hills, when a clear sun rises on their southern
exposure
.
At the point of time in question, the paramount
council chief of the Shoshonee was Ellswatta; in
person tall, venerable, muscular and noble looking,
with a long face, aquiline nose, and the customary
Indian deep black eye. He was full blooded, and
descended from a line of chiefs, distinguished alike
for valor and beneficence. He, too, united, in an
uncommon
degree, courage and enterprize with wisdom
and firmness. He evinced a character of calmness
on common occasions, which might have been
mistaken
for want of sensibility and quick perceptions, had
not the deep furrows in his cheek, and the occasional
expression of his countenance and flashing of his eye
manifested, that it was the result of long struggle
with himself, for entire self command and a strong
and right estimate of the claims of true wisdom and
dignity. Though turned of sixty years, he bet ayed
no abatement of faculties; but bore himself in a
vigorous
,
muscular and green old age, on which worth
and authority had set the right impress and seal of
years. His patriarchal authority was at once
energetic
and mild, and though he had no guards, lictors,
sheriffs, insignia, emblazonings, or visible display of
office and power, his rule was a simple, though
unseen
and purposely concealed despotism. Ellswatta
was one of nature's nobles, and there was nothing
about him of the savage, but his not possessing the
advantage of letters.
During the instinctive and fervid aspirings of his
youthful days, he had been a conqueror. He had
impressed the terror of his arms upon the Spaniard
at the south; and even the frozen precincts of the
immeasurable
distance of the Muscovite at the north
had not shielded him from the successful inroads of
the warriors of the young Shoshonee chief. He had
severely humbled the cruel and terrible Blackfeet on
the castern side of the mountains. From his father
he had inherited the feudal homage of the Shienne.
But he achieved the more important task of
breaking
down their refractory spirit, of removing them
from their remote and scattered villages, and
congregating
the mass and strength of the tribe in a town,
second only to the metropolis in size, removed from
it but a short distance, and established in the same
style, under the curvature of the continued dome of
nature, that skirted the Sewasserna for an extent of
ten leagues. They had formerly been as numerous
as the Shoshonee; and though now subdued, proud
and resisting blood ran in their veins. Their dialect
and customs differed enough from those of their
conquerors
to keep alive a national spirit and
remembrance
of what they had been. Their chief
Tonggat-tsee
,
or the Snow whirlwind, was old and infirm,
but had a son, Nelesho, gigantic and powerful in
form, fierce and ambitious in thought and purpose,
cunning and resolved in intellectual character, and
in symmetry of structure a perfect Apollo Belvidere
of the wilderness. Aspiring, artful, cruel,
passionate
,
he was the secret idol of the Shienne, who looked
to him, as the future instrument of their
emancipation
from Shoshonee thraldom. He governed his
doting
father, the nominal sub-chief, and cherished in
his bosom a burning and deeply fostered hatred
towards
the only son of Ellswatta, kept continually in
action by envy, rivalry, ambition, and all the torturing
and exciting passions of the human heart.
By concentrating the Shienne in his immediate
vicinity, Ellswatta had them continually under his
eye, and could note, and extinguish the first sparks
of insurrection. On issuing his orders, he could see
them carried into immediate execution, or punish
disobedience with instant promptness. The
continued
and unresisting quietness of the Shienne, and
their docility and loyalty to his sway under such
circumstances
,
were abiding proof of the wisdom of this
arrangement.
Ellswatta, as has been said, had been a conqueror
in his youth, and had won even his wife by dint of
arms. Among a people, whose chief and absorbing
pastime is war, and who nurse from their mother's
breast unshrinking hardihood of character and
purpose
,
and an instinctive love of the terror and
excitement
of battle, frequent expeditions are necessary, as
modes of giving utterance and scope to the warlike
musings of the untamed spirits of the young, through
the only natural channel. A long peace had
accumulated
an unnatural and dangerous amount of this elastic
and exciting impulse. He felt a full share of it in his
own bosom. On some alleged aggression of the
Spaniards
upon a hunting party of his people, the prime and
select of his young warriors, along with a proper
conscription
from the Shienne, ranged themselves under
his standard, and prepared to follow him against the
Spanish mission of St. Peter and St. Paul, three
hundred
leagues south of the Oregon. Ellswatta had
sufficient foresight not to march, until he had
ascertained
,
that his force was well appointed, and fore
armed against defeat and disaster, as far as
precaution
and preparation could provide. The war song
was sung; and the young mounted warriors dashed
away over torrent, mountain ravine, valley, forest and
prairie, to the orange groves and vineyards of their
southern borderers. The spirited and nimble
squadron
swept over the wide interval, like a cloud of
locusts, and commenced plundering their unprepared
enemy. All the detached and remote settlements
and plantations were visited in turn with this
desolating
scourge. But Ellswatta was the most
generous
and gallant of Indian invaders, and much of
terror
,
as preceded him, he inflicted no misery or cruelty,
beyond what was indispensable to carry his purposes
into effect. Women and children, the old, feeble, and
rich he permitted to ransom themselves, always
proportioning
the sum to the ability. Of pretty women
he found few, or none; or, perhaps, he would not
have been always so forbearing.
He did not deem his force sufficient to assail the
fortified towns. But he overran the unfortified
places, as a whirlwind; and the expedition was
absolutely
loaded with plunder; nor did they spare in the
least the well stored wine cellars. Plate, dresses,
money, provisions, horses, mules and asses, in short,
whatever they could with any convenience carry
away, made up the amount of their collection.
Before
they could be attacked in one place, they had
levied contributions upon another, and the objects of
the expedition were completed in one week.
Among the few prisoners, that were not ransomed,
and that followed them back to their country, was
Josepha Estevanna, the daughter of an opulent
grazier
,
with a numerous family. She belonged to the
3*
town of St. Joseph, and had come, attended with a
cur and servants, on a visit to an uncle, who lived
on this northern frontier of the mission. She had
been reared by a father, who knew little, beside the
art of taking charge of a vacherie, and valued nothing,
but money. This favorite child possessed the only
pretty face in the family, and had been reared, or
rather spoiled, in misguided and weak fondness. Her
mind and heart, respectable in native endowment,
had been suffered to develope at will, without any
efficient discipline. Suffered thus to grow up, like a
prairie plant, she would have been ruined by opulence
and indulgence, had not touches of native sense and
amiability interposed some redemption of
character
.
As it was, she was a far famed Creole belle,
an object of competition with all the young Spaniards,
who might pretend to it, within sixty leagues. She
sung, played the guitar, danced to a charm, was
passably
able to read a romance, and spell a billet of
assignation
,
so as to have it take effect, though not
exactly
in the orthography of the royal academy of
Madrid. She had a fine Italian countenance, of
infinite
spirit and vivacity, an olive complexion, keen
black eyes, a high forehead, shaded with curling
ringlets of jetty blackness, and a tall and
commanding
figure. Moreover, she was seventeen, and had
been, more than once, on the brink of marriage; and
had failed to obtain the first object of her pursuit, a
husband, not from her own choice, but from the
difficulty
,
which her father made, touching the point of
dower.
Along with the great mass of plunder, amidst the
bleating of flocks and lowing of herds, and the wreck
of whatsoever could enter into a Spanish
establishment
,
and the shrieks and sobs of some twenty or
thirty female captives, the proud beauty was brought
forward. The conqueror dismounted from a noble
horse, and in the narrow compass of Spanish, which
he possessed, uttered a few brief words, at once
respectful
,
complimentary, and conveying assurance of
kind treatment, and the most inviolate decorum of
observance;the more easily promised, as it was
known even to Josepha, to be guaranteed by the
invariable
usages of the Indians. He somewhat sternly
ordered the other prisoners to desist from their
wailings
,
while the fair captive told her story. The
burden
of it was, to request that she might remain at a
stipulated ransom, which her uncle offered security to
pay, as soon as it could be remitted from her father,
then on a journey to San Blas. But Josepha, though
she understood not Shoshonee speech, readily
interpreted
the language of the eye and the countenance;
and she saw in a moment, that she had most
completely
conquered the conqueror. Unaccustomed to
control, or put rein to his inclinations, Ellswatta had
only taken one full survey of his prize, before he had
determined, that she should accompany him to the
banks of the Sewasserna. It was a difficult business
for the gallant young Indian, to make this purpose
categorically known. But he found words, in which
to be understood to that effect; and moreover to add
to the information reasons for his resolve, as likely to
be satisfactory to Josepha, as any that could be
imagined
.
Indulgent on every other point, and ready on
the easiest ransom to dismiss to their homes the old
and the ugly, and even the greater number of the
young men, it was in vain that Josepha folded her
hands, fell gracefully on her knees, and raised her fine
eyes to heaven, imploring God, the Virgin and the
young chief, to have mercy upon her. It was in vain
that all her friends, the cure and the uncle among the
rest, crowded round him, wept, entreated, and
doubbled
the offers of ransom. It was in vain, that
Josepha
,
taking advantage of an appearance of his being
softened and subdued, made the welkin ring with
supplications and cries. The impatience of the young
chief waxed towards sternness and wrath. `I could
easier take my heart from my bosom,' he said, `than
grant this request; and if you cease not these
troublesome
importunities, by the Master of Life I swear,
I will carry you all away to keep her company.
Disperse
to your homes. This bird of paradise must
see the Sewasserna. She shall dwell with my mother.
She shall be regarded as the medicine of the
Wah-condah
.
If, when she shall have remained with us
through the three moons of flowers, she shall choose
to return, I swear she shall be sent back in honor, and
without ransom, to this place.'
Her friends trembled at the determined tones, and
quailed under the flashing eye of the chief, and
scattered
,
like leaves in the wind. His orders were
peremptory
;
and in one hour the plunder was packed on
mules and horses, or loaded in Spanish carts. Whole
flocks and herds, cattle, sheep and swine, were started
away over the plain; and Josepha, alternately
weeping
,
and praying, mounted the same charger, on which
she had come on this ill-omened visit. She was
allowed
a single confidential female servant to attend
her; and in a short time, the procession was moving
away over the prairie. She saw, that she was
treated by the chief and his warriors with a
propriety
and respect, which even surpassed that of her
own people; nor could the visible homage to her
charms fail to mitigate in some degree the painful
thoughts of captivity. No alleviations of the
incidental
fatigue of the way, no comforts, which such a
position might furnish, were wanting. When they
passed a mountain, or a ravine, Ellswatta was at hand
with respectful assiduity, to help her dismount, to
lead her horse, and, when she was fatigued, to order
his warriors to bear her on a litter of vine branches;
or when the smoothness of the country through which
they passed admitted, to give her a place in the best
of the carriages which they had plundered from the
Spaniards.
Josepha thus saw herself still surrounded by
homage
,
still supplied with comforts and indulgencies;
and with less change in her circumstances, than could
have been imagined; except, that she journied
leisurely
in a new and beautiful country, heard a new
language, and constantly saw finer forms and a more
gallant and spirited people, than her own. As her
steed ambled along the flowering prairies, she
had abundant leisure to compare Ellswatta, leading
his warriors in triumph, and in native grandeur and
dignity towards home, with the numerous suitors, who
left her to wear the willow, merely because her father
demurred to bribe them to close the contract by a sum
of money sufficiently large. She sometimes thought
keenly, it is true, of her home and her father. But
it was, on the whole, a journey in itself not
unpleasant
.
She had heard a promise, in which she had
every reason to confide, that she should be allowed to
return, after three months, if she chose; and in view
of all these circumstances she found means and
summoned
motives, that operated to make her sorrow
much less real than seeming. She still availed
herself
of the opportunities, in which Ellswatta came to
aid her, and enquire about her comforts and wants, to
place herself in graceful attitudes, and implore him,
to send her home. But he saw that she found it more
and more difficult, to invoke the accustomed
accompaniment
of tears. In short, his keen discernment
and tact, sharpened by love, opened his eyes to
perceive
clearly, that at every interview, and at every
remove
to the north, her grief was less true and deep,
though it was still sufficiently extravagant in
demonstration
of external show.
The expedition crossed the last mountain, the
immediate
boundary of the Shoshonee valley, in safety,
and the lady Josepha might have told enquiring
friends, in the customary phrase, that she found herself
as well
as could be expected
. The most glorious of all
the Indian solemnities is the triumphal return of a
successful expedition. This had every feature, to
mark it with the highest festivity. It had been
distant
.
Not a warrior had fallen. It had brought back
a prodigious booty. The flocks and herds, that the
warriors drove before them, filled all the plain. The
whole united people of the two tribes received them,
as they came down the mountains, and instantly
undeceived
those of their captives, who had been taught
to consider them a callous, cold and insensible race.
Wives embraced their husbands, parents their
children
,
and maidens their elected warriors. The old
people walked in procession before them. The
drums beat. Fire arms were discharged; and as
soon as they arrived at the council house, the
medicine
dance took place, and due thanks were returned
to the Master of Life. As not a person of the
expedition
had fallen, even the captives were treated with
the utmost kindness. They were all distributed, and
assigned according to immemorial usage, and Josepha,
with every mark of tenderness and respect, was passed
over to the keeping of the aged mother of Ellswatta.
Here every amusement and gratification, which the
means of the valley could furnish, were put in
requisition
by Ellswatta. In the energetic and beautiful
phrase of his native vale, he declared unbounded love
for his fair captive. He strove to enlist her ambition
to swerve her to become the wife of the chief. She
saw him adored by his people. She observed him
intelligent
and generous, of an admirable form and noble
spirit. She discovered, too, that she held her
conqueror
in chains, and could impose such conditions, as
pleased her. She still wept at times, and talked of
her dear country, as Ellswatta showed her the
beautiful
domain of his people. She teased him, vexed
him, pouted, and flung at times, and threatened in
Shoshonee, for she had shown an admirable quickness
in learning the language, to return at the expiration
of the moon of flowers. In short, she tormented the
young Indian in all conceivable ways, and her
combinations
of that sort were quit respectable in number.
But when the first fine day of summer came, and
Ellswatta, true to his word, and trembling through
fear, that there were more female mysteries yet to
learn, came to inform her that he was ready to
accomplish
his promise, and to conduct her back to her
people,if Josepha had balanced in time past
between
returning to her father, perhaps to spend her
days in single blessedness, and the certainty of a
generous
and noble husband, chief of two nations, she
did so no longer. She thought of the tawny, mean
looking, and timid young Creoles who had been her
mercenary suitors, as the chief in the form and
majesty
of an Apollo stood before her. `Bird of
paradise
,'
said he, `thou art as free as yon eagle that is
soaring over the mountain, toward thy country, and
Ellswatta has strength from the Wahcondah to offer
to accompany thee to thy home.'
Josepha replied with all the affected modesty and
holding back, that might seem to suit the occasion,
that she had changed her mind, in regard to
returning
to her own people She told him, `that she felt
as though she ought to punish him for the rudeness
and cruelty of bringing her away from her dear
parents
and country, by returning to them; but as she
could not bring herself to endure the mortification
and wounded feeling, which, she knew, awaited her
among her own race, where she would be pointed at,
and pitied by every one, as having been subject to
the control and caprice of an Indian chief for three
whole months, she should be obliged to live among
the Shoshonee. Not at all, she added, that she
wished him to marry her, because she chose to
remain
,
and thus avoid this bitter but now unavoidable
consequence of his cruelty.'
In short, the chief guaranteed her the free and
unmolested
exercise of her worship, and they were
married
after the most splendid Indian ceremonial.
Josepha
,
on this occasion, received a Shoshonee name,
equivalent to `Moss Rose,' and the rejoicing and
festivities
on this happy event are still recounted by the
elders of the tribe, in proof of the degeneracy and
decreasing refinement of the younger generation, as
evinced in the comparative insignificance of their
festivals
.
Josepha became a good and affectionate wife,
identifying her interests, henceforward, with those of
her husband, in many points conforming to the ways
of her adopted people; and reciprocally fostering in
the bosom of her husband no small tendency towards
the Spanish habits and ways of thinking. Nor was
Josepha ever heard to complain, that this marriage
had not rendered her happy.
The other Spanish captives were adopted into
different
families, and in no great length of time had
intermarried
with the Shoshonee or Shienne, and were
so effectually incorporated with them, as to bear no
other trace of distinction, save their European
countenances
.
The first white family, that established itself among
them, in such a way, as to sustain its distinct identity,
was that of William Weldon. It was a family,
which would have been considered so rare and unique
in any place, that it will be necessary to go back to
its origin, as far as its peculiar circumstances may
serve to explain its peculiarities. Never example
afforded a more ample confirmation of the thought in
the beautiful verses of Gray, touching the gems, that
blaze unseen in the dark caverns of the ocean, and the
roses, that waste their fragance on the desert air.
The head of this family was originally a New
England
mariner, of a highly respectable family,
accustomed
to the most careful domestic discipline, and
receiving
the advantages of the best education, which that
country could furnish. The family had once been
opulent, and had experienced reverses. The son early
manifested buddings of the highest order of talent;
and the parents looked forward with the usual
fondness
of parental affection to this son, as the means of
retrieving their fortunes, and redeeming their
circumstances
.
He was sent to a university, and intended
for the law. But William was cursed, in a very
uncommon
measure of endowment, with genius, and the
blighting influence of what seems to have been an evil
star. He grew up a musing, poetry-loving, sensitive,
capricious, irritable and jealous being, holding little
converse, except with inanimate nature, and the ideal
world within himself. When he should have been
thinking about his lessons, gaining the good will of his
instructers, and attending to his present and future
interests, his imagination, perhaps, was rioting with the
fool's thoughts at the ends of the earth. He knew
every thing, but what was useful for him to know.
Neither his reasonings, his actions, or calculations
were like those of any body about him. He laughed
without seeming reason, and was sad without visible
cause; and generally preserved uncommon taciturnity,
and a countenance clouded with thought and dark
musings, frequently mistaken for ill temper. He was
constantly advancing paradoxical opinions, which he
defended with so many arguments and so much
acuteness
,
that he confounded, if he confuted not his
adversaries
.
Among those of his opinions, that had really
operated deep conviction, was the wild and
pernicious
VOL. I. 4
sophism of Rosseau, that the savage is happier,
than the social state. The sequel will explain what
an influence this deep and absorbing conviction
operated
upon his subsequent life.
William graduated from the university, with the
estimation by the faculty of an odd, original and rather
refractory subject. Still they admitted, that he had
genius; and he was a most persevering and
indefatigable
student. His parents began to distrust his
success
in life, for he only now and then acquired a warm
friend at the expense of a host of enemies; though
every one of them was obliged to admit, that he was
irreproachable. The sanguine hope of his parents
received the final extinguisher, when they discovered
in him an unconquerable propensity to the sea. They
reasoned, remonstrated, and struggled. But he felt
the leading of his star, and went to sea. Master of
the higher mathematics and of navigation, in the first
voyage he became an admirable practical sailor. The
parents, with the common versatility of the power
of creating illusions, welded their broken chain of
hopes anew; and now promised themselves, that they
should soon see him an India captain, and thereafter
a first rate merchant. He commenced his second
voyage, as second mate of a China ship. But, with
more acquaintance with navigation, and with an
unimpeached
reputation, as a man, and a sailor, no one
spoke of his advancement. He seemed to be fixed
at the scale of second mate. Again and again he
sailed on the same voyage, with the same result. The
stripling and the novice were exalted over his head.
William had keen feelings and a bottomless fund of
tortured pride. He cursed civilization in his heart,
and charged his want of success to the evil influence
of social life. Disappointed hopes, humbled pride,
and a consciousness of ill requited merit, continually
corroded his nerves. His parents unreasonably
complained
,
and he fled, a self resolved exile, from his
country. He still went to sea second mate, and
bowed to young men, every way his inferiors, in proud
humility, and in stern and uncomplaining taciturnity
of professional subordination. The sailors avoided
and almost dreaded him, they knew not why. His
intellectual powers, his mathematical knowledge, his
nautical learning and his seamanship, along with his
silent and thoughtful manner, caused strange and
almost superstitious views of him to be entertained
on ship board, and he was generally designated by
the name, Sulky Will.
A deep and inexhaustible fund of friendship and
good feelings was thus locked up in his heart, for
want of a congenial friend, and the right kind of
society
and circumstances to draw it forth. But
indignant
,
that every one misapprehended, and showed
dispositions to shun him, he finally grew
misanthropic
,
wrote verses and threw them in the sea; and
determined
,
the next time he should sail to the
north-west
coast, to join the Indians in the interior.
It happened on his last outward bound voyage, that
a young gentleman went out passenger, with a
handsome
capital, to establish himself in business at
Canton
.
He was an unconnected, studious and
amiable
man, of feeble health. He was ill of a hectic
complaint, and in the ennui of a long voyage,
circumstances
brought him intimately acquainted with
William. They soon found in each other the
elective
attraction, delight and advantage of congenial
minds. How delightful is the sensation, on making
such a discovery any where! How much more so,
when made on ship board, while the frail vessel is
ploughing its solitary path along the trackless wastes
of Ocean! And most of all so, when one of the
parties was imperceptibly sinking under the
influence
of that insidious and terrible disorder which,
while it precludes all hope of overcoming it,
heightens
the sensibilities, and gives new tension to the ties
of the heart. All, that had understood William
Weldon, loved him; and this young gentleman
became
deeply attached to him. The ship was
becalmed
in the tropical latitudes. The invalid began
to sink rapidly; and it soon became evident, that he
would not survive, to reach his destination. William
Weldon spent every moment, that was not devoted
to his proper duties, with him. He watched over him
with tender and unabating care, read to him,
conversed
with him, and said much to cheer, and
sustain
him, and solace his last hours. In a long and
affectionate conversation with him, two days before
his death, the young man told him, that he had no
near connexions; and that in consideration of his
friendship for him, and his gratitude for his kind
assiduities
,
he intended to make him his sole heir. This
he declared verbally, before the captain and crew.
After his death a will was found to the same effect;
and William Weldon became possessed of ten
thousand
dollars. He henceforward passed by the name
of `rich Sulky Will,' without seeming to have
propitiated
the good will of the officers, or brightened in
the slightest degree his prospects of advancement.
While he was discharging his duty of second mate,
for this office was still the cap of his climax of
promotion
,
and while his ship was lying in the river, half
a league below Canton, there arose a sudden and
violent squall, attended with thunder, lightning and
hail. Many Chinese vessels in sight were capsized
by the suddenness of the gale; and among others a
large custom house junk, used by its officer, as a place
of habitation. Three or four persons were seen to
escape from this vessel, as it lay close by the ship.
They swam with perfect ease towards a British ship,
at no great distance. Not so a single young woman,
who was observed to struggle with the waves for a
moment, and then to sink with a shriek, but a few
yards from the ship, towards which she seemed to be
making. This was plainly apparent amidst all the
commotion and uproar; and excited a general cry of
sympathy. The fierceness of the storm, the beating
of the hail, the screaming of the winds in the ropes,
and the waves lashed to a fury, rendered it a fearful
chance for any one, to commit himself at that moment
to the raging element. The thoughts of William
Weldon, it may be, were a thousand leagues away,
when the storm commenced. The sight of this
drowning
woman and the general cry of sympathy
concentered
his seattered thoughts. As she arose, holding
to an oar with one hand, and reaching the other for
help to the ship's crew, William plunged overboard.
The uproar of the elements and the commotion of the
water were terrible. At the same time all the
idolatrous
fondness of sailors for manifestation of
generous
feeling, reckless intrepidity, and disregard for self
was kindled, and directed towards the adventurer, as
by an electric spark. William Weldon became
popular
and a favorite in a moment. `God bless you,
Sulky Will,' they cried, `Who would have thought,
it had been in you'! He had nearly reached the
woman
,
when she sunk a second time. He was seen to
descend, at the point where she sunk. The lightning
glared. The rain fell in sheets, and for half a minute,
it was thought, that both were forever whelmed in
the abyss. But a moment afterwards, he was seen
rising with the drowning woman. Coops and casks
were thrown over towards them. A general shout
arose. `Hurra, my noble lad! Hold to her. The
gale is falling. We will have you a rope in a
moment
.'
Meanwhile another intrepid tar had sprung
overboard, and reached him, when nearly exhausted,
with a rope. William caught it, and they were
dragged
4*
on board, the woman in a state of entire
insensibility
,
and her preserver apparently exhausted.
The squall passed away. By proper exertions the
woman was recovered, and was found to be a Chinese
lady of a most interesting appearance, and the
daughter
of a Mandarin of considerable rank, and holding
an office in the customs of no mean importance. Her
father, accompanied by many friends, came on board,
for her; and William received many grateful thanks,
and offers of reward, which he, of course, declined.
But William had won the acclamations of officers and
crew by an act, of a character always to go directly
to a sailor's heart. `You shall be promoted, my brave
lad,' they said, and a clear vista was now opened to
promotion.
But their voyage was destined to be continued to
the Oregon, before their return. It happened, while
they lay in the river, that one of the hands died.
The captain immediately advertised for another hand,
by distributing cards among the American and
English
ships in the river. The evening before the ship
was to sail on her voyage to the north west coast, a
young Chinaman of a singularly interesting and
pleasant
countenance, and speaking the usual amount and
dialect of English, appeared on deck, and offered
himself
to the captain for the advertised sailor. The
captain looked at him with the common kind of
scrutiny
in such cases, and objected to the slenderness
and delicacy of his form, as not promising sufficient
muscle, power and endurance for a sailor's duty.
The countenance of the interesting young Chinaman
sank, and became overclouded with distress; and his
extreme anxiety and earnestness to be engaged
was palpably manifest. The captam proposed some
trials of his skill and adroitness, through which he
passed with competent facility. His gentleness and
docility, the earnest sweetness of his countenance, and
a certain urbanity of manners, gained on the good
will of the captain. But he said, `my good lad, your
face looks very little like having been weather
beaten
,
or your hands like handling ropes.' His
whimsical
way of speaking English, and the pleasant tones
of his voice had won him the warm heart of the
sailors
.
William Weldon, too, in this case, seemed to
have aroused from his wonted apathy and indifference
to what was passing. He asked, as a favor to him,
that the young Chinaman might be employed; and
remarking, that the captain knew, that he had in him
the power to perform the duty of three men, he
pledged
himself, that he would supply the deficiency of the
Chinaman's duty, when it resulted from his inability
to perform it himself. In short, Yensi, for so the
Chinaman
was called, was shipped, and, apparently
delighted
to have obtained his point, left the matter of
his wages entirely to the will of the captain.
The foreigner proved to be more slender and
delicate
,
than had been apprehended; and the little white
hands, taper fingers, and fairy feet of the Chinaman
were a matter of most amusing speculation to the
sailors. But his manners were modest and elegant;
his temper mild and affectionate; and he was untiring
in his efforts to learn, and accomplish his duty. His
musical tones of voice, and monosyllabic dialect
delighted
the crew from their novelty. There was a
charm in his whole deportment, which won him
general
favor; and there were others of the crew as
ready
,
as William, in cases of severe, or extra duty, to
perform those services, for which his want of strength,
or skill, disqualified him. But Yensi, though civil
and obliging to all, was observed from the first day
to attach himself almost exclusively to the society of
Sulky Will. This was an inexplicable mystery to
the crew; for William was naturally as silent and
reserved, as Yensi was affable and colloquial. But
so it was, that, while they evidently sought to avoid
manifestations of particular liking for each other in
the observation of the ship's company, they chose
contiguous births, cooked and messed together; and
while, publicly, they strove to seem no more
particular
to each other, than to the rest, they always seized
the first decent opportunity for retirement, to be
apart by themselves; and it was remarked, that, silent
as William was with the rest, with Yensi he was as
colloquial and voluble, as a Frenchman.
While the ship sped before as gentle and steady
gales as ever blew, and while the bland atmosphere
of the tropics and mid ocean encircled them, when
the rest of the crew drank their grog, pledged their
sweethearts, sang their songs, and told their stories,
under the radiance of the moon tempered by the
fleecy clouds, William and Yensi, on the extreme
stern, or bow, courted seclusion, and never tired of
each other's society; and this companionship seemed
to have ripened into a mysterious friendship. The
sailors soon learned to find amusement in teasing
Yensi, by ridiculing his friend. He had learned the
exact import of the name `Sulky Will;' and nothing
so soon overcame his customary placidity, as to hear
them apply the term `Sulky' to his friend. On the
other hand, William had shown no pugnacious
dispositions
,
until some of the crew began to talk scoffingly
about Yensi's little feet, slender hands, and beardless
face. William begged them to desist from such
conversation
,
in a manner that obtained his purpose at
once. A slight gale arose, and Yensi was severely
sea-sick. He would accept no nursing, but that of
William. In short, sick or well, on duty or at leisure,
William and Yensi were inseparable companions.
This unheard of kind of Platonic sentimentality
between
a Yankee sailor and a Chinaman, naturally
became a subject of conversation and curiosity.
Three days before the ship reached the mouth of the
Oregon, it was remarked, that William had never
shown so much wrath, as at an insinuation, apparently
thrown out at hazard, that Yensi was a woman
concealed
in a sailor's habit.
William's extreme agitation strengthened, and
fixed the suspicion; and the rumor was soon afloat,
that Yensi was in fact a woman. Such a fine subject
for ship gossip could not be long in reaching the ears
of the captain, who gaily proposed to William, to
clear himself from suspicion by submitting the
premises
to the test of search. But the wit, if wit it
was intended to be, was met by him with such a look,
as gave the captain no disposition to repeat the
proposition
.
If a more formal investigation had been
contemplated by the captain, it was prevented by
squalls and stormy weather, which betokened their
approach to the north west coast. The captain and
crew were too much occupied by a sense of danger
and the bustle of duty, to pursue the rumor further,
either in jest or earnest. But the parties had been
made most painfully aware, that the report was
afloat, and on the return of pleasant weather would,
probably, lead to unpleasant consequences.
The moment the ship anchored in the Oregon, and
put out her plank on the bluff shore, fearful of some
officious interference, and sensible that the secret
could not be longer concealed, William Weldon took
the first opportunity to inform the captain, in private,
that the sailors had divined rightly, and that Yensi
was in fact a Chinese girl. He informed him further,
that there was an indissoluble attachment between
them; that both were alike disgusted with social and
civilized life, and had resolved to join the Indians in
the interior. He, therefore, demanded the discharge
of both. The captain at first demurred,
remonstrating
that such desertion would leave him without
sufficient hands to work the ship. A remedy was
found for that difficulty in the fact, that there were
many discharged sailors in the settlement at the
mouth of the river, who wished to hire. They would,
of course, make common cause with William, whose
resolute, persevering, and fearless character was well
known. The captain saw his predicament, and
deemed it best to comply, without attempting
compulsion
.
So William Weldon and Yensi were paid
and discharged. A colony of adventurers had
already
formed a kind of rude town on the banks,
whose inhabitants pursued sea lions, otters and seals
on the shore, and drove a very considerable trade
with the Indians up the Oregon and its branches.
William and Yensi immediately moved their effects
on board another ship in the river. That ship had
on board a well known factor, bound in a few days to
Canton. With him William deposited his money,
on interest, to be paid him on personal demand, or to
be remitted at his order to the chief inhabitant of the
settlement for his use. His own wages and earnings
were expended in guns, powder, lead, traps, clothing
of various kinds, and, in general, in an ample supply
of such articles, as his foresight taught him would be
necessary in the new position, in which he expected
to place himself. Yensi, among other things, had
brought trunks and boxes of Chinese silks, and all
her own articles of dress, comprising an extensive
wardrobe, adjusted to the wealth and standing of
her father. She had not forgotten, at the same time,
Chinese books, paintings and a considerable weight
of ingots of silver. From the first, William had
always
carried with him a respectable select
assortment
of the best of books. It was matter of sufficient
astonishment, and furnished abundant ground for
gossip and conjecture, and a thousand extravagant
versions of the affair, to remark two people in the
prime of youth, with comparative wealth, and such
abundant means, making arrangements to bury
themselves
among the savages in the interior.
As soon, as they were on board the other ship,
Yensi changed her sailor dress for an appropriate one
of her own country; and appeared in her proper
character, a lovely young woman, habited as the
daughter of a Chinese Mandarin. She was, in fact,
the very Chinese girl, whom William had saved from
drowning in the storm. A young woman, who has a
heart, whether she appear with the complection and
dress, and speak the language of Boston or Canton,
whether she wear India rubber shoes, or have her
feet crimped in those of China, has the same grateful
nature over the globe. William's vessel and the
Chinese
junk had been moored within half a cable's
length of each other for weeks. The Chinese lady
was often on deck; and William, who had made a
covenant with his eyes, in regard to ladies of his own
country, was struck with the air and figure of this
foreign
girl. Certain bows, and looks, that speak the
universal language, had been exchanged between
them, before his intrepid exploit. That settled the
relationship of affection between them. As soon as
she recovered consciousness on the American ship, she
and her deliverer interchanged vows with their eyes.
She loved William, as one loves, to whom that
sentiment
is every thing. They contrived an interview.
They arranged together the plan for elopement, the
success of which has been related.
Her father, as an inspector of the port, and a
collector
of the customs, resided in a large junk on the
river; and the daughter officiated, as his house, or
boat keeper. He was avaricious, and proud, and had
shown towards his amiable child total destitution of
the common sympathies of parental affection. Love
was an entirely new perception to this inexperienced
girl, which, deeply as it burned in her bosom, she
would sooner have died, than have disclosed to her
father. Her first efforts at reasoning, and framing
syllogisms, were spent in excusing her rashness and
departure from all Chinese customs, to her own
conscience
.
But the first step was taken, and love made
the remaining ones easy. William assured her, that at
the first leisure hour, which they should have together,
he could satisfy all her remaining scruples. She had
been taught to believe in the inevitable decrees of
fate, and she was convinced, that she felt the leading
and the consent of the `Universal Tien' in the new
and tumultuous sensations, which agitated her bosom.
She gathered up all, that she conceived, belonged to
her of right, and effected her elopement as has been
related.
In presence of William's banker, a distinguished
merchant, whom he had formerly known, and the
chief settler of the colony, who acted as a kind of self
appointed magistrate, they were privately married,
the one appealing to angels and God, and the other
to the `Universal Tien,' that they made their vows in
full sincerity of heart; and that they would forsake
each other only in death. William's first effort upon
the mind of his bride was, to prove to her the
superiority
and advantages of savage over social life; and
to persuade her, to approve his plan of renouncing
society, and joining himself to the Indians. In the
freshness and vigor of a first love, for such was his
new born affection for Yensi, he offered to abide her
decision, either for or against his project. But the
heart of Yensi overflowed with love and confidence.
She dreamed not, that she should ever wish to see, or
converse with any other, than William. She assured
him, that the place of his choice was hers; and had
she known the language, she would have said with
the generous and confiding Ruth, `where thou goest,
I will go. Thy people shall be my people, and thy
God my God, and where thou diest, there also will I
die.'
In a few days their arrangements and purchases
were made; and they were of an extent utterly unlike
any thing of the kind, that had ever ascended the
river before. Cutlery and materials for a house,
cloths, books, a telescope, a microscope, implements
and materials for drawing and painting, together with
the requisite provisions, were loaded into three or four
large periogues, rowed by hired Shoshonee and
Shienne
,
and accompanied by a young half breed, who
understood English and Shoshonee. The young
bride-groom
and bride took their last look of civilized men,
and started away up the river. The season and
weather were temperate and propitious; and the wild
and beautiful nature, that continually opened in
incessant
variety upon them, as they moved up the
broad and noble stream, and looked abroad upon the
flowery plains, or the magnificent hills, or the
elevated
bluffs, or the millions of sea fowls, or the herds of
wild animals, prospects so utterly unlike any thing,
that Yensi had seen, were sources of new and
continual
delight. She was charmed, too, with the simple
manners and the kindness of their Indian conductors.
William's heart exulted, as they advanced deeper
into the beautiful solitudes, and interposed wider
distances
between them and social life. They felt, as if
they were all the world to each other; and their first
acquaintance with the wilderness was calculated to
confirm their expectations.
To be brief, they reached the vale of the
Sewasserna
,
without material adventure; and were most
hospitably received by the Shoshonee. William
understood
Spanish; and this brought him in direct
communication
with the wife of the chief, and various
other persons of the tribe. A most lovely spot,
intermediate
VOL. I. 5
between the Shoshonee and Shienne, was
assigned them, where to fix their dwelling place.
William had brought trinkets and Indian goods, but
no ardent spirits. This circumstance raised him in
the estimation of Ellswatta, the determined enemy of
the introduction of that article among them. Money
and articles of barter already had their value with
this people; and William, with the aid of Ellswatta,
and the hire of as many Indians, as he chose to
employ
,
prepared a commodious dwelling,
accommodated
to the admirable outline, which nature had
already
formed to his hands. The saw and the plane, the
plum and the square yielded their aidfor William
knew their use, and the Indians readily acquired it.
A circular clump of noble pines caught the moaning
breeze in its summits, in front of the dwellingabove
them towered the wall three hundred feet in height.
A considerable stream, tumbling from the mountains,
meandered through the terrace plain above, and fell
in a sheet from the bluff, a little to the right of their
dwelling, and joined the Sewasserna. Fenced by this
stream, and the bluff on three sides, a substantial fence
from the bluff to the river enclosed it on the fourth.
Beyond the clump of pines, a fertile and level portion
of the prairie was formed into a garden and a field.
In like manner three sides of his dwelling were
prepared in the majestic arch of lime stone, under
which he built. Nor did he intermit his labors, and
the services of his hired Indians, until he had a
habitation
,
neat, comfortable and commodious. The
luxury
of windows of glass, of doors, and plaistered walls,
were here seen by the Indians for the first time.
Comfortable
furniture had been brought from the Oregon.
The floors were beautifully covered with rich
Chinese
matting; and the walls hung with Chinese
pictures
,
so that Yensi could refresh her memory with
views of the scenery of her native country. Nature
thus united with art, to render the abode, and its
accompaniments
of scenery, pleasant, convenient, and
in some degree even impressive and sublime. Flocks
and herds and horses and mules and domestic fowls
were purchased, and added to the establishment.
The half-breed and a young Spanish widow of a
deceased
Indian were their domestics. In an apartment,
looking upon the falling sheet of water, the
Sewasserna
,
the opposite plain and mountains, and at a point,
where the breezy influences in the tops of the pines,
the dash of the near water fall, and the deep roar of
mountain torrents and the song of the wild birds,
united
to form the simple olian hymn of nature, was
his library.
Such were the circumstances, under which
William
and Yensi fixed their abode in the Shoshonee
Valley. Mild in their tempers, happy in themselves,
satisfied with every thing about them, and the
munificent
bounty of nature, they quickly learned the
speech of the two tribes, and became general
favorites
.
Yensi and Josepha, from many points of
resemblance
,
that they had in common, were sworn and
inseparable friends; while Ellswatta took no
important
projects in hand without the counsel of William.
They thus had honor, influence, aid and friendship,
without responsibility, or a visible show of place and
office, to create envy.
As William had frequent intercourse with the
mouth of the Oregon by letters, from his agent there,
brought up by the parties of Indians, continually
descending
the river to trade, he ordered such articles,
and especially books, from time to time, as his wants
required, and the means of his agent could furnish.
He became a successful farmer; and in that
exuberant
soil raised an abundance of whatever the
climate
brings to maturity. Yensi had charge of the
garden; and Chinese and New-England ideas were
curiously blended in its pawpaw shrubberies, and in
its grape, multiflora rose, bignonia, and honey suckle
bowers; and in all the splendid plants or flowers, that
were yielded by the various temperatures and soils
of mountain and hill side, deep glen, prairie and river
bank. Portions of the sheet of water, which always
poured from the terrace above, disparted in numerous
rills, and wound through the lawn in front of their
dwelling, tending either to ornament or convenience,
as they were directed to different points of the
garden
.
Here, in ease and alternate labor, in study,
meditation, or active pursuits with the Indians,
William
tasted the rural life in all its joy, and seldom
failed
,
at the close of the day, to felicitate himself and his
wife in the wisdom of his choice, and the
unanswerable
truth of his position, that the savage was happier,
and every way better, than the social life.
Sometimes, as the humor came over him, he
hunted
,
and trapped with the Indians. Sometimes,
catching
their habits and ways, he scaled the seemingly
inaccessible
mountains, to the cruel disquietude of
Yensi. At other times, he followed a trapping party
to some remote and roaring torrent, and under the
light of the moon, illumining the wild scenery,
surveyed
the wonderful amphibious cities, where the
beavers build, and rear their young. With the whole
nation he kept the jubilee of the return of salmon
and the freedom and abundance and loveliness of this
illimitable range of valleys and mountains, with their
increasing mutual affection, and the unbroken
friendship
of the Indians, rendered this beautiful desert all
that his fancy had imaged of happiness on the earth.
Yensi was happyfor although she saw not the
Indian life with the eyes of her husband, he
continued
to manifest unabated love; and this was all, that
was requisite to render her heart content. He had
none, with whom to compare her; and she needed not
have feared even that trial. For he was one of those,
whose deep affections had been long nurtured in
solitude
,
by having no object, upon which to fix. Her
image was first reflected in the fountains of his heart;
and no other could ever have replaced it. In her he
saw with the poet, `whatever good or fair high fancy
forms, or lavish hearts can wish.'
They early began to converse with each other,
touching the great object of worship, and the all
absorbing
interests, hopes and fears of the eternal future.
William worshipped after the custom of his fathers,
and hallowed the Sabbath. Yensi at first burned
fragrant
woods to the `Universal Tien,' as her ancestors
had done. But, the more the scriptures were
expounded
to her, the more she inclined to the holier
religion and worship of the Christians.
To those, who dwell in the mansions of cities,
amidst the feverish excitements and the artificial
splendor and wants of those abodes, it may seem no
more than the language of romance, to say, that
William
and Yensi were happy in this vale, as man can
hope to be here below. They would have asked for
nothing more, than thousands of years of this same
half dreaming, and yet satisfying existence. A
daughter
was born to thema desert flower of exquisite
beauty, even from its birth. New and unmoved
fountains
of mysterious and slumbering affections were
awakened in the deepest sanctuary of their hearts.
In the clear waters of the brook, which chafed over
pebbles, between banks turfed with wild sage and
numberless desert flowers, and under the
overhanging
pines, in the tops of which the southern breeze
played the grand cathedral service of the mountain
solitudes, William performed, as father, priest and
Christian, the touching ceremony of baptising his
babe. Adding the name Jessy to that of the mother,
it was called Jessy Yensi. This sacred rite was
performed
5*
on the Sabbath, as the sun was sinking in
cloud-curtained majesty behind the western
mountains
.
The domestics, Ellswatta, and Josepha, looked
on with awe. William read the scriptures, prayed
and sang, baptised his babe, and handed the nursling
of the desert to Yensi. As she received the beloved
infant in her arms, after it had been consecrated, as
an inmate in the family of the Redeemer, while tears
of tenderness and piety filled her eyes, and fell on
her cheeks, she declared, that she would no longer
invoke the `Universal Tien,' that the God of
William
and her babe should be her God; and that they
would both call on the same name, when they prayed
together for their dear babe, even unto death.
As the infant Jessy grew to be a child, not only
did she become an idol to the fond parents, but her
exquisite beauty, her speaking countenance, her
perfect
symmetry of feature and form, her richly
intelligent
eye, the silken and clustering curls of auburn,
that hung over the alabaster shoulders of the
charming
little girl, gained for her the appellation among
the Indians, whose common parlance was poetry, of
`Wakona,' or the bird of paradise. There have been
philosophers, who have prosed gravely, and have said,
that children are all endowed alike, and that
education
makes the difference. There are those too,
who believe these absurd assertions; but there is
more difference between the endowments of
individuals
of our race, than there is between some of the
lower grade of rationals and the higher orders of
brutes. All the ideal forms of beauty, that had ever
been painted on the teeming imagination of her
father
,
during his life of silent meditation, were embodied
in the little Jessy. From her mother she inherited
an oriental imagination, sensitiveness and ardor. She
was, intellectually and in person, just what her fond
father had wished his first born might be.
As soon as her instruction commenced, the parents
laid down the plan for her discipline in perfect
accordance
.
Each was to teach her, what each could
impart
.
Yensi had been instructed in all, that females
were allowed to learn in China. When her father's
lessons were completed, the child went to the study
of the Chinese lore of her mother. She was
particularly
qualified to teach her precision of outline and
beauty of coloring, in drawing and painting, to which
she showed an uncommon aptitude from her earliest
years. William now rejoiced for the first time in
the fruit of the severe studies of his early years. It
would the better qualify him to train the mind of his
daughter. The beautiful child drank instruction, as
the flowers of the valley absorbed the dew.
Generous
instructers have felt the high pleasure of
training
minds, that expand with eager elasticity to meet
instruction, minds that anticipate the thoughts of the
teacher, and upon which new truths fall as the
electric
spark upon the receiver. To conceive of this
pleasure in this case, we must call to mind, that the
instructer was a man of the highest order of genius,
whose affections and thoughts had been concentrated
by study and silence and reflection from his earliest
years; that it was the father teaching the child, the
child of her, whom alone he had loved among women,
a child the very seal and impress of his own character,
and whose loveliness and intelligence extorted the
admiration
of even Indians, so little prone to admiration;
that the parents, though they lived in primeval
simplicity
,
had the means of affluence, had no absorbing
pursuit or pleasure in the world, but the rearing this
daughter, and that they were placed amidst scenery,
as romantic and sublime, as any which the earth could
furnish. In this way, we may arrive at some vague
views of the zeal of the instructer, and the progress
of the pupil. Cherished by Josepha and the Spanish
mothers in the tribe, and accustomed to a Spanish
domestic in the family, she learned Spanish,
Shoshonee
and English at the same time. At eight she had
mastered all the simple books of her father's
collection
,
and drew flowers, to vie in truth and freshness
with those of nature. But among all her books, the
fervor, simplicity, grandeur, truth and nature of the
bible most delighted her; and while her imagination
was imbued with its sublime poetry, her heart was
early affected with its precepts and its spirit.
In the more important hunting and trapping
expeditions
of the two tribes, it was their immemorial
custom to emigrate in a body, leaving only a few
behind
,
to protect their habitations. William Weldon
soon caught the Indian propensity to long and distant
excursions. His family had every facility for
journeying
,
which wealth, the favor of Ellswatta, and
droves of horses and mules, like him of Uz, could
furnish
.
The nation journied by easy stages; and the
little Jessy and her mother were thus accustomed to
the most varied aspects of nature, as she shows
herself
in that country of valleys, torrents and mountains.
In this perpetual change of place and scene, the
young Jessy spent a portion of every summer, at that
period, when the heart and character are developing
together. The first objects, that impressed her
opening
mind, were soft grass plains, foaming mountain
torrents, snow-clad peaks soaring above the clouds,
the lovely and the awful of nature always grouped in
the same view. When she tented for the night, she
heard her father's hymn, the solemn words of the
bible
,
the voice of prayer, the songs of the savages, the
howling of wolves, and the distant dash of streams
among the mountains. The bright fire blazed. The
evening comforts were arranged. Milton or Byron
or Shakspeare were read. The itinerary of the child,
and her comments were recited. Or her sketches of
the grandeur and beauty of the country, through
which they had passed, examined. When they
paused
,
as they sometimes did for days in some valley,
scooped out among the mountains, or beside a stream
rolling through a prairie, boundless to the sight, she
culled flowers, and painted them, sat by the cataracts
listening to their roar, or admiring the snowy
whiteness
of their spray, or imitated the sweet notes of the
birds, as she traced them to their embowered haunts
at the sources of springs, or listened to the tales of
the Indian girls told in simple words, and painting
affection
in the figurative diction of the desert.
Though her parents had no other child, she was by
no means alone. The little Wakona, as the Indians
always called her, was regarded by them with an
almost
superstitious affection. Her beauty, her
amiability
,
her rare, and premature intelligence threw
over her, in their view, associations of something not
exactly, and altogether of the earth; and every child,
male or female, was ambitious of the honor of
ministering
to her wants, or contributing to her pleasures.
But the usages of the tribes, and the estimation of
the people allowed but two children among them
unrestrained
intercourse with her, as equals. The first
was Areskoui. Of all the children, whom Josepha
had borne to the chief, this child alone survived.
From infancy he had put forth the buddings of
endowment
almost as singular, as that of Jessy. Though
retaining a touch of the copper visage and the distinct
black lank locks of his father, his countenance was
noble and Italian; his forehead high, his eye, like that
of the eagle, capable of drinking in the sunbeams;
his form tall, agile, graceful, though rather inclined to
slender; with the clean limbs and lofty port of his
father
;
like him rather inclining to silence, sternness
and passionate perseverance in his opinions and
purposes
.
From his mother he was ardent, impetuous,
and addicted to the gratification of his propensities.
Never was child regarded by parents with more
idolatrous
fondness. The tribe beheld in him the
miniature
of all, that they could imagine of great and
noble
.
Such was the young and interesting son of the
chief. Scarcely two years older than Jessy, they had
played together from infancy; and had learned, in the
affectionate speech of the Shoshonee, to call each
other by appellations equivalent to brother and sister.
This intimacy of the children naturally grew out
of the intimacy of the parents. As has been seen, a
strict friendship subsisted between them. The early
predilection of William Weldon for savage life
fostered
feelings, that tended to keep up this
affectionate
intercourse. When at home, no day passed,
in which Ellswatta did not look in upon William
Weldon
,
and spend part of it with him. In encampments
abroad, a tent was always assigned him near that of
the chief. Josepha and Yensi, too, from various
circumstances
,
were equally intimate; for they had a
thousand thoughts and ways in common, which, they
could never expect, would be shared with any of the
women of the Shoshonee. Hence, while their
busbands
hunted, trapped, planned, and made excursions
together, the mothers met, and brought their children
to play together in the shade among the flowers, while
they talked over the incidents and gossip of the tribe,
as they drank their coffee together, for that luxury
had already found its way into their families; as they
discussed the secrets of state, which they had
gleaned
from their husbands, and each extolling the child
of the other to the skies, in order to have the pleasure
of hearing their own praised back again in terms
equally extravagant.
The two children were thus reared, as though they
had been twins. Josepha, though anxious, that her
son should be taught in the learning of the whites,
was poorly able to impart him that instruction herself.
William Weldon most cheerfully undertook to give
him lessons along with his daughter. By dint of great
exertion Areskoui learned to read, and write. But,
although apparently possessing the finest order of
intellect
,
learning from the beginning was his strange
work. The first distinct indication of his strong
character
was love for his foster-sister. The second was
hatred to Nelesho, son of the sub-chief of the Shienne,
who frequently came, also, to play with Jessy, and
who was of the same age with himself. The third
was a gloomy and desponding feeling, compounded
perhaps of envy and shame, to see his foster-sister,
younger than himself, comprehend lessons with
perfect
ease, of which, he said, his poor head could make
nothing.
Nelesho was a full blooded Indian boy, Herculean
in mould, proud, fierce, of a courage wholly devoid
of fear, subtle, passionate and vindictive. The
Shienne
looked forward to him, as their deliverer from
the thraldom of the Shoshonee; and the boy himself,
catching their feelings in secret, regarded himself as
one, who might entertain equal aspirations with
Areskoui
.
The Indians have been described, as
incapable
of love, and having no eye or taste to admire
beauty
.
Nothing is more foreign from their real
character
,
than both these estimates. No where does
beauty
give higher claims. No people are more
passionately
subservient to it. Nelesho loved Jessy, as early
as Areskoui, and as early gave him to understand,
that he should always be in the way to compete with
him for her favor. Before she had yet seen ten years,
she had turned pale at seeing the young chiefs fight to
the point of shedding each other's blood; and been
made conscious the while, that the question of her
favor
was the exciting cause of the quarrel.
Very early had the feelings of Jessy inclined her to
take part with Areskoui. A thousand times had
Josepha
half intimated the wish to Yensi, that her
beautiful
daughter might become the wife of her son, a
wish which Yensi never appeared to understand.
The boy himself thus naturally imbibed the
impression
,
that this fair child was destined for him; and
radically was this infant propensity nursed in his
bosom
,
and incorporated with every fibre of his frame.
Her persuasion was seen to exercise an unbounded
influence
over him. She alone could persuade him to
desist from fighting Nelesho. She alone could induce
him to resume the lessons, which he had abandoned
in discouragement; though he would say as he
resumed
them, `Wakona, the young eagle loves most to
soar above the mountains, and look at the sun.' He
never could be persuaded to love these perplexing
medicines, and blear his bright eye by poring upon
books. But for her sake he made unremitting efforts
to acquaint himself with them; though no pursuit
clothed his brow in such unalterable gloom. When
she smiled upon him, and told him, it was necessary,
his restless spirit became composed; and he settled
down to his task. When she wept, he clenched his
fists, knit his brows, and was angry with every thing
around him. This feeling grew with his growth, and
strengthened with his strength. There was much of
native nobleness in his character; and it could not but
be, that the intimate relations, subsisting between the
parents, and these earnest and daily manifestations of
the most generous affection for her, should create in
her young bosom feelings of sisterly regard in return.
CHAPTER III.
When all around was dark and drear,
He turned to that sequestered vale;
And there he found, at least in thought,
The very refuge, that he sought.
Nature's broad path he sought to scan,
In wilds, untrodden yet by man;
Where virgin plants their leaves unfold;
Where unknown warblers tune their song;
And unnamed rivers roll along;
From nameless mountains, to behold
Plain after plain beneath them rolled;
Where, since the birth of infant time,
In silent boundlessness sublime,
Nature hath reared her awful throne,
And reigned majestic and alone.
M. P. F.
The
second white family, established in the vale
of the Shoshonee, was that of Trader Hatch. This
man was a descendant of one of the ancient Dutch
`residenter' families, in New-York, in person
square-shouldered
,
short-necked, thick-headed, and every
way Dutch built. He had a round red face,
apparently
fashioned in contour to the model of a full
rising moon; with bushy yellow whiskers, red hair,
little deep set grey eyes, that twinkled with a certain
degree of shrewdness and good nature, and keen and
close fisted love of money getting. Indeed his coat
of arms bore the Dutch family motto, which reads in
English `money is the main chance.' In morals he
was a voluptuary, of a coarseness of appetite, which
heeded not so much the quality, as the amount of
gratification
.
He was generally clad in a roundabout
jacket and pantaloons of that substantial fabric, called
Fearnought, and everything to match; and the
expression
of his countenance usually wore a half grin of
joyousness
,
chiefly compounded of insensibility. He was
seldom seen drunk; but constantly kept himself up
VOL. I. 6
to the point of high comfort; and for passing the time,
eating and smoking occupied twelve hours of the day;
and he slept or dozed through the rest.
Such was the man, who arrived in the Oregon
from New-York, with a capital of ten thousand
dollars
invested in Indian goods, of which the half was
in the substantial articles of whiskey and rum.
Never
had so many barrels of that article been rolled out
upon the soil of the North West coast. It happened,
that a party of Shoshonee and Shienne were there;
and they raised at the sight a whoop of joy, that made
strong work for echo among the forests. These
Indians
were engaged to carry the liquid joy up the
stream to their country; and all the periogues were
accordingly put in requisition. Trader Hatch,
placed
in the bow of the rear periogue of the squadron,
smoked most profoundly, during the passage, made
many enquiries touching the value of furs and peltries
which the country could furnish, and the amount of
goods it would probably consume. He was
particular
,
too, in hunting up information in relation to the
probable chances of competition from any other
quarter
.
When he saw fine prairies, he regretted, that
so much grass should be produced to no purpose; and
that the gypsum, lime stone and coal could find no
market, when he was called to admire the noble bluffs.
The terrific mountains, he exclaimed with an oath,
were finefor they kept back traders, and furnished
beaver streams. The Sewasserna was not without
charms in his eye, for it yielded immense supplies of
salmon. The awful piles of Rock fort at the gap
were matter of eulogy, for they would make, he said,
an admirable trader's fort, where a few men could
defy the besieging of a whole tribe. Such were the
reflections, with which Trader Hatch made the
interesting
voyage from the mouth of the Oregon to
the vale of the Shoshonee.
The arrival of this great supply of goods, and
ardent
spirits, made an era in the annals of the tribe.
Gladly would Ellswatta have committed all the liquid
poison to the flames. But he knew, that in his
government
popular sentiment was every thing, and that
he might as soon have thought to arrest one of his
native
mountain torrents, as resist the introduction of
the ardent spirits among them. Yielding, therefore,
quietly to what he could not safely resist, he made
the necessary arrangements for the joyful reception
of Trader Hatch, which, he foresaw, the impulse of
the united tribes would exact. The chief English
interpreter, William Weldon's half-breed domestic,
was put in requisition, and in no great length of time,
the mass of the two tribes was on the banks of the
Sewasserna
,
to welcome the arrival of a fixed trader
among them, who would furnish regular and
inexhaustible
supplies of spirits. After consulting with
the trader, the interpreter informed the crowd, that
the `pale face' trader, as by a considerable stretch of
figure he called Hatch, had come to domiciliate
himself
among them, and claimed adoption into the tribe.
They were instructed, that he had brought a great
supply of guns, traps, powder, lead, beads, looking
glasses, vermilion, blue and scarlet strouding,
blankets
,
and in short, a general assortment of Indian
goods and arms, together with a full cargo of the
element
of joy; and that they were not, henceforth, to
have a desultory and irregular supply; but a constant
and uninterrupted replenishing, as the present stock
was exhausted; and that all these things would be
sold by the trader, out of his particular fondness for
the Indians, cheaper, than they had ever obtained
such things before; that is to say, for about six times
their fair value. To all this Ellswatta added, in a
few words, that the pale face was a great and a rich
man, possessing a large amount of the white medicine
pieces of trade; that he earnestly hoped, his red
children
would be cautious in the use of the medicine
drink, which, if used in excess, they could not but
know, was poison, fire and ruin; and that they would
now adopt him, as a son of the noble Shoshonee,
according
to the ancient ceremonial, and with all the
due demonstrations of joy.
Accordingly the adoption took place, after the most
brilliant and approved ancient rites. The details are
not material. In general, it may be said, that the
medicine men strove to look severely terriblethat
the old men laboriously beat their drums; and that
the young men, painted in their gayest, and danced
the kettle and dog dance, in unusually grand style.
When to this it is added, that three barrels of rum
were distributed in energetic drams among all the
males, and most of the women, that no one refused to
partake, but William Weldon's and Ellswatta's
family
,
it need not be remarked, that a happier festival
had never dawned upon the vale. Most of the
Indians
,
by the secret measures of Ellswatta, were kept
short of the limits of gross intoxication. But
nine-tenths
of them were glorious, and happy;and saw
the mountains reel, and had visions of paradise and a
double sun. A greater amount of whooping, songs
and dancing certainly was never before achieved
there in one day; and never had Trader Hatch been
caressed with such energetic marks of affection.
To settle all the circumstances of citizenship at
once, and to identify him as soon as possible with the
tribe, as the sun began to decline, Ellswatta
announced
,
that the trader wished immediately to take
him a wife from the Shoshonee, submitting it entirely
to the council-chiefs, to select such a one as they in
their wisdom might deem proper for him. A few
match-making squaws, of matronly and approved
prudence
in such transactions, were consulted on the
spot by the council-chiefs. After a low discussion of
ten minutes, this important choice was made with
that prompt celerity which distinguishes most Indian
decisions. A fine young squaw of sixteen, daughter
of a sub-chief, was consulted, and after whispering a
moment with some of her confidential damsels, and
surveying the exhilarated trader with a scrutiny
evidently
favorable to him, she declared herself `nothing
loath.' She was therefore presented, as the wife who
had been selected for him by the proper authorities.
The happy young animal would have blushed above
her burnished copper complexion, had not her
perfectly
circular cheeks been rouged too highly with
vermillion. The club of black, straight hair,
skewered
on the centre of her crown, was of the thickness
of a man's wrist. For costume, her chief article was
a scarlet cloth petticoat, hooped out after the fashion
of the whites, at the commencement of the last
century
.
At present, she was only a little glorious. But
it was deemed an omen and a promise of future
courtesy to his bride, that Trader Hatch, when she
was led up to him, after taking a copious dram
himself
,
offered the cup to her. Report had it, that her
eyes soon afterwards first sparkled, and then became
maudlin; and that after cutting a few capers of
extraordinary
flourish, she laid herself quietly down
upon the green grass, requiring strong efforts to
awaken
her, when the hour for retiring with the
bride-groom
was announced.
The annals of the Shoshonee recorded this day, as
having witnessed the most powerful dances, and the
loudest acclamations, that had yet been seen, or heard
in the valley. As the night came over the scene of
enjoyment, the stars blinked; the moon reeled, as she
rode down the firmament; the dances became more
and more confused and mazy; and even the favorite
kettle song and dance gradually died away. Trader
6*
Hatch, however, in the Kentucky phrase, was wide
awake and duly sober, to the end of the carouse. He
was thus enabled, with due courtesy, to support his
young bride to the stranger's cabin, or tent, assigned
to him on the upper terrace.
In less than a year, Trader Hatch was quietly
domiciliated
in a second house, after the American fashion,
under the bluff alcove, and thriving apace in the line
of acquiring beaver, peltries, money and wide
influence
among the Shoshonee. The annals of the
nation
record, at this period, the arrival of two other
white people, who were destined to occupy a
conspicuous
place among the characters and incidents of
this history. They were Elder Wood, a Baptist
minister from Kentucky, and Baptiste Dettier, from
Canada. St. Pierre has said, that the most opposite
natures and incongruous habits are the most likely to
consort, and form attachments. No partnership
could have been selected more strongly in point, to
verify the maxim of the French philosopher, than the
companionship, which existed between these two men.
No two beings could be imagined more unlike each
other, both in nature and education. They were
never known to agree in any point, except that of
hunting, marching, and tending their traps. They
differed in nation, religion, temperament, form,
person
,
likes and dislikes. Yet all this notwithstanding,
if, in the bitterness of some of their altercations, they
separated for a day or two, they were soon seen
lovingly hunting, and trapping together again.
Dettier was a spruce, slim, erect Canadian
Frenchman
,
so perpendicular, that his inclination, if he had
any, was backwards. He was habited in Indian
dressed deer skin, in the form of a close jacket, with
a collar and facings of red hunting shirt fringe; and
notwithstanding the material and form smacked
strongly of Indian costume, his whole dress struck the
eye with an air of smartness, exactly in keeping with
his national and personal character. His nice cap of
sable fur was always garnished in front, during the
summer, with a bouquet of roses; and in winter with
a knot of pink ribbands. A nervous and jerky bow,
but still graceful and winning, was at the service of
every one who passed or spoke to him; and he was
always
gay and on the alert, either for good or
mischief
.
From innate propensity a
coureur du bois
, he
had wandered from Montreal to the lakes, and from
the lakes to the Missouri, where his star brought him
in contact with Elder Wood.
Elder Wood was a Baptist clergyman, a native of
Kentucky, and when he joined the Shoshonee with
Baptiste, turned of forty years. He was a tall,
muscular
,
square man of the largest dimensions, a little
stooping, with bushy hair, slightly sprinkled with snow,
and curling canonically on his shoulders. His deep,
keen, black eye, his high, bold forehead, and that
tout
ensemble
of countenance, which the eye comprehends
in a moment, indicated no small amount of what is
commonly called genius, compounded with a dogged
pertinacity of adherence to his opinions, that told you
at once to save all the breath of argument, touching all
opinions, in which you differed from him. He had been
a firm and well principled, as he was a talented preacher
in his own country. With strong passions, he possessed
a rude and undisciplined, but energetic and
impressive
native eloquence. Devotion to the peculiar tenets
of his profession was conscientiously incorporated with
his convictions. But, though a Baptist by profession,
and a stern Calvinist in doctrine, he was at once too
much enlarged in intellect, and too free from bigotry
and hypocrisy, to go all lengths in bitterness and
denunciation
.
Along with his other qualities of mind
and heart, he had no small admixture of earthly vanity
and ambition; and a desire for fame and distinction,
not the less powerful in its action, for being
unsuspected
by himself. But with these endowments, which,
he could not but feel, placed him above most of his
brethren, and notwithstanding reputation and fame, as
a preacher, followed him, wherever he preached, the
wished consummation of an adequate settlement
followed
not. He often troubled the waters of
popularity
,
and was the instrument of starting various
revivals
,
while another availed himself of the movement,
and stepped into the place. Nothing is more certain,
than that there are doomed outcasts from the smiles
of fortune, and he was one of them. For the first two
or three disappointments in this way, he affected with
his religious friends an air of meek and resigned
submission
;
and said, in the customary phrase, that it
was the will of God, and that he had received better
than he deserved. Another and another moving of
the water, and stepping in before him occurred. His
temper gradually acquired a certain smack of
disappointment
and acidity. He still continued to anoint
his sore feelings with the proper unction, that it was a
righteous discipline, to try him. But, like many
others
,
who salve over their wounded feelings with these
seeming saintlike saws, and appliances, he felt keenly,
and as another man, that even among the pious, piety
has much less to do, than human intrigue, in arranging
and settling these matters. He was intrinsically too
virtuous and noble minded to give himself up to the
baseness of malignant misanthropy. Because he had
been wronged, and supplanted, he did not declare war
against human nature; or allow either his faith or his
principles to relax. On the contrary, there remained
to him a heroism equally compounded of principle,
unwavering pertinacity of character, and stubbornness
of disappointed ambition, which on the proper
emergency
would no doubt have sustained him to the point
of martyrdom.
Thinking that this ill fortune might be peculiar to
his position in Kentucky, he accepted a mission from
a missionary society to Missouri. Here he labored,
`in season and out of season;' and fame followed him,
as before. `A great preacher this,' they said; but
no society made any movement to settle him. He
was engaged to an amiable woman, whom he
sincerely
loved, and who waited only to see him settled in
the ministry, to marry him. This circumstance added
not a little to his impatience to be settled. Two or
three times, the boon mocked him, by seeming just
within his grasp. But he found, in Napoleon's phrase,
that his destiny followed him. Still it was his lot, in
his phrase, to shake the bush, and see others catch the
game. Preach as powerful sermons as he would,
play the popular and amiable as he might, whatever
fame as a talented and pious man, followed him, some
meeker brother came after him, gained the favor of
the ladies, and reaped the fruit of his labors.
Money for the supply of even his individual wants
ran low. He underwent a long acclimation of fever
and ague in a remote frontier cabin, with sordid and
ignorant inmates; and he would have died unwept,
and unsolaced upon his straw, had he not possessed a
Herculean constitution. Meantime, his beloved, tired
of waiting for him, had married another minister, and
proved a thrifty house-wife, and began to rear a family.
He could easily number a dozen contemporary
ministers
,
in advantages and talents, natural and acquired,
infinitely his inferiors, with warm and snug houses,
with loving wives, who reared children and made
cheeses in peace and privacy, while their husbands
saw revivals in their societies; and he, meanwhile
tossed, an isolated, unconnected being, without local
habitation, or official dignity, on the sea of popular
discussion, to be weighed in the scales by old ladies
and wiseacres, without other than the barren meed
of being called a great preacher.
Such were his sad ruminations, as he arose from
the terrible discipline of the ague every other day,
for a hundred days in succession. His poney had
died, during his illness. His physician's and his host's
bills would swallow up his last dollar, his books, every
article of his clothes, which he did not wear, and his
manuscripts into the bargain. Alas! he rated them at
a thousand dollars; and he had said of them, as he
turned them over, `here is fame. No heart can
resist
this. Is not this great Babylon, which I have
built?' He gave up even his manuscripts, the result
of his treasured learning, deep thoughts and
perennial
fame. The rustic auctioneer made the most
ludicrous
faces imaginable, as in backwoods phrase, he
extolled the inestimable worth of a barrel of
manuscripts
,
skeleton sermons of Elder Wood. The
whole lot, however, went off under the hammer, to a
sleek young divine, for nine dollars and fifty cents.
It was too much for even Elder Wood's humility.
He admitted in his own phrase, that this was `a mighty
heavy judgment, almost too severe to be borne.'
He had a missionary journey before him to the
savages
,
far up the river Platte. When he should have
performed this duty, he would have a claim for two
hundred dollars, which he was to receive in an order
upon the Indian agent at that place. Still feeble,
and only partially recovered from his late illness, his
mind overcast at once with physical dejection and the
gloom of his circumstances, his last black suit getting
threadbare, his shoes `old and clouted,' the Kentucky
minister set forth on his tour of two hundred leagues
up the uninhabited prairies of the Platte, on foot and
alone.
On a gloomy March morning, he left the last
American
cabin; and emerged from the deep Missouri
bottom forest upon a prairie, where the eye traced
no limits before him, but the western horizon. To a
genuine Kentuckian a deep forest brings pleasant
associations
.
The heart of the feeble and solitary
minister
sunk within him, as his eye vainly strove to
descry
some traces of woods in the distance. He sighed,
wiped the cold sweat from his brow, and said to
himself
,
`God is every where. I shall see trees again.'
As he said this to himself, Baptiste Dettier emerged
from another point of the forest, mounted on the same
conveyance with Elder Wood. But the heart and
the heels of the Frenchman were alike light. He
moved on, humming a boat song, as straight as an
arrow, and as brisk as a hare. `Bon jour, Monsieur
etranger,' cried Baptiste. The sight of a man on
the verge of such a prairie operated as a cordial upon
the heart of Elder Wood, and with more than his
wonted vivacity, he responded in the customary
American
French, boo joo! No contrasts could have been
selected seemingly more whimsically unlike each
other, than the straight, buoyant Frenchman, and the
gloomy, broad shouldered, and stooping minister, in
whose dress, port and countenance `hands off' struck
the quick eye of the Frenchman at a glance. They
entered into conversation, and learned that they were
both bound to the same place. As they walked on,
each cheered with having found a companion in the
other, and continued to communicate thoughts, they
began to unfold to each other strong points of
community
of feeling. In a hidden nook of his brain,
Elder Wood had a hunter's and trapper's
protuberance
strongly developed. It had been fostered by
the circumstances of his birth and residence. From
infancy his ear had drunk in the tales, exploits and
fortunes of frontier's men, and men who had hunted
and sojourned among the Indians. Tedious and
interminable
stories of boating, trapping, hunting and
Indian incidents displayed the ruling propensity of
Baptiste. A kindred string was harped in each mind;
and a feeling of mutual liking was the consequence.
The morning had been cloudy and the western
horizon
obscured by fogs. The effulgence of the sun at
length burst from the clouds on the wide plain. In
the farthest verge of the western horizon, pencilled
along from north to south, the dark blue ridges of the
Rocky mountains showed in the grand relief of
mirage
.
`Voila mon pays,' cried Baptiste, pointing in
exultation to the west. All the Kentucky hunter
mustered in the heart of Elder Wood. His
imagination
soared beyond the hills, and he inly exclaimed,
`O that I had the wings of a dove, that I might fly
away' to them. There must be glorious hunting
there, beyond doubt, exclaimed Elder Wood, as his
eye kindled. `Superbe,' responded Baptiste, and
began
to chatter about his plans and intentions for the
future. The customary French English, which he
spoke, was a dialect familiar to the ear of Elder
Wood, and he learned that Baptiste had started alone
to hunt, and that among the Rocky mountains, and
was making his way there through the country of the
Pawnee Loups, where the mission of Elder Wood
terminated, and where he had a countryman, whom
he hoped to persuade to join him. One must travel
on these wide deserts, where the traveller may pass
fifty leagues without finding water, and over a plain
inhabited only by wild beasts and savages, to feel the
full value of companionship. The garrulity of the
Frenchman matched the taciturnity of the minister,
like groove and screw. Their hunter protuberances
brought them into closer affinity. The French
trapper
commenced upon his inexhaustible narrative, in
his wonted loquacious buoyancy. His adventures by
wood, flood, lake and prairie, sunk down concentered
into the wandering development of the Kentuckian,
and ever and anon the minister looked wistfully
towards
the blue mountains, looming in the horizon,
towards which the Frenchman was bound. Baptiste
was not slow to discover, what string he had touched.
Without a thought or a desire to obtain the
partnership
of the Kentuckian, and prompted only by native
vivacity and disposition to talk, he had imprinted
upon the minister's imagination a vivid picture of the
mingled profit, boundless range and adventurous
pleasure
of a trapper's life. `I am weary of the past,' said
Elder Wood in his heart with a sighand he added
audibly, `I have the heart of a hunter and trapper
also. Prove two things to me, that I can earn money
by this way of life, and that I can serve God in it,
and I will join you.' Baptiste almost recoiled from
the thought of such an associate. But vanity,
politeness
and loquacity urged him on; and the crafty
Frenchman proved by a host of arguments, that it
was a short and sure route to wealth; that in a few
years, they might both become so rich, as to return
to the old settlements with the ability to live, as they
would. As to the other matter, Baptiste shrewdly
remarked, `that he was now on the way, as it
appeared
,
to preach to the savages. What would
hinder
preaching to the numerous tribes, dwelling on
the borders of the mountains?' Elder Wood stated
the preliminary difficulty, of not knowing their
language
.
The other demonstrated, that it would only
be necessary to reside among the Indians a few weeks,
to be able to preach to them in their own speech.
`If you wish,' he continued, `to preach to Indians, why
go to these miserable people half way between the
Indians and whites? Why not become an apostle
among people, who have never heard any thing about
the Christian religion? There will be so much the
more honor in being the first apostle among such a
people.' He added, that he had every where seen
Messieurs Sauvages
fond of becoming
des bons
catoliques
to a passion.
VOL. I. 7
Baptiste here unconsciously hit another nail on the
head. The word
Apostle
conjured images of the
highest
glory and fame in the brain of Elder Wood, that
operated almost like the exhilarating gas. An
Apostle
!
the very word entered his imagination in a halo
of glory. His eye kindled, and he said with
unwonted
vivacity, `my friend, you have almost
persuaded
me to ask you, to receive me as a partner. My
father before me was a hunter. I incline to think,
that I inherit something of his skill, courage and
endurance
.
Indeed, it would be a glorious thought,
that of converting the savages of the Rocky
Mountains
.
Verily, it occurs to me now, that I have read,
that the Indians are easily converted to the catholic
worship. If they can be brought over to a false,
fabulous and idolatrous religion, how much easier
must it be, to persuade whole tribes to the perfect
truth of our church?'
Baptiste, with all his reckless levity of character,
and ignorance of religion in the abstract, was as rigid
a devotee to the catholic ceremonial, as the other
was to the baptist faith. The unfeeling bigotry of
Elder Wood scandalized him, and he shrugged twice,
as he meditated a purpose of replying in the same
strain. French civility prevailed. He passed by
the offensive reference to his worship, and, without
clearly feeling his own motive, ran over anew the
pleasures and advantages of the expedition. In one
of those moods and hours, which determine the color
of the future, Elder Wood said, `that if he so consented,
he would throw in his two hundred dollars to the
common stock, and join him to the Rocky mountains,
for better or for worse.' Baptiste smiled internally
at the idea of such a strange associate, so easily
attached
to his fortunes; but no Frenchman would have
had the rudeness to refuse a partnership, so offered.
He shrugged, bowed, said, `you do me
trop d'honneur
,'
and consented. He added `Monsieur Kentuck
always
good for hunt. In a leet time, me learn you to
trap, too, comme un diable! But, sare,' he continued,
`please take notice, dat I hab noting to do with your
dem religion.' The minister as little liked this
profane
allusion to his profession, as the other had his
notion of the catholic faith; but he said internally,
`I shall be able to bring him, also, out of heathenish
darkness;' and thus their contrarieties neutralized,
and balanced each other.
The partnership was formed. The Frenchman
remained among the Pawnee Loups, until the services
of Elder Wood were completed, and he had received
his order. The Pawnee Frenchman declined leaving
that tribe; and the two partners set forth alone, with
such equipments, as were necessary, towards the
Rocky mountains. In a more extended and intimate
acquaintance, the two strange partners found, that
they were made for each other, and the union, which
commenced by accident, and in caprice and vanity,
was cemented alike by the points, in which they
agreed, and in which they differed. They pushed
on, with stout hearts, beguiling the long way with
stories and disputes. And not unfrequently, while the
Frenchman chattered on for hours in mere babble of
words, the minister was musing about hunting,
exploring
,
gaining wealth by trapping, converting whole
tribes of Indians, and returning in ease, affluence and
honor to his own people and kindred, with the title of
Apostle of the tribes of the Rocky mountains. Last,
though not least, he saw himself in the future invited
to religious gatherings, to relate in presence of those,
who had supplanted him, and the truant spouse of
his reverend friend, what he had seen, suffered and
achieved. Still beyond all that, he raised himself a
monument more durable than brass, in working the
whole into a book, that should go down, and with it
carry down his name to the generations to come.
The Omniscient only knoweth all the movements of
the human heart; and He, doubtless, saw, that the
views of the minister were as unmixed and pure, as
usually appertain to those, who lay much higher
claims to disinterested sanctity.
They made their way from mountain to valley, and
from valley to mountain, hunting and trapping, and
enduring, and encountering much; but growing every
day more firmly attached to their wandering and
dangerous mode of life, until they reached the vale
of the Shoshonee; and, struck with its beauty, and
facility for their pursuits, they requested, and
obtained
domestication among that primitive people.
They received not the boisterous welcome of Trader
Hatch, for they brought no spirits with them. But
Baptiste was directly a favorite with the women, and
the common and more trifling class of the people,
from the civility and inexhaustible gaiety of his
nature
,
and his talent at playing among the females the
part of general gallant.
Elder Wood could not be said to be popular. He
became a considerable hunter and trapper; and in a
most memorable and fierce encounter with a grizzly
bear, recommended himself to the tribes as a man of
undoubted courage. He wore in his general
deportment
a silent and solemn reserve, a trait always
held in high homage among the Indians. The deep
seriousness of his physiognomy spoke a language, alike
understood by them and Christians. With their keen
tact and instinctive perception of character, they soon
discovered, that he was genuine and real, and exactly
what he professed to be. Thus, if he gained not that
poor estimation, designated by the term popular, he
had the deeper hold of their feelings, which consists
in unqualified respect. As soon as he had acquired
enough of their language to understand, and be
understood
,
he obtained leave of Ellswatta and the council
chiefs to commence missionary labors among them.
They listened to him with that apparent seriousness
and earnestness of attention, which missionaries
among the Indians generally witness. This happens,
partly from the indulgent liberality, with which they
listen to new religious opinions; partly from strong
native decorum; partly from curiosity, and, more than
all, from an indifference to every thing, that is not
tangible, visible and in immediate prospect. They saw,
with unequivocal respect, the singleness of his views
and the sanctity of his character, compared with that
of his frivolous and unprincipled companion, and the
avaricious Trader Hatch. His peculiar dress, the
earnestness of his prayers, his upward look, a cast of
deportment, growing out of the general tenor of his
thoughts, gradually acquired among a people
strangely
prone to superstition, something of their prescribed
veneration for a medicine man, or one who holds
communications
with the Wah-con-dah. Thus Elder
Wood became a privileged character among the
Shoshonee
.
But, though in many respects he found
himself
pleasantly situated, he every day saw much to
vex, and discipline his righteous spirit. He rebuked
the licentious excesses of his trapping companion, and
of Trader Hatch, to little more effect, than to be
ridiculed
,
the moment he was out of sight. If he was
sometimes deceived by the grave and decorous
attention
of the Indians to his discourses, into the belief,
that they were on the verge of conversion, he was
soon vexatiously enlightened to his real progress, by
perceiving, that they expected, and almost exacted
from him the same credibility for their wild fictions,
touching the Master of Life and the little white men
of the mountains.
In the family of William Weldon he felt himself at
home. Every thing in this quiet and regulated abode
7*
partook of order, plenty and peace. Here he found
books. Here he partook of most of the comforts of
civilized life. Yensi and her daughter equipped him
anew with a full suit of solemn black, made after the
fashion, which he brought with him. William
Weldon
,
it is true, held not to his Calvinistic
interpretations
of the Christian religion. But he saw, and
respected
the purity of his life, and the dignity and
uprightness
of his motives. For Jessy he early
contracted
an absorbing and parental fondness; and she
repaid it by listening with untiring attention to his
exposition of the scriptures, and a filial confidence
bounding on veneration. As William Weldon was in
circumstances of comparative affluence, constantly
increasing, he found no inconvenience, in fitting up
an apartment for Elder Wood, at his own house, so
that, when not absent on trapping excursions with his
companion, he enjoyed here a society, infinitely more
congenial, than that of Baptiste and Trader Hatch,
from whom he gradually withdrew himself.
CHAPTER IV.
Yes; she was lovely; but you felt,
That beauty was but half the spell.
It was the look, so free from guile,
The modest blush; the playful smile,
That seemed to breathe an air of heaven.
M. P. F.
When
Elder Wood became domesticated in
William
Weldon's family, the daughter had reached
the age of twelve years; and in intelligence and
beauty surpassed not only any thing, that the minister
had seen, but even conceived. The parents, in their
pride and affection, often talked over the position of
the charming girl, with a confidence in his opinions
and advice, which they could no where else expect
to repose in the valley. The Indians in general
regarded
the Wakona, as they called her, tripping
along the valley in the joyousness of innocence, and
in the loveliness of a nymph of ancient fable, with a
superstitious delight in her beauty, as a kind of
charmed thing. Two only of the sons of that people,
as has been seen, looked upon her with other eyes.
Invincible circumstances precluded her parents from
interdicting them from her society. William
Weldon
could not have hoped the continued
consideration
and protection of the united tribe, if he had for
a moment been seen to withhold his daughter from
the occasional companionship of Areskoui and
Nelesho
.
Indeed the former had grown, so far into life,
with her, as a brother with a sister. Until the age
of ten, Jessy had felt towards him sentiments of
infantine
fondness, which inclined her to expect, and
desire his society in her childish sports. She had
taken a natural pleasure, in teaching him lessons, in
which he was slow. Even Jessy, amiable as she was,
felt, in such cases, the pride of conscious superiority.
But so entire and absorbing was the affection of
Areskoui
,
that his proud and sensitive nature was not
humbled, in yielding the palm to her, to whom he was
willing to allow all kinds of superiority belonged by
right. Until ten, the absence of Areskoui from her
excursions or amusements had been viewed as a
misfortune
.
But from that time his visits, and especially
those of Nelesho, were often felt as an annoyance.
He sometimes ventured to show her some of the
accustomed
marks of Indian civility and preference.
A fight between him and Areskoui was the frequent
consequence. Cautioned by her parents, and
counselled
by Elder Wood, she dared not manifest her
dislike to the latter; and to manage her looks and
intercourse
prudently between these boys, who ruled
parents, that governed the tribes, was soon found to
be a task of endless perplexity, and chagrin. A
thousand times she urged, with the confidence of their
earlier years, upon Areskoui forbearance, in relation
to Nelesho. A thousand times had she reconciled
them, and sent each away content, only to see their
quarrels, on the same score, renewed the next time
they met.
For the parents and the son she was alike an object
of idolatrous fondness. Nothing, that the chief or
his wife could procure, was too good for the beautiful
Wakona. To caress her, to fold her in her arms, and
to feel her silken curls, was one of the chief pleasures
of Josepha. For her son, if there were richer fruits,
larger and more luxurious strawberries, or more
brilliant
flowers, no matter where they grew, or at what
peril, labor or difficulty obtained. Mountains,
precipices
,
valleys, and distance opposed no effectual
obstacle
.
No Wakon bird, or Flamingo could be seen
in the valley, without exciting on the part of the
young chief a pursuit, which finally brought down the
prize, that the gay plumage might add to her stock
of ornaments. The softest fawn skins, the whitest
ermine, the most costly furs were purchased from
the hunt, or trapping, to be presented to her.
Such were the relations, which these children
sustained
to each other. Elder Wood saw in them the
harbingers of future difficulties and storms; and while
the lovely child fell on her knees before him, repeating
her evening prayers, most earnestly did he commend
the case of the valley flower to the Almighty.
Josepha
,
too, imparted to her beloved son all the treasured
lore of her early years, to put him on the ways, that
might tend to gain her love in return. She regularly
told her beads, and prayed the Virgin, to incline the
heart of the Wakona towards that of her son.
William
Weldon saw all; and his misanthropic
associations
with the white races, his perfect satisfaction
with the course of life, which he now led, and the
common respect of human nature for whatever is in
power, caused him to see it with a kind of vague
approval
,
fortified by ignorance of any fairer prospect
for his daughter, without removing from the vale
an idea from which his whole mind recoiled. Yensi
saw it, too; and saw, that the heart, which should be
worthy of her daughter's, ought to possess a far
different
refinement, tenderness and cultivation of intellect,
from that, which could be expected from Areskoui,
noble and worthy as she viewed him. Besides, she
endured
savage life, only because she loved her
husband
.
Often had she argued, to the extent of all her
casuistry, with her husband and Elder Wood, who
alike maintained the wild sophism of Rousseau, in
regard to the superiority of savage over social life.
She had besieged heaven with prayers, that God
would incline her husband's heart to remove from the
Shoshonee to his country or hers; that they might
spend their days in the security of law and order.
Nelesho saw it, and his proud and revengeful heart
inly determined, that if he might not hope the favor
of Jessy, at least the son of his liege chief should not
enjoy it.
Jessy, too, began by degrees to comprehend all
this; and the attentions and marks of affection from
Areskoui, which had formerly been matter of
gratification
,
or indifference, began to excite recoil and pain.
She comprehended, that Areskoui was noble in many
respects. She repeated incessantly to herself, that
his mother was a Christian and of the white race.
She saw him as the rising sun to all the young of two
tribes, and invested with all the homage, paid to one,
soon to be in power. But her imagination painted
in colors of light. She had already a beau ideal,
partly found in her father's library, partly in her
creative mind, and partly in her heart, with which,
to her misfortune, Areskoui held no comparison.
Little, that finds a place in history occurred, to
diversify
the annals of the Shoshonee for a period of
some years. As formerly, they sometimes hunted
towards the western ocean, and sometimes on the
Missouri side of the mountains. Sometimes they
wandered on the shores of the Bueneventura, and
sometimes towards the arctic sea, as game, or fish, or
mere amusement and variety were their object. In
the summer they regularly made distant excursions,
some of which William Weldon's family
accompanied
,
and some it did not. Births, marriages and deaths
occurred, as in the generations of the past. Intrigues,
amours, quarrels, gossip, scandal, and all the
incidents
and shades of human variety of enjoyment and
suffering had their hours in the Shoshonee Valley, as
in the great civilized world. The incorporation with
the tribe of Trader Hatch, Elder Wood and his
partner
had, indeed, produced a marked era in the annals
of the nation. The simplicity of their ancient
manners
sunk under the reign of avarice and artificial
wants, the natural result of the general introduction
of money among such a simple people.
From Elder Wood's deep and solemn words, they
heard that there was a life after this, not such, as their
shadowy traditions dimly showed; but a life of
retribution
without end; a heaven, a hell, an eternity, a
Saviour, and a dread alternative of being saved or lost.
In opposition to all this, Trader Hatch taught them
by palpable experiment, that for a given amount of
beaver, peltries, or money, they could at any time
purchase a liquid `medicine,' which first maddened
their musing brain to a demoniac phrenzy of joy; and
then, by repetition, and in its ultimate consequences,
transformed them to stupified and degraded brutes.
Areskoui was elected at eighteen to the trust of
first war chief of the united tribes; and he now loved
Jessy with a fervor and vehemence of passion, which
had matured with the developement of his mental
and physical powers. They, who live in the society of
the world, and feel the distraction of the thousand
pursuits that dissipate deep thought, and weaken the
current of the passions, by separating them into
numberless
channels, and that produce feeble and
voluptuous
character, will conceive with difficulty, or doubt,
the nature of this absorbing affection. From his
father he carried in himself deep and
unchangeable
purpose; and from his mother the southern fire,
and aptitude to passion. The Wakona was to him,
as she was to all, a finished model of whatever is
lovely in person or mind. Amidst rocks, woods and
mountains, this feeling was nurtured by all that he
saw, or imagined.
Love had he learned in cots, where Indians lie.
His constant teachers had been woods and rills,
The silence, that is in the starry sky,
The sleep, that is among the lonely hills.
Ellswatta, absorbed by his employments, and
formed, indeed, of sterner stuff, did not so keenly
sympathise
with this spell of his son. When he noted his
dejection, he sometimes, and in no very complacent
tone, commanded him to shake off the enervating
influence
.
`Son,' he would say, `thou art not born
chief of the red men among these mountains, to be
sad, or joyful at the varying countenance of a girl of
the pale face. Thou art called to dare the deadly
encounter, to chafe the grizzly bear in his den, and,
like thy forefathers, to scorn danger and death. It
would grieve thy father, to see thee wither, through
love of the fair one, and become like a woman.' Far
different reception gave the ear of his mother to the
tale of his love, and his hopelessness of return. `Son,'
she said, `I would that thou knewest our race, as I
know them. Sieze the first time, when thou art alone
with her. Pour into her ear the tale of thy love.
Be sure, that thou lessen not the account of the
tortures
of thy bosom. If she turn from thee in seeming
disdain, ply the same story over anew. More than
all, be sure, that thou call forth thy whole store of
images, to vaunt her beauty. Compare her to roses,
to lilies, the bird of paradise, the full moon of the
firmament
;
in short, to whatever thou canst imagine of
the most beautiful in nature. If neither thy words,
nor thy wit, thy courage, nor thy perseverance fail
thee, she is more or less than her race, if in due time
she yield not to thy suit.'
Such counsel was too pleasant to the young warrior,
not to be immediately put in practice. Accordingly,
as they were soon after alone, in returning together from
angling in an adjacent lake, he startled her by abruptly
saying, `Wakona, my sister, thine eye discerneth every
thing, like that of the Wah-condah; and thou needest
not be told, that thy brother loveth thee, not as the
cold, pale faces lovebut with the truth and fervor
of the red men. Couldst thou return my love, and
confine thy thoughts to me and these mountains, as my
mother to my father, I should be happier, than the
spirits of the free and the brave in the land of souls.
Bird of paradise, thou canst not bear the brightness
of the daughters of the sun in thy face, and cruelty to
thy suffering brother, who has played with thee from
infancy, in thy heart.'
With many a strong figure, with much vehement
adjuration, with earnest appeals to their solitude
spent together, to the tenderness of their early years,
to the friendship of their parents, and his power to
protect her, did the young chief paint the depth of
his love and despair, with an energy and eloquence
inspired only by truth and nature. His proud eye
quailed as he spoke; and filled with unwonted
moisture
,
and the vehemence of his feelings shook his
whole frame, as he ceased, and apparently waited her
reply.
What a trial for this inexperienced girl! True,
she had in some way divined, that such a disclosure
from him was to be feared. It brought the paleness
of death to her cheek, and her eye filled with tears,
for the young chief was to her, as a brother. `Why,
Areskoui,' she replied, in words interrupted by the
tumultuous thoughts that rushed upon her, `why not
remain, as thou hast been, without speaking such
words, and without these looks, that terrify me? Why
wilt thou cause thy sister to dread thee, by speech
and action, so strange and new? The only use of
such wild and unkind behaviour will be to cause thy
sister henceforward to avoid thee.'
The sight of the companion of his infancy in tears
was one that no training of his mother could bring
him to sustain. He timidly took her hand. `Pardon,'
he said, `pardon this one fault, Wakona; and the
heart of thy brother shall break before I vex thee
again with my foolish words.'
She gave him the accustomed sign of pardon among
his people, as she received his burning hand, and
marked
his visible agony and effort at self control. In
proof, that he had conquered for this time, he tore
himself away from her, and left her alone. `He has
a noble and a good heart,' she thought, `and is
worthy
to govern this people, and able to protect my
parents
and me. Why have I sent him away in sorrow?
Why not become to him, what he desires?' She knew
but too well her father's wishes. She was not
incapable
of the views presented by expediency. She
VOL. I. 8
began distinctly to contemplate the subject for the
first time; and made efforts to think of him, as she
had reason to suppose, would be agreeable to her
father, and the avoidance of future trouble and
danger
to herself. But though her young thoughts were
sufficiently vague, she could not bring herself to the
near contemplation of such a relation. It was night
fall. The breezy breath of the south fanned her, as
it discoursed solemn music in the pines, under which
she sat herself down. The oriole sang sweetly in
the branches; and a thousand birds were hymning
the requiem of the fading day. New ideas had
received
birth, and undiscovered fountains of feeling
had been ruffled. Vague thoughts arose within her,
that there might be of her own race some of those
noble and matchless ones, equally perfect in form and
mind, adding to all the native nobleness of Areskoui,
polish, accomplishments and discipline, as much
superior
to hers, as that was superior to his. Of such
pecrless men she had read in her father's romances.
Her own brilliant and glowing imagination had added
a thousand colors from its own treasures. The round
and silver orb of the moon began to be visible over
the misty summits of the mountains. As she steadily
contemplated the queen of the night, marching along
the blue of the firmament, intensely occupied with her
own imaginings, she almost waited to see one of those
noble forms arise with the moon and descend
towards
the valley. She tasked the utmost effort of her
fancy to sketch resemblances of those wise, heroic
and amiable men, with whom it might be pleasant to
spend life, in the relation of which Areskoui had
spoken
.
By comparing the members of her small circle,
among whom Areskoui was the most interesting, she
could form associations more or less pleasant with
the idea of more distant relations with them. But
to spend life in the most intimate of all the ties of
affection with either! Her heart withered at the
idea. `Oh!' she thought, `that I could compare for
myself, and see, if all these seductive pictures are not
an illusion; and if life be not a cold and heartless
mockery of the affections, passed as well with one as
another.' Soon she had that range of comparison
she desired.
It is believed, that the interesting little village on
the Oregon, called Astoria, received its name from
the circumstance, that the celebrated company, which
collects furs on that river, and sends them to China,
was founded by John Jacob Astor. A thousand
circumstances
,
appended to this village, concur, to
furnish
inexhaustible food for the imagination. Not far
from the calm bosom of the widest sea on the globe, it
rises from the shores of one of the noblest of rivers.
Thick and dark forests of pines and hemlocks, seen in
the distance, skirt it seaward. Flowering, and to
the eye interminable prairies, stretch away from it
towards the Rocky Mountains. Log houses, tents,
Indian huts, a number of stores, and a cluster of
various
buildings, intended for fur ware houses, and a
few commodious dwellings, enclosed with a high
palisade
,
and fortified with cannon, constitute the place.
The earth sees no place, called a town, more
lonely
,
or more romantic in its situation. Yet here in
this distant spot, apparently isolated from social
nature
,
the fluttering pennons of ships from different
nations remind the visitant of the all-searching eye
and enterprise of commerce. Here is seen the
Yankee
ship with its motley crew, with quick step and
eye, all hands in motion, and all hearts keenly attached
by the fur gathering and money getting impulse. Here
is the large English ship, manned by sailors with
round and ruddy faces, and the captain wearing on
his brow, and in his port, the impress of taciturnity
and national pride. Here is the uncouth Russian
ship, with its German captain, and its crew, half
Muscovites
,
and half Kamschadales. Here may be, also,
sometimes seen the Spanish fellucca, with its
swarthy
crew, occupied in bartering jerked beef, hides
and fruits, for peltries, furs and smoked salmon. The
melee
is rendered more striking by greater or less
sprinklings of Chinese, distinguished in a moment by
their national look and manners.
At a little distance, encamped without the town, is
another group of beings, apparently of another world.
It would be hard to say, whether their copper
complexions
,
their stern and ruminating countenances
show thoughtlessness, or the depth of thought.
Whether
they are meditating or half asleep, whether they
survey all this bustle of commerce, this assemblage
of representatives from so many countries, that have
been borne, they know, and enquire not how, over the
dark bosom of the sea, with the look of meditation,
or indifference; whether they disregard these strange
objects from pride, or from a consciousness of their
native independence and ability to get along without
them. Their dogs, faithful in companionship, are
seen sleeping beside them; and the squaws play with
their naked children, as they caper and tumble about
on the buffalo robes.
It often happens, that three or four ships are lying
in the river at the same time. The British and
Americans, the Muscovites and the Creole Spanish,
meet with the Indians on these distant shores in the
most perfect accord, and pursue the deer and elk on
the plains; or the monsters of the deep in the seas; or
trade with the Indians, join in their sports, and
converse
with their wives and daughters, as though they
were all brethren, and of one race. At these
immense
removes from all civilization, whatever appears
in the form of woman, in their eyes becomes
beautiful
.
In truth, as has been seen, the Shoshonee are the
fairest of Indians. Laying the roundness of their
faces, their Indian noses, and a slight tinge of copper
out of the question, many of them are in fact pretty.
All have a look of high health and elasticity, which
gives them a certain air of interest.
At the time, of which we speak, there was in the
river a large ship, partly English, and partly
American
,
which brought from Canton two young men, as
companions, almost as much unlike in disposition and
character, as Baptiste Dettier and Elder Wood. Yet
they associated, and, notwithstanding their
dissimilarity
of mind and disposition, were set down by
opinion
,
as intimate and almost inseparable friends. The
one was remarkable for the extreme fashion of his
appearance
and the unrivalled beauty of his person; and
the other for the nobleness and dignity of his form,
his high forehead, and a countenance marked with
decision, almost to harshness. From a thousand
circumstances
,
they would both have been selected, as
uncommonly striking young gentlemen, each in his
peculiar way.
At the same time it happened, that a large party of
Shoshonee and Shienne, male and female,
accompanied
by Baptiste and Elder Wood, and two sub-chiefs,
were at Astoria, with a view to dispose of their
winter's
hunt and trapping. Julius Landino, and
Frederic
Belden, for so the young men in question were
named, manifested great delight, in making the
acquaintance of these Indians. They were
constantly
about their camp, to witness their manners
and dances, and striving to converse by signs with the
women. The pleasure of this intercourse was
heightened
,
when they became acquainted with the
Baptist
minister, and Baptiste, who spoke Shoshonee with
great fluency, and thus acted as interpreter between
them and the Indians. They affected to be in
raptures
with the simplicity of Indian manners; and even
8*
admired the healthy copper cheeks, as circular as the
orb of the moon, and highly painted with vermilion,
of the Indian girls. Upon this word Baptiste opened,
in his usual style of overflowing exuberance, upon
the beauty of the country above, the unequalled
sublimity
and delightfulness of the Shoshonee valley, and
the simplicity and hospitality of the natives, and the
kindness, which they always showed to strangers. He
descanted upon the abundance of game, the shoals of
salmon in the rivers, and the surface of the verdant
prairies covered with strawberries. He added, in his
usual enthusiasm and vehement gesticulation, `
c'est
un paradis terestre
.' `But,' he continued, `you call
these squaws pretty. They are well enough for
squaws, and kind hearted too. You should see our
Jessy, or Wakona, as the Indians have named her.
Mon Dieu,' he cried, folding his hands, and looking
upwards, `c'est une ange celeste;' and Baptiste
proceeded
,
to paint the valley flower, as possessing
charms far beyond any thing, that had yet been seen
on the earth. When they laughed at his enthusiasm,
and charged him with incredible extravagance, he
shrugged, exclaimed with his accustomed sacre! and
referred them for confirmation to Elder Wood. The
grave manner and tones of the minister were
warrant
for him, that he would utter neither hyperbole,
nor extravagance; and he assured them, `that to have
any idea of the scenery of the Shoshonee valley, and
the unrivalled loveliness of Jessy Weldon, they must
see, for that words gave no idea of it.' `Suppose we
were to go up with these people, and see the fine
country, and the pretty girl among the Indians,' said
Julius Landino. `I should like it of all things,'
replied
Frederic; `and as our ship remains in the river
five weeks, and we have nothing, meanwhile, to
amuse us here, but hunting, it would beguile the time,
and we should have, no doubt, very interesting matter
to record in our tablets, from a voyage into the
interior
of two hundred leagues. We should explore a
new country and a new people, visited for the first
time by such scientific travellers.'
They were both young gentlemen of pleasure, who,
as yet, seemed to have `been born to eat up the corn,'
and with no other object, than to amuse themselves.
A finer wild goose chase could have never entered
their imagination. The season, their circumstances,
and those of the ship, favored the project. It was
the time of strawberries, salmon, flowers and the
whispering south west breeze. Baptiste had been
invited on board their ship, had eaten soup, and
drunk wine, and was as happy and loquacious as a
Frenchman could be. Elder Wood had preached
in the town, and all the ship's crews had attended.
Those, who slept, had the politeness to turn the other
way; and those who had not understood a word,
nodded their heads as though from edification and
assent; and Elder Wood, having set this down as a
very encouraging meeting, was happy, and in
uncommon
spirits. The Indians were happy, for they had
obtained plenty of rum, for six times its value in
beaver
.
The girls were happy; for they had obtained
red chintz robes, beads, necklaces, looking glasses
and nose and ear jewels; besides the admiration of
the gay young strangers. All parties seemed alike
delighted with the idea of such an excursion. The
glowing descriptions of the voluble Frenchman, and
the more staid and credible narrative of Elder Wood,
alike concurred to fill the minds of the young men
with the delight of the contemplated river voyage.
The trees and nature, in their most seducing array
on the shore, aided to raise the charm of association.
At intervals an Indian canoe, with its red young
occupants
,
who raised the joyous whoop, and dipped
their paddles into the gently rippling bosom of the
stream, was seen gliding away behind the verdure of
the trees.
`
Omnis ager est ver
,' cried Julius. `I should delight
to follow.' `A rush for Latin,' responded Frederic,
`In plain English, the time, the country, the river,
the girls, every thing is delightful. If you will
accompany
me, we will go. We will spear salmon, eat
strawberries, hunt the deer, and the girls; and, no
doubt, we could collect furs, hams, and dried salmon
on speculation into the bargain. Amidst such an
abundance of game, we shall certainly find some
adventures
worthy of record. Even if we fail, the
Shoshonee will not write our history; and we can tell
our own story. Besides, I have a prodigious
curiosity
to see this strange family of whites and their thrice
beautiful daughter.'
Baptiste, charmed with the project, absolutely
capered
for joy. `
It fait
,' he cried, `tems superbe, pour
monter la fleuve, manger des fraises, attrapper des
poissons, et des jeunes demoiselles Shoshonee.' Even
Elder Wood manifested unwonted hilarity at the idea
of such companions for the long voyage. Thus every
thing united, to arouse in the minds of these
unoccupied
young men a curiosity, to accompany the
returning
party of Indians to their country. The captain
proposed to send with them a factor, to collect furs,
hams and dried salmon. Instead of being of any use
to him, idle young men, like these, were rather a
hindrance
and annoyance. He gave a full consent; and
in half a day the preparations for carrying the project
into execution were completed. A few books, a
pocket telescope, and materials for drawing
composed
the scientific arrangements. A fine swift sailing
yawl accompanied the expedition provided with two
tents, and every requisite appointment, that their own
judgment, fortified by that of Baptiste and Elder
Wood, could suggest as necessary. It was manned
by four rowers, two of them from other ships in the
river, and each of whom played an instrument of the
band. The two young gentlemen each played the
flute. An American factor, and captain Wilhelm,
commander of a Russian ship, that would stay three
months in the river, accompanied the party. They
were well armed, and provided with ammunition; that
they might be alike prepared for pleasure or battle;
to join in the sports of the Indians, or set them at
defiance
.
The day was set for their return; and the
yawl, preceded by the Shoshonee in their periogues,
moved from the ship, under the discharge of cannon,
by way of parting salute, and the acclamations and
good wishes of those who remained. A gentle breeze
filled the sails of the yawl; and the oarsmen, instead
of their oars, plied their musical instruments, to which
the Indians responded, in repeated bursts of
whooping
,
that rung far away over the grassy plains.
If such music always thrills the heart, even in those
places, where it is natural to expect it, still sweeter
were the notes, as the strain was heard, reverberating
from the woods across silent and flowering plains,
where the echo of music, like this, had slumbered
from the creation; and now swelled and died away in
the distance of the verdant solitudes. The
distinctness
of the ocean outline gradually faded from the
view of the voyagers; and the blue of the distant
mountains grew more visible, like undulating ridges
of clouds in the sky. They were soon in a region
where all was new. Every strong bend of the river
brought to sight the different configurations and
aspects
of the prairies, and the hoar limestone cliffs; or
the remote wooded points, that indented the shores.
Sometimes the moving pageant glided along under
the shades of green trees, or high banks, covered with
wild sage, gooseberry bushes, or the gaudiest classes
and varieties of flowers. A youthful mind, not wholly
destitute of the power of contemplation, could not
but enjoy this ever varying charm of nature, thus seen
for the first time; and a curiosity not painfully
excited
,
and continually gratified with the untiring
novelty
of the every varying aspects of nature; every
moment
giving fresh inclination to mark, what
diversities
of the grand and lonely scenery would next open
upon the eye. The heart that does not exquisitely
enjoy this satisfaction, must be dead to pleasure.
When they paused, to take their food under the
shade of a tree upon the green shores, Elder Wood
said his long grace, according to his prescribed form.
Baptiste chattered in half French half English, and
the Indians ruminated, after they had finished their
short meal, put their fingers to their mouths, and
moved them rapidly up and down; sprang from the
ground, and uttered their peculiar short, quick and
wild exclamations.
They left the smoke of their camp fires undulating
far over the plain; and the steady breeze, blowing
from the south west, filled their sails, and wafted them
rapidly, and without labor against the current of the
bold stream. The unwearying variety of a nature,
alternately sublime or beautiful, was continually
spread before them. Sometimes they walked along
the banks, and made a shorter route across the bends,
anticipating the progress of the yawl, and feasting
on the millions of strawberries, that reddened whole
patches of their path. Sometimes nature slept in a
dead calm on the prairies, around them. Sometimes
a slight breeze stole upon their senses from the acacias,
catalpas, and flowering locusts, the mingled fragrance
and odour of a thousand flowers, like those from
`Araby the blest.' At night they spread their tents
under the open sky. The Indians were encamped
around them. As the twilight faded, they fed
together
,
as one family, upon the flesh of elk and deer; and
when in the different languages, they had chatted,
and sung, and told tales, and laughed, and anticipated
the voyage of the morrow, they sunk to deep sleep,
with an ocean of grass spread around, violets and
strawberries beneath their buffalo robes, and the blue
and stars above.
On the evening of the fourth day, the voyagers
arrived
at the great falls of the Oregon. The yawl
was to be left here, and exchanged for Indian
periogues
above the falls. The Indian water crafts,
too, were left, and all walked together round the falls.
The scenery here shows dismantled hills, and huge
boulders of rocks, scattered in promiscuous confusion;
and affords a grand and inspiring prospect. Amidst
the incessant and deafening roar, as the waters whiten
in sheets, and pour along the rocks, the Sewasserna,
as it comes dashing down from its dark green hanging
hills and woods, brings in its lateral tribute, and is lost
in the mighty Oregon.
The plain country on the Oregon, or Columbia,
slopes from the Rocky mountains to the wide Pacific
by two immense plains, that lie, one above another,
after the form of a prodigious terrace or glacis. The
great falls occur nearly at the point, where the upper
terrace rises from the lower. This terrace is marked,
and for a great distance, at right angles from it, by a
regular, but stupendous mass of huge lime stone
blocks and columns, that seem, as if giants had
detached
them from their bed in the mountains. At the
distance of a league on the south side of the Oregon,
this mass of pillars and columns gives place to an
almost
perpendicular wall of stone, from two to five
hundred feet high, which continues to mark the
terrace
,
as you proceed up the Sewasserna. At unequal
distances, from fifty paces to half a mile from this
hoar and magnificent wall of nature, flows the
Sewasserna
,
a most beautifully smooth and transparent river
in its whole course above. At the distance of a
league from the point where it unites with the Oregon,
it loses its precipitous character and foamy whiteness,
and is a calm and boatable stream, quite to its
recesses
in the Rocky mountains, where a hundred
mountain
streams and cascades rush down, and unite with
it from every side.
The river is skirted with a belt of tall, straight
trees, seldom more than a few rods in width. They
are plane, cotton, peccan, sycamore and black walnut,
with cones of verdure at the top, and of an arrowy
straightness from the ground to the first limbs.
Ascend
to the upper glacis, and the country opens on
either side a boundless level to the Rocky mountains;
while in front you look down, three or four hundred
feet upon a smooth plain, covered with grass and
flowers
,
whose western verge is laved by the wave of the
Pacific.
Never was water travelling more delightful, than a
spring passage, chiefly by sailing, in an Indian
periogue
up the beautiful Sewasserna. The very
breeze was charged with aromaas the prospect was
every where with sublimity, verdure and flowers. The
river is just of a width, and the skirts of trees on
either
bank of a height to render its whole course an
alcove of shade. The oriole and red bird sing for
you, and the mocking bird imitates them on the
grand and branchy plane. The paroquets scream,
and flutter, in lightning lines of green and gold, from
tree to tree. The turtles incessantly coo over your
head on the peccans. A gentle breeze from the
south just ripples the foliage, and fans your temples.
The repose of nature invites the repose of the
passions
,
and when you sleep, after the exercise of the
day, it is balmy and medicinal.
When the exploring company at length arrived
in the centre of this fairest valley of the west, and saw
the smokes streaming aloft from the Shoshonee town
below the wall, and from the tents above, and heard
the dogs bark, and the joyous whoops, and noisy
gratulations of thousands of Indians, who crowded
about the landing periogues, to welcome back their
friends and the new visitants,they almost regretted
the termination of a voyage, which had been such a
scene of continued and high enjoyment. But they
were aroused from all reflections of that sort, by the
necessity of receiving ceremonial welcomes, and
returning
them by set speeches. This finished in due
form, they were invited to different feasts. Some
offered
them strawberries and cream; some the most
delicious fresh salmon, which was at this time in its
utmost excellence; and others Indian soup, made of
dried and pounded deer's flesh, sage and sassafras
leaves, and prairie potatoes, all mixed together.
Trader
Hatch invited them to drink wine, and take coffee,
the luxuries of civilization. But the wines of
foreign
countries gave place on this occasion to the rich
mead, or hydromel, which the Shoshonee prepare
from their countless swarms of wild bees, and the
aromatic
and medicated herbs of the country. While
they feasted, and drank, the drums beat. The young
warriors wagged their heads, as they danced, and
whooped. The council fires blazed high, and the old
council chiefs, with Ellswatta at their head, looked on,
and smoked the pipe with calm satisfaction visibly
impressed
upon their countenances. Hundreds of
Shoshonee
girls eyed the visitants and the fine young men
askance, and looked their loveliest from their round
and vermilion countenances.
After the party had feasted, and been introduced
to the chiefs, and had gone over the first ceremonial
of hospitality, they began to enquire, why they had
VOL. I. 9
not seen the singular white family, of which they
had heard so much? Trader Hatch explained to
them, that this family cultivated more retiring and
distant habits and manners, and would not be seen
upon any other terms, than a first visit to them. Elder
Wood had gone, immediately on landing, to announce
his return, and greet his beloved friends. Of course
William Weldon's family was apprised of the arrival
of the two fine young gentlemen, of whose beauty of
person, and polish of manners and intellectual
improvement
he unwittingly said enough, to bring a full
tinge of the rose on the lily ground of Jessy's cheek,
and a curiosity that reached quite to the limits of
being pleasant. `What fine young men must they be,'
she thought, `who drew such warm encomiums from
Elder Wood, so little addicted to such modes of
speech!'
The young men, mean while, went to the house of
Trader Hatch, to dress and prepare to visit William
Weldon. Elder Wood, as the most confidential
inmate
of the family, was sent for, and requested to
introduce
them. Ellswatta and Josepha and Areskoui
and Nelesho were already at the house. Preceded
by Hatch and Baptiste, and accompanied by Elder
Wood, and followed by hundreds of the young
warriors
and women of the tribe, they moved from the
house of the trader, towards the abode of William
Weldon.
The sun, enthroned in purple, had sunk away
behind
the smoking summits of the mountains, and
distant thunder was heard, as of thunder-clouds,
that had passed away. The Indian cries were still,
and in their stead was heard the screaming of the
countless wild water fowls returned from the ocean
to their green summer retreats. The mellow song
of the oriole could be distinguished over the
thousand
mingled notes of the other songsters. While
the wild and plaintive cries of the loon, up the wave
of the Sewasserna, added a solemn plaintiveness to
the adieu of nature to the passing day. It was an
evening, to soften every heart, not made of stone, to
emotions of gladness.
The strangers were by no means prepared for the
sight, that offered, as they crossed on a fallen tree the
little stream, that descended from the mountains in a
cascade, and fenced one side of William Weldon's
grounds. The roar of this cascade mingled in their
ears with the breezy moan in the tops of the lofty
pines, that rose in front of the dwelling. Back of
these pines, and under the magnificent alcove, its
front was seen. It was large, plaistered neatly, and
painted of a deep green. The grounds were
tastefully
laid out in Chinese style. Here was the just
starting field of maize. In another compartment
was the patch of sweet potatoes. Elsewhere were
garden spots of vegetables, that had recently been
planted, or were just appearing. The delicious
verdure
of pawpaw hedges marked off the
compartments
.
A few sugar maples, whose summits had not
yet parted with their red blossoms, were embowered
by grape vines. Clumps of vines, and flowering
shrubs were distributed at intervals; and a number
of rivulets, winding through the grounds, served to
water them, when they were parched; and now
gurgled
over white sands, as they wound towards their
confluence, before they entered the Sewasserna.
The visitants often paused to admire. They
exclaimed
in admiration of the taste and loveliness of
the scene, where nature had commenced all the
rudiments
in her own simplicity and beauty; and art had
seemed disposed to enter into a mimic and playful
competition. One compared the place to the grounds
of the enchanted palace of Armidaanother to the
bower of Adam and Eve, before sin had withered it.
One estimate was common to all. Here was true
taste, and labor, guided by art, and that in no ordinary
degree. Nor would these grounds have shamed the
front of the palace of an Italian prince. There was
that in the scene, which inspired respect, and
checked
careless advance. They had loitered about the
grounds, without passing the outer boundary of the
pines, until the dusk of evening began to obscure the
landscape, though it took nothing from the fragrance
of the acacias and meadow pinks, that adorned the
spot. All the birds were hushed, but the oriole on
the shrubs, and the loon in the river. `Suppose,' said
Julius Landino, `we serenade the fair nymph of the
rocks.' `It would be the right mode of attack,'
replied
Frederic Belden. `
Ma foi
,' exclaimed
Baptiste
,
`
c'est une ange
, la plus belle demoiselle
dans
l'univers
.' Hatch declared, that Jessy Weldon was,
indeed, a
severe
beauty,' well known to be his last
superlative
.
To serenade the beauty of the enchanted mansion
among the rocks seemed to all an appropriate method
of announcing their approach. The four musicians
sat down on a rustic bench surmounted by bowers of
Multiflora roses in full bloom, and a rill of water
murmuring
just at their feet. The air selected was a
beautiful Scotch lament. They played it at first soft
and low, accompanied with the voice of one of the
young men, and the flute of the other. The words
were from the prince of the Scottish bards; and the
music, so heard, so accompanied, and at such a place,
was of that kind, that goes straight to the heart, first
softening it; then filling it with the enthusiasm of
virtue
,
tenderness and glory; and finally elevating the best
and noblest thoughts of our nature to heaven. The
wall above just caught the echoes, and sweetly
returned
them. William Weldon, his wife and
daughter
,
not expecting to see the visitants that evening,
had just risen from their supper. The bible lay open
before them. Ellswatta and his wife and the two
young chiefs sat on a low settee, covered with elk skin,
listening to the evening hymn of the family, that
regularly
preceded their worship. The tremulous voice
of Jessy was mingled with that of her father and
mother, as sweet and soft as the breezy influence upon
the strings of the olian harp, as they chaunted their
praises of the Living God. The notes of the Scotch
lament upon the band and accompaniments from
abroad mingled with those of the evening hymn
within
.
The Indians, alive to the influences of music,
arose from their seat of skins, and looked wistfully in
the direction. It would be difficult to imagine the
feelings of Jessy, as she heard perfect music, for the
first time, discoursing the mournful and low notes of
lamentation and grief. The father laid the open
bible
aside, and looked in the face of his lovely
daughter
,
whose fair locks arose on her head, as the tears
streamed down her cheeks. The eyes of the mother,
too, glistened with the full inspiration. Suddenly the
air changed. The musicians stood up; and each one
swelling his instrument to its utmost power, they played
a grand march. The Indians sprang erect, threw their
robes over their shoulders, and extended their arms,
as rapt with the effect. Yensi in her own country
had heard the noisy music of China, set off by the
terrific
bursts of the gong. William Weldon
remembered
,
how he had kindled, in the days of other years,
with the music of the full band in the military
procession
.
He recollected the tenderness and
enthusiasm
of his morning of life. But Jessy, with a frame,
in which every nerve was attuned to music, and its
consequent enthusiasm, and over whose soul it brought
in a moment, countless shadowy imaginings and
thoughts of heaven, listened with an excitement
almost
painful; watching the ineffable surprise marked
9*
upon the countenances of her parents. `What sweet
music the fair haired people discourse,' exclaimed
Yensi! `It does, indeed,' replied her husband, `bring
over my thoughts images of heaven. God grant, it
may bode us good, to hear such music in these
valleys
!'
`Why should we fear any thing from the
people
of my father's kindred?' asked Jessy. `Listen, oh!
listen. What a people must they be, who have
invented such a music! Can it be possible, that bad
omens can steal upon the ear, in such sounds of heaven?
This indeed excels the tales of the red people, about
the music of the lakes in the islands of the happy
mansions
.'
The strain paused. It swelled, and died away
again, closing in a strain of sacred music. Elder
Wood now led forward the party to the house. The
door was opened, and they stood in presence of
William
Weldon's family.
They looked round upon the scene before them
with undisguised astonishment. They had fancied a
rude hut of the backwoods; and part of the large
apartment before them was fitted up with taste, not
unmixed with touches of grandeur; which the
admirable
matching of art to nature gave the dark purple
vault, that sprang up, as it were, to heaven. The
whole view spread over the apartment an
indescribable
air of nobleness. Ellswatta, tall, muscular, noble,
with dignity, command and generous thought
written
upon his brow, sat on his seat of elk skin, one
shoulder
and one muscular arm bare, and the other enclosed
with a buffalo robe, beautifully dyed and ornamented,
and enclosing his fine manly form, as in a mantle. No
one needed point out to them Areskoui. His
resemblance
to his father, and the indescribable mixture of
European and Indian in his expressive face,
designated
him in a moment to the most cursory beholder.
Nelesho, in the pride of his youth, and his Herculean
form, carried the impress of disdain, and the burning
thoughts in his bosom, in visible impress upon his
countenance
.
William Weldon appeared turned of fifty,
and, though with some touches of the hermit, still a
gentleman in appearance, dress and manners, with
keen intellect and melancholy thoughts upon his
interesting
face. Josepha, though still wearing an
European
countenance, was dressed in the gaudy
magnificence
,
that might be expected to result from the
taste of the wife of an Indian chief. The foreign
countenance and air of Yensi, an eye that glistened,
and melted, and told of fathomless love, and acute
intellect
,
designated her by the resemblance of the
forehead
and the eye, as the mother of Jessy.
But if the apartment and the group impressed them
with awe and astonishment, what were their thoughts,
when, instead of the Indian dressed rustic beauty,
whom they expected to see in her, a vision of
intelligence
,
youth and loveliness was before them, which
awed, quite as much as it attracted. The lily and
the rose could not have been more happily blended,
than in her complexion. Her chesnut curls clustered
upon her perfectly moulded shoulders in a richness,
which neither words nor pencil might reach. Her
eye showed, as though you looked down transparent
depths of water, and saw the images of her thoughts,
as they were painted in the fountains. At the same
time there was archness combined with pensiveness,
brilliant intellect with meekness and simplicity; and,
taken altogether, there was such a person and form,
as instantly surprises an imaginative eye with the
humbling discovery that no conception, no beau ideal,
reaches the actual power of Omnipotence to mould,
and paint his own picture. Each of the beholders
rejected all previous imaginings, and remembrances
of loveliness, as a talented, but untrained statuary
would his own imperfect models, when first brought
in view of the Venus de Medici. She was dressed in
Chinese silk, simple, but with taste, and even
magnificence
.
But no one who saw Jessy Weldon, thought
much of her dress. The young men, too, noted
conscious
dignity in her manner; and though a passing
glow stained her cheek with a deeper tinge of the rose
for a moment, she almost instantly resumed her
calmness
,
and received their compliments, as though she
had been long accustomed to society. The fond and
delighted consciousness of the parents, too, was
obvious
.
They well, and readily comprehended the
admiration
of the youthful strangers; nor seemed in the
slightest degree to consider it unnatural or misplaced.
Indeed, it was a vision of beauty to inspire a poet.
Nor will they, who have travelled much, and seen
strange things bestowed in strange places, admire,
that such an one as Jessy grew up in the valleys of the
Oregon among the Shoshonee. The American Aloe
has been generally found in the deepest deserts,
where none but denizens of the wilderness behold.
The Nymphea spreads its surpassing cup in mephitic
cypress swamps, amidst the most loathsome and
noxious
animals. Providence seems often to have had
for plan, to hide its fairest and most resplendent
productions
in the depths of the unpeopled desert.
CHAPTER V.
To fancy's eye, it might have seem'd,
As though the golden days of yore
Had circled back once more,
And brought again that guileless mirth,
Which bards have sung, and sages dreamed
In bright reversion yet for earth
M. P. F.
The
youthful visitants, who thus so
unexpectedly
perceived themselves in a place, and in
presence
of society so different from their previous
conceptions
,
did not at once comprehend, how to deport
themselves in their new train of feelings. All ideas
of being familiar, and accounting for their visit and
its motives in such words and manner, as would
have answered, for what they expected to see, were
abandoned, and each of the young men moved the
other, to explain the purpose of their visit. To crown
their confusion, they apprehended, that Jessy saw it,
and made efforts not to smile, in view of their
confusion
.
Even the tall and stern Indians seemed to be
transformed in their eyes to superior beings; and they
might have reported their estimate of this spectacle,
as the embassador of Pyrrhus did his impression of
the Roman senate, when he saw it for the first time.
Wilhelm, the Russian captain, appeared most calm.
He made blunt, but respectful compliments in bad
French, easily, and fluently explaining the objects of
the party, in coming to the Shoshonee. He said, `that
they should have held themselves inexcusable, having
come here to hunt, eat strawberries, spear salmon,
and spend a few days in exploring the beautiful
valley
,
not to have paid their respects to Mr. Weldon,
and to his family. He was sure they would all be
happy, on their return to declare, that fame, instead
of having done too much justice to the loveliness of
their residence, and the interest excited by the
appearance
of its inmates, had not related a tenth part of
either.' The factor and the musicians were then
named; and a general and easy conversation ensued,
turning upon the pleasantness of the trip, and the
satisfaction
of the visitants, and making enquiries,
touching
the country beyond, the strength and number of
the Indians, and discussions of that sort. Supper,
coffee and tea, strawberries and cream, were speedily
prepared; and the two young strangers could not at
all reconcile their previous conceptions of extreme
awkwardness, annexed to Indian character, with their
present feelings, as they saw with how much decorum
and propriety of manners Ellswatta and the two young
chiefs partook of it with the rest. The elder chief
was both gracious and communicative; and told the
young men, `that the Master of Life had shown them
singular good fortune, in giving them fine weather and
a south wind, to waft them up without the labor of
the oar; and in having brought them among his
people
on the day previous to the evening when the great
annual festival of spearing the salmon was to take
place.'
It was understood, that the united tribe would
celebrate
a great feast, and the kettle dance, as
customary
,
previous to the religious solemnity of the salmon
spearing. The young strangers announced to
William
Weldon's family, and the rest of the people at
table, `that they desired much, to travel up the plain
on the morrow; and hoped, they might have the
pleasure
of their society, in exploring the vicinity; and
to show them where were those fine strawberries, of
which they had heard.' This was a civility, which
could not be denied; and Ellswatta told them, that,
after the feast and dance of the morning, himself, his
wife and son would accompany them to the
strawberry
fields. `And may we expect your company,
that of your lady and lovely daughter?' somewhat
timidly asked Julius, turning to William Weldon.
Jessy stole a look at her father's countenance, and a
volume of words could not have explained more
explicitly
,
what was passing in his mind. After a
moment
of seemingly earnest deliberation, and looking
intensely in the face of his wife, he hesitatingly gave
consent to the request.
It would be unnatural to suppose, that the eye of
Jessy had not perceived, in a moment, that Julius
Landino was a youth, that equalled in person,
manners
and dress, or rather transcended any of all the
heroes in her father's romances. Frederic, though
by no means so striking at first view, under less showy
person and manners, under a certain silence and
reserve
,
concealed a something, that created interest
and curiosity, exciting the wish to study him further,
and the impression, that he concealed still more, than
he put forth. Perhaps, this influence, when allowed
scope for display, is on the whole more favorable to
the party, than the striking person and manners, that
achieve their greatest result at first sight.
It would be equally unnatural to imagine, that Jessy
Weldon, thus singularly brought in contact with these
young strangers, one of them at least most elegant in
person and manners, did not find her curiosity and
interest
piqued, did not feel a novel and keen sensation
of wonder and delight, in being thus enabled to form
those estimates and comparisons, which the creations
of her imagination had so often inclined her to wish
to institute. After a long and delightful
conversation
,
in which all parties, save Areskoui and Nelesho,
had been called forth in the display of their utmost
conversational talents, the evening closed by a
proposition
on the part of Hatch, disposed to be
magnificent
on this occasion, that the whole party should
take breakfast with him on the following morning.
They all consented. The musicians proposed to close
the evening with a serenade. Julius Landino played
the flute, Frederic Belden the clarionet, and the band
gave two or three of the popular airs of the day. In
mother and daughter the predominant impression from
the music and the scene certainly was dissatisfaction
with the rude and simple people and manners, among
which they lived, and indefinite longings after that
society
,
where such music and such visitants were the
natural order of things.
It would be difficult to analyze the feelings of the
different parties, as they severally retired to their rest.
Areskoui, good and magnanimous, as he was, had
groaned inwardly; and all the demons of jealousy
tugged at his heart. He had not had chances of
comparison; but he comprehended by a glance, that
the young men were of the higher class; that they
were of uncommon beauty of person. All this he
discovered through the magnifying medium of his
apprehensions
.
He went, by the torch light of his own
humble partition of his father's tent, to his little
looking
glass, and compared his own copper visage with
the blooming faces, and the high finish of deportment,
which, he perceived, belonged to these strangers.
`What am I?' he asked, `what chances have I, who
am but a wild, untrained animal of the woods, in her
eye, compared with men, like these?' The unhappy
young chief had noted all the eagerness of pleasure,
sparkling in the eye of his foster sister. He
understood
,
too, the speaking countenance, the delicate
attentions, the soft and low words, the respectful
admiration
of the young men. He noted every turn of
the liquid lustre of her eye upon them; and for the
first time, he thought, he discovered on her part a clear
effort, to display herself to advantage, and to practise
the arch looks and the proud and conscious triumph
of beauty. He groaned in sleepless agitation. `
Accursed
be the day,' he said, `when these fascinating
white men first appeared in our valley!' Then
another
thought came over his mind. `They call us
savages. Why not show ourselves so? Why not
persuade
my mother, and through her my father, to
expel
them at once from our country? Or if they
refuse
to go, act the part of savages, which they assign
us, and kill them?' Better and nobler thoughts
replaced
these meditations; and his generous heart
recalled
all such unworthy measures. Besides, that, he
saw clearly, would incur her eternal hatred and
disgust
.
`Let her be happy,' he said. `Let the Master
of Life determine between us. I will show more
generous love. I will display more efficient power
to protect her and her father's family. I will make
her see that I deserve her love, and let the
Wacondah
decide the rest. Such were the final thoughts
of Areskoui, in view of the new guests, and the
expected
festivities of the morrow.
Nelesho retired from the abode of Elder Wood,
with a malignant and gloomy joy. Not, that he had
not seen with the same eyes with Areskoui. Not,
that his hate was not of a more depraved character.
Not, that he did not feel how the young warriors, and
himself among them, would compare with the new
visitants. But his jealousy and his hatred towards
Areskoui were of longer standing, and had deeper
and firmer hold of his thoughts. `No matter,' he
thought. `Areskoui will lose all chances of her love
and any thing would be tolerable, rather than see
her become the wife of Areskoui. I am ready to
thank the Wacondah for tortures, which he is obliged
to share with me.'
The factor and musicians, as they retired to spend
the night with Trader Hatch, the publican of the
village, discussed the beauty of Jessy Weldon, in the
VOL. I. 10
use of all their superlatives. The enchantment of
loveliness directed by intelligence, and kindness, had
been cast, as a spell, even over the rough bosoms of
these mariners. Baptiste had never been in more
request, as Cicerone and interpreter. He had
partaken
liberally, too, of Trader Hatch's
l'eau de vie
, and
he had been complaisant and voluble to a charm.
Even the habitually pensive countenance of William
Weldon had caught the smile of hilarity, and the
electric sympathy of mutual pleasure. Yensi, to whom
savage life had never possessed charms, had been
transported this evening to a new world, and a new
order of things. Such were the men, whom she had
seen, and admired in her own country. Such was
the society, for which her daughter had been formed.
She drank in the words, as she was charmed with the
beauty of Julius. How exactly he was formed for
her dear daughter; and in the revival of her early
associations and remembrances, she invoked the
Universal
Tien, to incline the hearts of the two young
people towards each other; and that of her husband
to return to Macoa, the country of Julius.
Discouragement
came over her mind, as she remembered the
downcast looks of her husband, during the evening,
and imagined him giving himself up to see dark omens,
and anticipations of evil in this visit of the young
strangers.
What were the thoughts of Jessy Weldon, as she
retired to her bed? This evening had introduced her
to a new world, and a new order of realities instead
of ideal imaginings. Her innocent and joyous nature
saw good and happiness in every thing. Experience
of the deceptiveness of external show, an unhappy
power of piercing through appearances, and
interpreting
the real character and motive at the heart, had
not yet spoiled the painted vision of life, and replaced
its illusions by the sad reality. What a city of fairy
palaces arose in prospect before her. `This,' she
thought, `is existence. This is reality. This is
happiness
.
How little have I tasted yet!' She loved her
parents with all her heart. Elder Wood had at times
uttered words in his religious exercises, that had
softened
,
and affected her. Areskoui had sometimes
made a remark, or performed an action, that had
called
forth the admiration of the moment; and had given
her a transient impression, that it would not be
difficult
to love him. But here had been drawn forth a
long associated chain of sensations, that were either
born for the first time, or had hitherto slumbered.
Here her intellect had been easily, and delightfully
drawn out. Here were persons, in the same period
of life, with the same kind of training, with minds in a
temperament, by the unchangeable laws of nature, to
think the same thoughts, and weave the same dreams
with herself. For the first time she had felt her
thoughts anticipated; and perceived, that they, who
conversed with her, comprehended exactly what to
say, in order to give birth to the proper train of
thoughts on her part. Then she remembered the
charm of their civility, their deference, and the
homage
of their eye and manner! In books, and from
the conversation of her father, she had learned, that
men were addicted to flattery, and that there was no
necessary connexion between their words and
intentions
.
But there could be no deception in the bland
unction of such soft and flattering words, to which
look, manner and tone gave such unequivocal marks
of sincerity. Then she thought of the young chief,
the playmate of her early years, the nobleness of his
way of thinking, the energy of his mind, the charm of
his simple and natural figures, drawn direct from truth
and nature. She had seen the paleness, that crossed
his brow that evening. She understood, what he had
felt, and what he had suffered; and pity began to
predominate
.
Her father depended on him, and,
probably
,
wished, that she might be united to him. Here
the dreadful word `
savages
' came over her thoughts.
Savages! She felt the import of the word as strongly,
as if she had been educated in the most polished
society
.
Though reared among them, she felt that she
was not of them, and that there was little more
sympathy
between her and them, than with the lower
orders of being.
Then a sketching of to-morrow's festival floated
through her mind. She was to accompany these
strangers to the Indian sports, and the great
solemnity
of the Salmon spearing. They would see the
dances
,
hear the whoops, witness the extreme rudeness of
the savages, among whom she had been reared, and
where she had received all her ideas! There was
humiliation
in the thought; and she was exactly aware,
how they would view all this matter. To
counterbalance
this thought, she endeavored to recall their
respectful words and actions. She should carry there
the same person to renew the same claims upon their
continued respect. The transition was natural, to
busy her thoughts, and task her invention, touching
the dress, that would be most calculated to concur
with her appearance, to prevent their remembering,
where she had been brought up. `They shall see,'
she thought, as this subject floated through her mind,
`they shall acknowledge, that I am not an Indian girl,
at least in the taste and arrangement of my dress.'
It required less, than her native quickness of
apprehension
to foresee, that her predicament, and that of
her father's family, was one of extreme delicacy for
right management. It had often occurred to her, that
the very existence of her family, depended upon the
good will of Ellswatta and Josepha, and that this was
suspended, as a matter of course, upon that of
Areskoui
.
She reposed much upon the magnanimous
forbearance
of the young chief. But would it always
triumph? Would not jealousy finally vanquish it, as
it became more and more excited by comparison with
these strangers? She had noted him that very
evening
,
struggling with the risings of his spirit. She was
painfully aware, notwithstanding the long season of
tranquility, that had passed over the tribe, how their
singular government was exposed to sudden storms
and a fierceness of popular fury, that swept every
thing before it, with the besom of destruction. Fatal
riots and insurrections were but too recent events in
the history of the tribe. She felt, in common with her
mother, the utter insecurity of things, where there
were no fixed laws. She had often heard her father
and Ellswatta express fearful surmises, that the
Shienne
meditated a revolt, through the instrumentality
of Nelesho. The laboring and thoughtful
countenance
of her father, during the highest hilarity of the
evening, was to her an ominous token, that he saw
harbingers
of coming storms.
She had thrown herself upon her bed, to court
sleep. But these, and a thousand undefined and
agitating
subjects of reflection, passed over her mind, like
gleams of lightning upon the summer clouds. Sleep
fled from her eyelids. She opened her window, that
looked out upon the pine tops, in which the night
breeze was swelling, and sinking away, in strains, that
inspired `solemn thought and heavenly musing.' The
breath of spring came fresh from the flowering forests
and valleys. The trees scintillated with millions of
fire flies. On the peaks of some of the mountains in
view, the unmelted snows of ages glistened in the
moon-beams; and the moon was half obscuring her
enlarged and crimsoned disk behind the mists, that
curled in prodigious folds, as they sprang up from the
mountain tops. The nightingale sparrow sang its
little
dirge in the adjoining tree. The loons screamed
10*
on the river; and the far roar of falling mountain
streams, swollen with the melting ice of spring,
discoursed
deep and hollow notes amidst the stillness of
night. In the dome of the firmament, clouds more
etherial than the muslins of India, were rolled, mass
over mass, showing a few stars beyond them. As she
sat at the window, inhaling the aroma of spring, and
contemplating this magnificent night scene, and
reflected
,
that a new leaf in the great volume of life was
just unfolded for her reading, religious awe came upon
her. `Oh,' she said, `that I could foresee the hidden
future.' Dear parents, doubtless ye sleep.
Venerable
servant of God, thou too, art at rest, unconscious,
that such thoughts could ever have floated through the
mind of one, to whom you have shown fatherly
kindness
.
`But Thou,' she said, as she looked beyond the
clouds, `Thou slumberest not, neither sleepest;' and
her young heart deeply, and confidentially
communed
with the best of beings; and the result of that
communion
was, that she slept after it profoundly, until
morning.
The expected morning, that was to usher in the
first festival day of a similar character, that had ever
been witnessed by the white and red men in the
valley
of the Shoshonee, arose upon the dark green
solitudes
,
in the splendor of a cloudless May day. The
cool breath of the south only breezed from the
direction
of the Pacific, and came charged with the
delightful
coolness of the sea, and the blended odours,
which it had taken, in passing over a hundred leagues
of plains covered with flowers. Fleecy wreaths of
clouds, spread at intervals over all the hemisphere,
just tempered the radiance of the morning and the
glow of the sun to a voluptuous softness of light. The
air, which gently rustled the tender and not fully
formed leaves, had a feeling of blandness, that can
only be known by sensation. When it swelled a
little
,
the dew fell as rain drops from every leaf.
Animated
nature felt all the charmed influence of
morning
and spring. The birds trilled their long drawn,
half gay, half plaintive songs, as if languid from the
excess of the inspiration of the new born day. The
bees shook the dew drops from the cups of the
flowers
,
as they closed their hum of approach and entered,
bending down the cups to plunder from the gaudy
cells their nectar. The snows and ices of the ancient
mountains, lighted up by the brilliance of a morning
sun, glittered with a gorgeousness of gold and
crimson
,
to which all the magnificence of an oriental
palace
is but a feeble imitation. The dogs were
baying
on the sides of the mountains, inviting their
masters
out to hunt. The domestic animals vied with
the tenants of the branches in notes of joyousness.
Every thing in which was the breath of life, felt the
call of a spring morning to rejoice.
Such was the time, in which the family of William
Weldon, accompanied by Elder Wood, and Jessy,
adorned in the dress which had been selected in her
night meditations, brushed away the dews of morning
from their path, as they set forth to meet the new
guests of the valley at the house of Trader Hatch.
The square and ruddy cheeked Dutchman and his
Indian wife were in readiness to receive them, and
they were ushered into a large apartment, which
served
various uses. In winter divine service was
performed
there. At all times, except during the Sabbath, it
was a store, a tavern and an eating hall. It was
plaistered
,
and painted in front, and like the abode of
William
Weldon, the roof was the arching vault of
nature's
masonry in everlasting stone; and the wall in
the rear was formed in the same way. It was
commodiously
fitted up with benches and chairs, covered
with skins, and all arranged with especial reference
to Indian ideas of taste, comfort and utility. Hatch
welcomed them in the best style of his people in New
York. The young men came forward, and paid the
compliments of the morning. Neither they nor
Jessy
felt, as often has happened in such cases, that the
highly colored imaginings of the night ended in
disappointed
convictions of illusion in the morning.
Neither
abated aught of what they had thought of each
other, when seen by the glare of artificial light of the
evening before. Jessy, glowing with the excitement
of the occasion and the influence of youth and spring,
was dressed in a green Chinese silk, of the texture of
those dresses, intended for the daughter of a
Mandarin
,
and such as would have been worn by her
mother
in her own country. Her fawn skin sandals had
been wrought with a care and art of mixing different
colors of feathers and porcupine quills with the
interwoven
ornaments, which had cost Josepha many an
anxious day. Her flowing curls were adorned with
just opening rose buds, which seemed to have
imparted
their coloring to her cheeks, their dew to her
lips, and their brilliance to her eyes. The young
strangers, refreshed from the fatigues of their
journey
,
not by repose, but by having talked of the fair
girl through the night, and dressed with particular
care, showed not less attractions in the severe
scanning
of sun light, than they had the evening before.
Ellswatta, his wife, and three of the leading chiefs of
the Shoshonee and Shienne, and the young chiefs,
Areskoui and Nelesho, were also there, with
countenances
indicating either pensiveness or dissatisfaction;
though each, without any faltering of bashfulness,
advanced
to offer Jessy the customary morning
salutations
of their people.
Breakfast being announced, a long grace was said
by Elder Wood; and all the guests were socially
arranged
at a table, where coffee and tea, and salmon
and wild fowls and venison and various vegetables,
cakes and pies, were served up, after the most
approved
cookery, that could result from the united
experience
and mother wit of Trader Hatch and his
Indian
wife. The restraint, imposed by the presence
of such a mixed assemblage of guests, prevented any
other intercourse, than the common civilities; and
any other reflection, than admiration in view of the
stern and silent propriety of deportment manifested
by the Indian guests.
From the breakfast table they adjourned to the
council house, into which they were introduced with
the wonted ceremony by Ellswatta. Every portion
of it was hung with ever greens and flowers. The
council fire blazed in the centre. A medicine circle
was drawn round the fire, within which sat Ellswatta
at the head of the council chiefs. The war chiefs,
painted, and dressed in their gayest, sat below them.
Areskoui wore a costume compounded, like his blood,
of Spanish and Shoshonee. A certain paleness of
evident, though suppressed emotion, imparted to
him such an interest, so well sustained by his
picturesque
dress, that Jessy, as she glanced a look upon
him, internally remarked, that she had never seen him
to so much advantage. And beneath, she thought,
there is a noble heart too. She drew a deep and
painful
sigh, as she compared this untrained son of the
forest
with Julius, in all the pride of beauty, and all the
elegance of a countenance exactly matched to his fine
person. She glanced a comparing look, too, upon the
other. In the countenance of Frederic, along with
the reserve and sternness, there was a moral interest,
that elicited curiosity.
Outside of the medicine circle the Shoshonee and
Shienne, young and old, male and female, to the
number
of thousands, were congregated, and filled the
council house, and all the green area about it. The
tents of the tribes, on this festival, had all been
removed
to the lower terrace about the council house,
and afforded a spectacle at once unique and
impressive
.
They were, as has been remarked, circular,
composed of buffalo robes, or beautifully fabricated
of rushes. The women were universally habited in
their best. Every one, who could afford it, wore a
belted cloth petticoat, either of scarlet, or blue. The
unmarried girls were painted high with rouge of red
lead and vermilion. The married women had the
compartments of red, marked with blue, and here and
there, a supplementary line of Chrome yellow. In
the intervals of the paint, on their clear, burnished,
copper cheeks might be seen the native flush of
youthful
expectation. The tall, clean-limbed urchin boys
displayed their bare shoulders and breasts, painted
blue. Most of them carried a bow and quiver,
gracefully
hung over their shoulders. Half a dozen
favored
sons of chiefs, or richer warriors, carried
yagers
.
The old men wore the medicine festival paint,
vermilion and pale green, emblems of peace and joy.
The Russian captain was dressed in his proper
costume
of office, and the flag of his nation waved, in
union with the stars and stripes, under the shade of a
noble sycamore, just on the verge of the Sewasserna.
The musicians wore a badge, and sat on a raised turf
seat in the shade, without the council house. When
all were hushed to silence and expectation, Josepha,
in a gorgeous, half Spanish, half Indian dress,
preceded
Yensi and her daughter into the council house;
and the general buz of delight and affectionate
greeting
of her, whom they called Wakona, showed not
only the deep Indian homage to beauty, but
intimated
a still deeper regard for her virtues.
As soon as his wife, Yensi and her daughter were
seated, Ellswatta came forward, threw his robe from
his muscular right arm, and with an attitude of calm
dignity addressed a short harangue to the assembled
tribe. `My red children,' he said, `we are met to feast,
and bless the Master of Life. Twelve moons have
seen the passing away of maize, flowers, and snow;
and the moon of green leaves, and the period to spear
the salmon in honor of the Wakondah has returned
once more; and as soon as the stars of evening are in
the sky, we mean to celebrate it. The Master of Life
has thrown peculiar light upon this day. Our
brethren
of the pale face have come up our great rivers,
from the setting sun, and the shore of the boundless
salt lake. We bless the Wakondah, that he hath sent
themthat his own breeze blew them against the
current
that
grass and flowers sprang up beneath their
feetand that their fair young men have brought
hither words and thoughts of peace. They will first
smoke the calumet, then taste our salmon and
venison
.
They will speak good words about their red
brethren, when they are far away in their own
country
,
and when they are grey, they will talk of this day
to their children. We salute them. Let us bind them
to our hearts by the chain of peace. We invite them
to eat our strawberries, look upon the fair valleys,
that enclose the bones of our forefathers, and be
present
at our great salmon festival. While they are
here, may our daughters smile upon them. When
they go, may the Master of Life shine upon them in
a clear sun, and blow upon them in the breeze of the
mountains, to waft them back to their friends. Let no
sounds, but those of peace, meet their ears; and when
their children meet ours in this valley, may they smoke
the calumet, after we shall have gone to the sunny
mountains of the land of spirits, and say `our fathers
did so before us. The calumet was then passed
round, and the stranger guests each smoked a few
whiffs in turn. Ellswatta afterwards announced, that
the festival was begun.
Instantly such a long, loud and continued cry of
joy was raised by the whole multitude, without and
within, as reverberated back from the ancient
mountains
.
Repeatedly, the shout rose and sunk away,
and the deep notes of the kettle dance rung from a
thousand voices. Whence is the impression, that the
united voices of the multitudes, in their festivals, loud,
shrill, discordant, though they may be, thrills the
heart, and produces a feeling of the sublime? The
men of all ages have felt, and later times have
explained
it, in saying, `that the voice of the people is
the voice of God.' The young strangers forgot, that
the people were called savages. They had united
their power and their voices; and their deep song
raised
in the hearts of these foreign guests a feeling of awe
and respect. At a pause in the song, a thousand
yagers
were discharged. When the explosion was
passed, at the request of Ellswatta, the band played
a march; and the electric effect, in its mysterious and
sympathetic influence, which is found to operate
deeply
even upon the lower orders of animal life, had its
full impression upon those sons of the forest. The
warriors formed into small circles, and began to dance
with the wonted Indian vehemence. Four aged
chiefs, surrounded by as many medicine men, most
fantastically dressed, beat their drums, moving
their heads in time, and uttering in cadence a low
guttural note or two, at every beat of the drum.
Their countenances wore an invincible and religious
gravity; while the dancing warriors laughed, as if in
convulsions; and the young women, though they
joined
not in the dance, chimed in a note or two at the
close of each strain of the song, and clapped their
hands, and cheered the dancing warriors. Such was
the extent of the hilarity and jubilee, that even the
thousand Indian dogs, that sat beyond the circles of
the dance, raised their sharp and bristled noses, and
barked in concert.
Areskoui and Nelesho necessarily headed the
dances
of the select warriors; and the white inhabitants
of the valley, and the strangers, were invited to walk
round, and survey the several groups, both within and
without the council house. Elder Wood and
Baptiste
named to them the several chiefs and warriors,
their standing, influence and achievements; and
Baptiste
,
in particular, went into the history of the young
women, their loves, and the matrimonial alliances,
that were on the tapis; and in the course of his long
and fluent colloquy, it became an obvious fact, that
there was as much gossip and scandal, as much
incident
,
and as deep an impression, that the events here
taking place, and about to take place, were the most
important, that had been, or would be; as if it all
belonged to a civilized, and not a savage community.
During these promenades, the young strangers and
Jessy began to acquire that tone of intercourse, which
resulted from their having a position that gave
decorum
to a familiarity, which they would not have
meditated
,
or Jessy allowed, had not her parents been
present, to see, but not to hear. Under such
circumstances
,
conversation between persons of such an age
soon becomes confidential. The strangers, in half an
hour after the babbling Baptiste had left them to
themselves
,
had already begun to discuss their modes of life,
their pleasures, the cities where they had been born,
and educated; what were the pleasures and shows
and amusements, the splendor of the dresses of the
ladies, the balls, masquerades, and theatrical
entertainments
,
the operas and concerts, the literary
pursuits
and fashions, the famous blue stocking ladies
in short, a panorama of the distractions and
enjoyments
of the great world. Half a dozen times, they
had verged to the point of hinting at the necessary
comparative barrenness and monotony of a life, spent
among rocks and mountains, with no other changes
VOL. I. 11
than those of the seasons, and no other companions
than the Shoshonee, and no other spectacles but such
as these. Though Jessy sometimes replied to them,
and with great discretion and propriety, and at times
threw into her comments upon their accounts of their
country and hers a considerable degree of arch irony,
her general purpose was to hear, rather than answer;
and to call them out, and learn their leading
impressions
;
and if they had character, to satisfy herself
what it was.
Thus passed away the hours of the kettle song and
dance, which could have very little interest for any
but Indians, after the first inspection. To an
enquirer
,
touching the import and origin of the Indian
religious
rites and ceremonies, it would be a spectacle of
pleasure; for to him it would have explained many
of their mysteries of worship; and would have thrown
strong light upon their manners. But for the two
young gentlemen, nothing would have offered
sufficient
excitement to have turned their attention for a
moment from the chief object of their pursuit,
unwitnessed
,
and unmolested conversation with Jessy.
Captain Wilhelm, indeed, had found one of the
prettiest
of the young Indian girls, disposed to smile upon
him; and Baptiste, who generally carried on some
little sub-plots for his own especial behoof, was
willing
to turn aside from them, to show his consequence,
by acting as interpreter between Captain Wilhelm
and his inamorata. Each of the musicians, too, had
found Indian damsels, not disposed to be disdainful.
Trader Hatch was, all the while, arranging his plans,
and driving his bargains, at one of those opportune
occasions, that brought so many of his debtors and
customers together. Elder Wood was more
worthily
,
and appropriately engaged, in conversing with the
few persons of the tribes, who had manifested some
excitement, or interest in relation to the subjects of
his ministry. All the chiefs and warriors had their
official functions in the ceremonies, from which they
could not be spared a moment. Josepha and Yensi
wandered about together, the one entering with all
her heart into ceremonies, which had from long habit
as deep an interest in her thoughts, as though she had
been born a Shoshonee. Yensi watched the
countenance
of her daughter, as it kindled with the delighted
influence of such associates and conversations. Even
Josepha, thoughtless as she was, and occupied with
the present, could not prevent feeling a pang of
jealousy
,
as she compared the present intercourse
between
Jessy and the young gentlemen, with that,
which she had so often witnessed between her and her
son. Alas! Poor Areskoui, she thought, this bodes
no good to his hopes of gaining the ultimate affection
of the Wakona.
The dinner was given by Ellswatta; but he had had
all the counsel and assistance of Yensi and her
domestics
.
The table was spread under the shade of
the huge sycamore. It was a long line of raised
benches, covered with neat painted rush matting.
Sod seats were raised for the whites, and the
stranger
guests; and they were literally strewed with roses.
The white guests were served from China, and the
Indians with wooden trenchers, such as had been
used among them from time immemorial. Every
luxury
,
that the valley could supply, was upon it. Meats,
salmon, broths, pies and puddings, prepared in Yensi's
kitchen, were there to profusion. More than all, there
was `London Particular' from the cellar of Trader
Hatch. The dinner was not only substantial, but
magnificent; and it was contrived, that the valley
flower sat between the young gentlemen, and
Captain
Wilhelm near his elected damsel. The
musicians
stood, and played awhile, to the great delight
of the Indians, and then sat down with the rest. The
whole group, dining together under such
circumstances
of novelty and interest, would have formed a fine
subject for a painter. The young gentlemen were
lavish in all the customary civilities of the table;
conversed
with Jessy in half whispers, not unfrequently
put to the blush by the felt superiority of the
intelligence
and ready irony of her remarks. Areskoui and
Nelesho contemplated from their assigned point of
the table, with what satisfaction they might, her
frequent
smiles and blushes, and the visible and
sparkling
delight of her countenance. William Weldon,
alone, of all the group, sat silent and thoughtful, and
as though afraid to indulge in joy.
After dinner, war and medicine dances were
exhibited
.
War and death songs were sung. The
Indians
then displayed their astonishing dexterity at the
game of Indian ball. In another place they were
shooting at a target with their yagers; and the
younger
Indians put forth the inconceivable sureness of their
mark in trials of archery.
Enough of spirits had been distributed, to excite
merriment, and banish that moodiness, which would
have ensued, had there been an entire interdiction.
Ellswatta had so well taken his precautions, that no
person could be seen intoxicated. The plain
presented
the fairest sample of the joyous hilarity of the red
men. Some were sauntering and singing beside the
stream. Others were stretched in pairs on the grass,
conversing together. The aged parents surveyed
their children with a look of ineffable satisfaction.
The strangers felt, as if transported to a new world,
and Arcadian scenes.
The rays of the declining sun abated of their
fervor
,
before they went forth to the Strawberry prairie.
Ellswatta and Josepha led the way; and the white
guests were mixed with the red people, as they
dispersed
over the reddened surface. The large and
delicious strawberries for a while occupied them, to
the exclusion of other matter of interest. But
Areskoui
devised the means to draw the daughter of Yensi
apart from the rest, and the following conversation
ensued. `I well know,' said Areskoui, `that in
separating
thee from the two handsome strangers, I am
giving thee pain. It is not with such intent, as thou
wilt believe, that I have sought for a moment, to
speak to thee alone. Thou hast seen me suffer, and
thou well knowest, that it is not a slight suffering, that
will make itself visible in my countenance. I had
determined
to be silent, but I am weak from the share
of the blood of the pale face in my veins. I could not
endure to see thee giving up thy whole thoughts to
these acquaintances of a day. Thou hast taught thy
ignorant brother thyself, that beauty is not of the
face or the form. Will these fair strangers vie with
me in courage? Would they sooner suffer and die
for thee? On thy fair forehead is painted the joy,
with which their flattering speeches fill thy mind.
But can they love, as I do, who have loved from the
first hour, in which I had memory? Art thou sure,
that these men are good and true, and speak only the
thing, that is? Thy parents belong to these valleys.
Will either of them share this solitude with thee; or
wilt thou leave thy parents to follow them to the world
of the pale face? In a few days they will be gone.
Will they return for thee, as the birds come back with
the spring to seek the bowers and the nests of the
past year? Oh! that the Master of Life had walled
up these valleys with battlements to the clouds against
the approach of these flattering pale faces, who will
steal from thy heart any remaining kindness, thou
mightest once have felt for thy brother. Would, that
the Wahcondah might strengthen me to triumph over
these thoughts that burn within my bosom, and to
look up to that land of souls, where thy medicine man
11*
declares, there is the only resource of the wretched.'
She was at once affected and rebuked with the
justice
of the charge. But, she gently parried the
complaint
.
`Didst thou not promise me,' she said, `that
thou wouldst not annoy me again with such language?
Do not the tenants of the air and of the plains consort
with those of their kind? Findest thou not thy pride
and pleasure, in being the chief of these red people?
Why shouldst thou not find it natural, that I should
not rudely avoid the converse of these sons of my own
race? Will it comfort thee to be assured, that I know
not of love, except for my parents, and my Creator?
It was thy generous forbearance, and thy self-control,
which taught me respect for thee. Thou must
continue
it, or that respect will cease. I request thee, to
view the visit of these strangers, as I do, with
pleasure
.
I well know, that they will leave us after a few
days, and we shall return to our former course of life
and their coming among us will be, as though it had
not been.'
`Could it be so,' he replied, `I should again think
of happiness. But do not I know, that this fatal visit
has forever dispelled all chance, that thou shouldst
regard me and my people, except with disgust and
aversion? Accursed be the day, that gave me life,
partly of the red race, to be the object of thy dislike,
and yet with the spell of the pale face upon me, to
love thee, were it even unto death. Were I not born
chief, thou couldst not hinder, that I would not have
followed thee to the cities of thy people, where I
would have learned their ways, and have rendered
myself worthy of thee. But the Wahcondah has not
only formed me of the red race, and made me a chief,
but he has given me the heart and the purpose of a
chief, and I feel, that I may not leave my duties. It
would kill my parents, to say our son was given by
the Wahcondah, to soar, like the eagle, in the flight
of his forefathers, and he has made his nest in the grass,
like a sparrow. Oh! my sister, that thou couldst love
these mountains, as the birds do the groves, in which
are their nests; and that thou couldst find pride in the
affection of the young chief, instead of that of the
perfidious
strangers, who come here only to disturb our
repose.'
`I implore thee, chief,' she replied, `to banish these
dark thoughts forever from thy mind. Be content
with the same kind feelings from the daughter of
Yensi
,
which thou hast always shared. Do I not
remember
,
that my parents owe their home and protection
to thy father? Need I be reminded, that thy
influence
might have been exerted against both the
parents
and the daughter; and that, sojourning among a
people, who have no other law, than the will of their
chief, we owe every thing to thy noble forbearance?'
`Ah, Wakona,' he rejoined, `I see the hateful images,
that are in thy breast. Thou viewest us as lawless
and fierce animals of the forest; and thou art grateful,
that we do not, like them, tear, and devour.
Knowest
thou not, that of all people, the red men are first
to hold thy race inviolate, and as sacred and medicine
things? It is no virtue, but the immemorial custom
of our race, so to regard thine. Beware of Nelesho.
But I swear to thee, that thy brother would burn at
the slow fire, sooner than obtain aught of favor from
thee through fear, or in any way, except from thy free
thoughts. I will prove to thee, that in forbearance,
and self-mastery, the pale face has yet to learn of us.
One only violence, Wakona, will I practise on thee.
I know, that thou hast an eye to see, what is great and
glorious. These flattering strangers may smile, and
flatter, and dazzle thee with the arts and manners of
their cities. But I will compel thee, my sister, to see,
that in stern truth, in noble daring, and resigning
every
thing for the love of thee, they shall not be able to
compete with the son of Ellswatta.'
In conversations, like these, Jessy had
imperceptibly
led the way to rejoin their parents and the
strangers
.
All had feasted to satiety on the rich fruit, that
so covered the prairie, that it seemed another layer
of purple flowers beneath the upper stratum of
flowers
and grass. The young warriors, and their girls,
intermixed with the foreign guests, were engaged in
the last scene of the entertainment. The plain echoed
with their shouts of laughter, as each, in frolic
violence
,
was painting the face of the other with the
crimson of the rich berries. All faces were soon alike
red. Some of the Indian girls, most intimate with
Jessy, were approaching to rouge her fair cheeks in
the same way. To avoid the custom-honored
violence
,
she took of the large and almost melting fruit,
and soon was as highly rouged, as the rest, while the
mountains echoed with the acclamations and shouts
of laughter. `You see,' said Jessy to the strangers,
`how cheaply we make ourselves happy.' Meanwhile,
it was a kind of Indian Saturnalia, in which the
usages
of the people dispensed with their customary
reserve
and taciturnity. That white guest was either
awkward or unfortunate, who had not his romping
Indian girl, sufficiently disposed to save him the
trouble
of making advances. Not one of the visitants
from Astoria had reason to complain, or wear a
willow
.
Baptiste, who acted as a kind of master of
ceremonies
,
was interpreter between the two races, and
continually in employment. Never had he appeared
a personage of so much consequence, or capered with
so much elasticity. Elder Wood bore a grave, and
William Weldon a sad, countenance, through the
whole scene. Julius and Frederic surveyed the plain
covered with these savage Arcadians, so joyous,
apparently
so gentle and courteous, and in admiration
of the freshness and novelty of the picture, expressed
regret, that they had not been born to a partnership
in the joys of this happy valley.
It need not be remarked, that much was said in
this interview, that was appropriate in that place, which
would have little interest, when separated from the
circumstances, which gave it value. The two young
strangers seemed the most limited of any of their
company
in range. For, avoiding all advances from the
Indian girls, they confined themselves assiduously to
Jessy, around whose steps constantly hovered not
only
her parents, and those of the two young chiefs, but
Areskoui and Nelesho themselves. The countenance
of the former was thoughtful; of the latter decidedly
stern and proud. Nor was it among the least of their
vexations, that the young strangers could carry on a
conversation with Jessy in English, not a word of
which they could understand, and the meaning and
purport of which they could only divine by the effect
upon the countenance of the parties.
After expressing themselves with youthful and
somewhat extravagant enthusiasm, in regard to the
pleasures of the strawberry party, they turned the
conversation upon the amusements and pursuits of the
great world, in which they had lived. Julius
Landino
,
though born in Macoa, had resided both in
London
and Paris. He discussed these places, as one, who
had many masonic words, intelligible only to the
initiated
.
Through all his affected humility, Jessy failed
not to perceive, with something like pique, that he
strongly felt, that they were to be pitied, as ignorant
of true enjoyment and of all grace and polish, who had
not been trained in these places. Frederic, with real
modesty, brought forward the humbler pretensions of
Boston, New York and Philadelphia, the most
considerable
cities, in which he had sojourned. Each put
forth his most ambitious eloquence to place the
attraction
of these places in their fairest light, and in
their strongest contrast with the solitude, wildness,
and rude features of the scene before them. They
admitted the grandeur and the charms of the
Shoshonee
valley, and declared themselves happy and
abundantly compensated in having visited it. They
hinted with as much address, as they could command,
at the witchery of one of the spells of the valley, which,
they expressed their apprehensions, they should never
be either able, or disposed to cast off. But the drift
of their conversation evidently had for object, to
render
her dissatisfied with her abode in such a place, by
painting the superior pleasures and advantages of
social
life. In an under tone, not to be heard by her
parents, they expressed the utmost astonishment, that
a family, which, they understood, had such ample
means of returning to society, should choose to lead
an obscure and lonely existence in such a place. They
spoke alternately; the one resumed the conversation,
as the other paused. They did not fail finally to add
ironical hints, that the daughter might not possibly be
without a motive, in having an election before her
between
two such fine fellows, as the young chiefs.
Areskoui observed, that her countenance was here
marked with irrepressible dissatisfaction; and
perceived
,
that they had in some way harped a grating
string. With affectionate earnestness, he requested
her to translate what they had said, in his own speech.
She told him, it was impossible. `See then,' said he,
`Wakona, the difference between the talks of the white
and red people. Have I ever said a word to thee,
which thou mightest not at once convey to these pale
faces in their own tongue?'
In reply to the strangers, she remarked, that she
owed no thanks for the rude allusion, with which they
had closed; nor could she see kindness in an effort to
render her dissatisfied with the residence, which
providence
had assigned her. `Of the millions,' she
continued
,
`who dwell on the earth, what the bible calls
the bounds of their habitation seem to be fixed almost
without their consent, and by circumstances beyond
their control. I have here before me sublime views,
an imposing and beautiful nature, a happy valley, a
commodious dwelling, ample range of books, dear
parents
,
and a simple, ancient and affectionate people,
the study of whom is by no means destitute of
interest
.
All my humble wishes have hitherto been
bounded
by this vale. It is not your part to ask, what
circumstances have fixed us here. It is sufficient for
you to know, that they are such, as will not be likely
to change. For one at least of the young chiefs, I
may be allowed to say, in answer to your polite
insinuation
,
that I have no doubt, that multitudes of the
young men in the great cities, where you have
resided
,
might learn not only courage and truth, but even
gentlemanly feeling from him.'
`Rose of the prairie,' said Areskoui, as he noted
the sparkling of her eye, `what sayest thou. I beseech
thee, declare it in my speech.'
`They would tell me,' she answered, `that there is
no true joy, but in the polished cities of the white
people. I have told them, that I am happy here, and
find sufficient objects of interest to satisfy all my
desires
.
I have told them too, son of Ellswatta, that
thou art generous and noble in thy nature.'
Tears rushed to the glistening eyes of the young
chief. Pride struggled with love, as he seemed in
search of the way, in which to manifest his gratitude
to her. The polished young men stood rebuked
before
this noble, who had his patent from nature.
`Fair sons of the pale face,' he said, as Jessy
translated
,
`I keep kind thoughts of you in my bosom; for
Wakona is of your race. We have invoked the
Master
of Life, to bestow good things upon you. Our
chiefs have smoked with you the calumet of peace;
and we have spread before you, of the best, that we
have to impart. If ye would return our kindness, by
stealing away the heart of Wakona, or rendering her
dissatisfied with her residence among the red people,
who cherish her, as a daughter of the Great Spirit, I
can only declare to you, that the red men do not so
requite
the hospitality, which they have received.'
There was a noble simplicity and force of truth in
the words and gestures of the young chief, that added
grace invincible. Jessy blushed of course, as she
rendered
his energetic compliment into English; smiling
as she told them, that the first duty of a translator was
fidelity to the meaning. The occasion was
opportune
,
for expressing the apologies of the young
strangers
,
which they did by declaring, that they were
most thankful for the hospitalities, which had been
shown them, and entertained the kindest and most
respectful feelings towards the young chief. He must
excuse them, if they could not but feel some envy in
view of the incomparable gem of the valley. [Here
Jessy refused to translate, as pretending not to
understand
.]
They were ready to ask pardon, if they had
given the slightest unintentional offence. A
reconciliation
ensued, like the contests of lovers, only
rendering
the subsequent intercourse more cordial. The
young chief shook hands with them in token of
reconciliation
.
His brow relaxed, and all seemed forgotten.
A delightful conversation ensued; and Jessy,
notwithstanding
she had rebuked the strangers, keenly
felt, that the converse, alternately witty, and tender,
affectionate and polite, now narrative, and then
description
,
of these intelligent and graceful young men,
was a treat, as high, as it was new. Young hearts
involuntarily open to the delights of such intercourse.
Delightful associations with that society, to which
they belonged, clustered about her imagination. The
manners of Julius, educated in Europe, possessed a
glittering artificial finish. All was cold, studied, and
for effect. The manners of the other had greater
plainness and simplicity, and struck more, the longer
they were observed. To compare, and discriminate
between them, soon became a study for Jessy. A
volume
would scarcely contain the conversation of this
strawberry party. Frederic declared, that he should
say to his companions on his return, that none, but
they who had been at the Shoshonee valley, could
know the luxury of strawberries. Julius, in phrase
more appropriate to his character, averred, that he
should say nothing of what he had seen and enjoyed,
through fear, that all the world would be tempted to
make the same discovery; and take from what he had
seen its delightful charm of privacy. Areskoui, on
his part, named the different grand peaks, that stood
forth before them in the blue of the firmament. This
one marked the scene of some memorable battle, or
incident in their history. Near the valley of another,
some of the bravest of his warriors had had contests
with the grizzly bear. One peak, pre-eminently high,
above the rest, was consecrated in the religious
feelings
of his tribes. It was a medicine mountain, and
supposed to be the favorite residence of `the little
white men of the mountains.'
The pleasant hours had elapsed, and the sun hung
over the verge of the mountains, though each, save
Areskoui, had they been able, would have suspended
the sign of day immovable in the firmament. They
were beginning sorrowfully to number the days of the
visit.
From the prairie of strawberries, they walked to
the banks of the Sewasserna, and found seats on the
flowering turf, whence they contemplated the scenes
of preparation going on over all the plain for the
great achievements of the evening. Every
individual
of both tribes, that was neither too old, too young,
or infirm to arrive there, was on the plain, which
literally
rung with the note of preparation. The young
VOL. I. 12
strangers remarked, that it seemed, as if the
mountains
and the woods only could have given birth to
the thousands, which were congregated. From this
spectacle, Areskoui called their attention to the
bosom
of the pellucid stream, on whose shores they sat.
The large salmon, that were to constitute the sport
of the evening, were seen in their brilliant colors,
either gliding from the shadow of the beholders under
the bank, or slightly moving their fins, and playing
with swallowing the passing motes. Some seemed to
be asleep in the sun beams. Some were moving in
one direction, and some in another. Some were
apparently
making love, and others battle; and in
whatever
direction those tyrants of the river moved, the
countless swarms of smaller fishes, in all the colors
of the bow, darted from their path, like gleams of light.
The sun was below the mountains; and the
cylindrical
curling of the mists from their summits, along with
the long parallel lines of red clouds, in which the sun
descended, betokened that a beautiful evening for the
contemplated sport, was drawing on.
The salmon spearing commenced not in form,
until
the first star was in the sky. Jessy requested the
party, meanwhile to accompany her to her favorite
and well known haunt, the `blue lake.' It was a little
distance from the west bank of the Sewasserna, and
its surface elevated two hundred feet above the level
of the river. Two enormous sycamores, that had
fallen
from either bank across the stream, and met in the
centre, formed a rustic bridge of the most perfect
security
for crossing. The parties crossed the stream,
traversed the vale, and ascended the craggy sides of
the mountain, until they arrived at the beautiful table
terrace, which nature had scooped out, as a vase for
the transparent little lake, that slept there. The lake
had its hundred traditions in Shoshonee story. A
despairing maiden had thrown herself from one of
the cliffs, that impended it, into its peaceful bosom.
It was half a mile in length, and of fathomless depth.
From its singular position on the side of the
mountain
,
by a curious and unexplained optical fallacy, it
showed the mountains, and the plains and the people
and the animals below grouped together, as in the
most polished mirror. The Indians looked down these
transparent depths in superstitious reverence, and
saw other suns and worlds, the creation of their own
excited imaginations, and they regarded the place
with awe, as a grand medicine, and the image of the
world of souls. Areskoui laughingly told them, that
it was the belief among his people, that whoever
looked into the depths, for the first time, saw the
image of the person, with whom the party was to
marry. This, of course, produced not a little
merriment
,
as the young men cautiously stepped up the
rocks, and looked over, insisting, that Jessy should
make trial of her fortune at the same time. She
de-clined
,
on the ground, that the charm only lasted for
the first look, and that she had made the experiment
a thousand times.
On the western shore of the blue lake, a singular
cascade, which showed at the distance where they
stood, like a broad, white silk ribband suspended in
the air, fell perpendicularly a thousand feet from the
cliffs above, into the lake. Jessy called them to her
grotto, where was the finest point of view, in which
to contemplate this grand spectacle. A beautiful
little arch, partly scooped out by nature, and partly
by the labor of Areskoui, under the cliffs, embowered
on three sides by bignonias and grape vine, on which
the humming birds were swarming, was called `
Wakona's
bower.' There were her drawing materials.
There were the books which she was reading at the
time. There, with the village, the smoke of her
father's
abode, the scenes of humble life on the plains,
and the grandeur of the everlasting mountains above
and the mimic paradise in the lake continually
under
her eye, she had spent many of her happiest days
alone. Areskoui showed them Wakona's bower
and the unrivalled beauty and repose of the place
might well call forth some of the exclamations of
delight
and surprize, with which the young men
regarded
it. Here the hollow roar of the wind in the
mountains
,
mingling with the unremitting dash of the
cascade
,
produced a harmony of tones, the character and
power of which no words could reach. Here she had
commenced her first efforts at imitating nature with
the pencil. The young gentlemen surveyed many of
her landscapes. As a copyist of nature, she could
have formed no other, than those, in which sublimity
and beauty were blended. The two guests vied with
each other in applauses and admiration of the genius,
imagination and power of the young and beautiful
artist
.
All their terms of connoisseurship were
exhausted
in pointing out the
virtu
and skill and richness of
the execution. In the course of this discussion, it
appeared
,
that both the young gentlemen were artists,
who had made respectable proficiency in this
delightful
pursuit. This circumstance at once induced
another tie of interest and community of feeling
between
them. As either of them had received much
higher aid from art and discipline, than herself, and as
she manifested stronger natural talent and
predilection
for the pursuit, each had a peculiar advantage in
the intercourse, and each received new ideas from the
views of the other. In this way a conversation,
inspections
and comparisons were introduced, which
detained
them, until a message came from her father to
summon them to supper.
The ceremonial on this occasion did not differ
materially
from those of breakfast and dinner, except that
the parties, now more acquainted, were throwing off
the restraint and distance of strangers. It will be
superfluous
to those, acquainted with Indian manners,
to remark, that each of the stranger guests, except
the two young gentlemen, who seemed solely devoted
to Jessy, were assiduously attended with store of
young women of the valley, who expected to
accompany
them to the show of the evening; and the voice
of shouting and laughter was heard; and the ancient
walls of the abode echoed from every side sounds of
hilarity and mirth.
From the table the parties walked to the
Sewasserna
,
on whose banks thousands of Indians were already
assembled. For a distance of a mile up and down
the river, brilliant streams of light arose from fat
splits of the pitch pine. Apart from the peculiar
circumstances
of the festival, such as its being a
Shoshonee
solemnity of the highest import, and that the
warrior
,
whoever he might be, who should take the largest
salmon of the evening, was by immemorial usage,
king of the wake, and was supposed to have peculiar
claims, and to lay a kind of charm upon the
unengaged
,
and marriageable girl, whoever she might be, at
at whose feet he should lay this prizeapart from
these circumstances, the fish to be taken this evening
were contracted to the visitants from Astoria upon
certain stipulated terms. A thrill of expectation and
excitement ran through the whole assembled
multitude
;
and here might be seen the natural impression
of festival solemnities, which had been time-honored
for unknown ages. A far greater number of Indians
were here, than the strangers had yet seen together.
We are so simply and naturally imitative and
sympathetic
,
that Jessy herself, with whatever associations
she generally thought of this people, caught the
enthusiasm
from the rest, and waited with a feeling,
which can only be known by sensation, for the
expected
sport. She failed not to hear from the young
12*
gentlemen abundance of remarks, intended to be
witty, touching the ceremony of laying the prize fish
at the feet of the lady love of the winner; and upon
the probability of her receiving this most flattering
mark of favor. She answered them, in the same tone;
and in the gay conversation, which ensued, brought
forth the long hoarded treasures of her youthful
meditations
,
of a life of reading and converse with nature,
of extraordinary endowments of talent, quickness and
sensibility. The young men saw, that she knew, in
this encounter of mind, to foil them at their own
weapons. They exchanged meaning glances, which
told delight and astonishment, not unmixed with
dismay
.
They would have shrunk from her with that
reluctance, with which most men contemplate learned
and talented women, had not the party been still more
beautiful, than talented; and had she not tempered
the brightness of intellectual display with a
playfulness
of voice and manner, a naivete of youthful
simplicity
,
a certain original and picturesque manner of
coloring her thoughts with words, which she had
acquired
from the modes of the Shoshonee, and the
scenes, amidst which she had been reared.
The last ruddy glories, which the sun had left
behind
him, in a golden set behind the western
mountains
,
had disappeared. The evening was warm, and
the atmosphere had a feeling of the breezy south. A
beautiful play of evening lightning flashed, like
prolonged
gold wires, across the whole western
hemisphere
.
In the cloudless blue of the zenith appeared
that host of stars, which announced, according to
usage, that the time to commence the sport had come.
The moon came up in her evening chariot, from
behind
the dark mountains of the east, to replace, with
beams more fitted for these solemnities, the departed
light of day. Her cool attendant breezes came with
her.
Ellswatta came forth from the council house,
habited
in his most splendid costume. As soon as he
appeared
,
on the margin of the river, the tumultuous
buzz of voices was as hush as death. He bared his
sineway arm, and raised it towards the sky. `The
evening has come,' he said, `the glorious evening of
the maize and salmon festival, those bountiful gifts of
the Master of Life. He hath sent us his moon over
the mountains. He hath kindled the stars in the sky.
He hath brought our white friends to join with us in
our songs and our joys. Let us bless the Master of
Lifeand, my red children, now rush into the stream.
Bring forth the salmon. Seek the first honor of the
greatest salmon, the next of the greatest weight, and
the last of the greatest number.'
At the word, every warrior of sure hand and foot, of
quick eye and strong purpose, rushed to the sport;
for to all others it was as dangerous, as it would be
unavailing. They formed into pairs, in which the
dearest friends, and those used to stand by each other
as friends in danger or in battle, rushed into the stream,
the one with a torch pan, full of burning splinters of
pine on his back, and the other equipped with a
simple
spear, not unlike the trident of Neptune. The
effect of this sudden and dispersed illumination was
inconceivable. The whole surrounding prospect with
all its scenery became a bright glare, in which every
object was distinctly visible. The effect upon the
opening verdure and the dark sides of the mountains,
compared with the pale gleams of the moon upon their
icy summits, was of incomparable grandeur. As soon
as the warriors had rushed into the stream, a general
rush of the assembled multitudes to the bank took
place, exhibiting an eagerness of interest, only second
to that, which belongs to the commencement of a
battle
.
While the warriors were struggling for foot-hold
in the almost icy waters, deeper in general than their
middle, and of a strong current, Jessy was relating to
the young gentlemen the origin, purpose, history and
circumstances of this ceremonial. To these Indians,
the Sewasserna was as the Ganges to the Hindoos, a
beneficent divinity, their path way to the sea, the
supply
of their waters, the home of their sea-fowl, the
liquid pastures of their fish, the nourisher of the
fertility
of the valley, and the embodied image of
usefulness
and beauty most deeply impressed on their
thoughts. Its crystal waters at this moment by the
glare of torches showed them the countless millions
of the finny tribe, that were making their way up the
devious stream to its most icy mountain source. The
stream was seen, too, in the light of producing at least
half the animal subsistence of the two tribes. The
spectacle, so contemplated, as Jessy remarked,
presented
the eager excitement of the Indians, on this
occasion
,
in a light neither unreasonable nor without
motives.
The young visitants declared, that they had never
contemplated so striking and interesting a spectacle.
`They could hardly believe,' they said, `that they
were looking on reality. The whole seemed to them
enchantment; and the vale and the mountains, and
the moon and stars, the men and women, as the
illusions
of magic.' They expressed complimentary and
poignant regrets, that they had not the requisite
experience
,
to enable them to plunge into the stream,
and take their chance for the prize with the rest.
Jessy gaily replied, `that whoever might have the
honor, that evening, of being elected lady-love by the
winner, she had no doubt, that the honored person
would receive it from the hand of an Indian, even
though they should have entered themselves as
competitors
.'
Meantime, the dashing of warriors in the stream,
the shouts of laughter or surprize, when a warrior, as
often happened, was borne down the current, the
cheering of friends, the sudden and spasmodic bound
in the water, the cries of pursuit, the leaping of the
large fish, thrown on the shore, presented a show of
mingled and indescribable interest. This was the
time, when a person acquainted with their manners,
as Jessy explained, might see the portraiture of their
strong nationality. The Shienne were observed to be
constantly consorting together, and aiding each other;
and when a larger fish was taken by either nation, the
cry of acclamation only arose from people of that
nation
.
Here, too, was an impressive display of the Indian
custom of sworn companionship and help to the last
between the pairs of warriors, who, when they pass
the solemnity of assuming arms, agree to subserve
each other's interest and glory, and stand by each other
even to death. The intimacy, thus induced, is like
that between members of the sacred band of Thebes.
An Indian, so allied, who should desert his friend in
the talons of a grizzly bear, or surrounded by a host
of enemies, would be considered, as having forever
dishonored his
totem
, and as a recreant to be ever after
abandoned to the infamy of having shown selfish
cowardice
.
The salmon of this river are of an uncommon size;
and swift and powerful in proportion to their
dimensions
.
Hence there is no inconsiderable danger, when
a fish of very great size and power is struck, that the
spear will be carried away by it, a loss disgraceful to
the loser, or that himself will be borne down the
stream into the deep water. These sworn friends,
fish, as has been seen, in partnerships. The one
bears the torches, and the other the spear. The
current
,
as was remarked, is powerful; and the stones
covered with a green and slippery moss. If the party
striking a fish, is borne by the fish with his spear into
the deep waters, the torch bearer throws his torch
pan on shore, and plunges in to help recover the spear.
Thus there is requisite in this fishery great muscular
strength, a keen discernment, and tact of experience,
and knowledge of the habits of the fish; and last of
all, unshrinking courage and firmness.
The visitants needed not magnify to their host the
unexampled interest and grandeur of this spectacle.
The stream, illuminated by innumerable moving
torches, became a wide crimson sheet, flashing with
diamond radiance, from the numberless ripples of its
current, in which the dark mountains with their rocks,
peaks, trees, and ices were gorgeously repainted in a
crimson ground. Not only the long and brilliant
salmon
,
darting like lightning from one covert to another,
were seen in the transparent water, but, by a curious
optical illusion, all the bright varieties of the finny
races
showed in their darting flight, reflected on the
green leaves of the trees. The large and full formed
foliage of the cucumber tree, in particular, showed
all these movements in the transparent waters, as
though each leaf had been a magic lanthern. The
young men, as they beheld, exclaimed in constant
astonishment
,
that nothing could compare with the
beauty of the Shoshonee fishery of salmon by
torch-light
.
The fish were leaping at every point along the
grassy shore; and few spearings recorded had
been more ample, or successful for the time. On
a given signal from Ellswatta, some yagers were fired,
and in an instant the dusky forms of the young
warriors
,
only covered to the loins with a kind of close
leathern pantaloons, were seen springing to the shore,
accompanied by their sworn companions, the torch
bearers. In a moment every thing was as hush, as
the grave. The eldest medicine man of the tribe
advanced
to the bank, and began a prayer to the
Master
of Life. He thanked the Wahcondah for the
pleasant evening, the fine promise of the green maize,
just sprung from the earth, for the abundant supply
of salmon, and for the fortunate spearing of this
evening
.
`Thou,' he continued, `Master of Life, hast
given us stream, fish, fowl, buffaloes, deer, the
sheltering
mountains and the fertile valleys, and all good
things for thy red children. May they be this night
magnified in the eyes of their guests of the pale face.
May the tree of peace, under which we have feasted
together, reach the clouds, and never wither.'
He ceased, and at Ellswatta's request, the band
struck up a loud and cheering march, and the united
acclamations of the whole assembled multitude rent
the sky, and came back broken into innumerable sharp
echoes from the mountains. When the band ceased,
the Indian maize song rang from the voice of every
man, woman and child. The burden of the song was
to this import.
The great Wahcondah gives us maize;
He fills the streams;
He gives us game;
He hears our praise with joy.
The deep chewonna! hah! hah! hum! the
invariable
Indian chorus, sounded loud and not unimpressive,
as it rang through the forests. The old medicine
men assembled round the drummers of the tribe; and
while they continued the monotonous chorus, and beat
upon their drums, the warriors again rushed into the
stream, and the spearing was renewed with
redoubled
eagerness. Some of the warriors were soon borne
down into the deep waters. Shouts of joy and
triumph
,
and cries for help, were mingled. One
collected
all his force, and putting his eye, his heart and
power to the stroke, darted his spear into the back of
a huge salmon, and instantly dived to bring it up to
the surface. In another place, one warrior, in the
eagerness
of his pursuit, ran upon another, and both
slipped, and sunk into the stream. Had it not been.
that the cheering and the shouts and the cries had
a general tone of hilarity and merriment, it might have
been deemed at a distance, the sound of two armies
engaged in battle. The dogs, in their sympathy with
their masters, sprang into the water, and were seen
diving down at the point, where the spear had been
struck. Shouts and acclamations of praise testified
of those, who manifested peculiar dexterity and
success
,
and, particularly, of those, who remained longest
under water. The banks were every where alive
with these large and powerful fish; and the torch
bearers were continually springing on shore, to keep
the piles of their companions separate from all others.
It excited frequent shouts among the people on the
banks, to see Baptiste in the water, and more noisy
and loquacious, if not more efficient than any other.
He was often under the water; but recovered himself
with great nimbleness, amidst bursts of laughter from
the beholders. So joyous was the effect of the
spearing
of the Frenchman, that even William Weldon was
heard to cry, excellent! excellent! in sympathy with
the rest. Elder Wood repeatedly showed the
movements
of Kentucky blood, clapped his hands, and said,
that `the sport was worthy of being canonical.' The
guests from Astoria had no need to feign the
semblance
of ecstacy; for their youthful admiration of
exciting
and dangerous sport partially transferred their
thoughts from Jessy. They sprang as nimbly, as the
Indians, when an unusually large fish was thrown out,
to learn, who had been the successful taker. They
even expressed surprise, while Josepha and Yensi
gave their whole interest to the spectacle, that Jessy
turned away with aversion from this scene of bustle
and shouting. When asked, why she alone appeared
not to partake the intense excitement of interest with
the rest, she answered, `that she had always
considered
it a sublime and striking spectacle, particularly
the reflection of the mountain and valley scenery in
the crimson waters, and the magic picture of the fishes,
the rocks and mosses on the leaves.' `But I cannot
forget,' she added, `that the sport, however
necessary
,
is purchased by agony and death. Can I avoid
seeing these fishes, so happy in their own element,
struggle, and agonize, when thrown, bleeding, and
wounded on the bank? Can I be blind to their spasms,
and their show of torture? Alas! that so much of our
enjoyment can only be purchased with misery!'
Frederic replied, that he had experienced at first,
and had often felt before, similar sensations; but that
he strove to overcome this sensitiveness; that since
such inflictions were necessary, it seemed right, that
they who were compelled to make them, should not be
conscious, or at least not painfully conscious, of the
suffering, they cause. Elder Wood, who listened to
the conversation, consented, that it was not right, to
indulge such feelings. He contended, that man had
a particular and special grant from the Almighty, in
the scriptures, so to make use of animals; and that
since such use was lawful, it ought to be resorted to
without pain. She answered, that for her it was
useless
to reason against feeling. She admitted, that
she had felt great pleasure in seeing them pleased;
that the scene, though no novelty to her, was one of
extreme intrinsic interest. She was delighted to see,
that they had by thus entering into the sport strongly
recommended themselves to the dwellers in the
valley
,
showing, that they took an interest in the simple
and cheap enjoyments of these children of nature.
A conversation, thus commenced, called off their
attention from the scene before them, and soon led to
points of confidential discussion, not unlike those,
which had been more than once agitated, during the
day. It turned once more on the regrets of the
VOL. I. 13
strangers that their stay in the valley must of
necessity
be so short. They wished, they never had come,
or could remain for life; or persuade her parents to
return with them to society. They added flattering
remarks, touching the conquest of hearts, that would
ensue on the one part, and the envy on the other, from
such a step.
People of such an age, and so circumstanced, know,
that such a conversation, which plays pleasantly on
the fancy, and draws lightly on the understanding,
half jest and half earnest, may be prolonged forever
with untiring interest. One compliment on the part
of the gentlemen provoked another; and one ironical
reply made room for another, and they were so
deeply
engaged in their discussions, that they forgot the
solemnity of the salmon spearing, and remembered
only their own share of enjoyment. Captain
Wilhelm
,
too, and the other portion of the party from
Astoria, had not been without their own individual
moiety of enjoyment. They had been pleasantly
occupied
with Indian belles, little afflicted with
bashfulness
or coyness, who knew not the oral language of
their admirers. But they proved merry and
communicative
by the Indian language of signs; and as the
German Wilhelm was a little merry, he handled his
fair one, bearing in her own language a name, which
imported `Spotted Turtle,' with very little ceremony.
The musicians following the example, solaced
themselves
with the smiles of their selected Indian girls,
each rouged to the last finish of vermilion.
The Indians, on ordinary occasions, are sober
observers
of early hours. On this annual solemnity, the
sport was prolonged, until near eleven at nightan
unusually late hour for that people. Ellswatta then
announced, that the spearing was closed, and that the
prizes were to be awarded. The drums were beaten
with renewed vigor, and the customary deep notes of
the Indian song for the occasion sounded through the
woods. The warriors sprang ashore, and their
mothers
and sisters provided them, as usual, with fresh
and dry clothes, and they retired into the deep woods
to dress. The lights were conveyed round the seats
of the council chiefs, who gravely sat under a lofty
tree, to hear, and determine the claims, and award
the prizes of the evening. The countenance of
Areskoui
,
as he took his seat below his father, was clouded
with unwonted gloom. Successful on former
occasions
,
he had been particularly unfortunate, having
no ground to expect either of the prizes of the
evening
.
It happened, that Jessy stood near him. He
asked her how she had passed the evening? She
questioned him in return, what success had attended
his spear? He replied, in his own speech, `Wakona,
thy brother has been under the influence of a malign
star. I have done no more, than the work of an old
woman. Knowest thou not, Wakona, that this sport
requires all the eye, and all the mind? That my eye
was charmed, thou canst believe. I saw thee
wandering
about, so happy with the fair pale faces, that I
had neither eye nor hand. My heart, thou knowest,
is always with thee.' `My father,' he added,
addressing
Ellswatta, `thy son this night has done thee no
honor.' His brother of the torch wore on his copper
visage a deep touch of gloom. After a silent
assorting
,
and counting, the humblest of the three prizes,
that of having taken the greatest number of salmon,
was awarded to a middle aged Shienne warrior.
To another Shienne, also, little known, was assigned
the second prize, that of having taken the greatest
weight. A shout of acclamation filled all the valley,
as it arose from the Shienne, and was but faintly
echoed by the Shoshonee, who thus evinced the
sullenness
of jealousy, that the two prizes should have
been carried off by their humble, and subdued allies.
A general burst of laughter from the whole crowd,
that seemed for a moment to restore good feeling to
the two races, was occasioned by the coming forward
of Baptiste, a little merry, to enquire if there could
be no prize for the only white man, who had had the
courage to go into the water. He had been more
conspicuous and noisy, than any other aspirant, and
quite ready to plunge in the water. He had taken,
however, but two or three fish, and those of the
meanest
class. He insisted, earnestly, that the white man's
fish should be weighed. This claim overcame even
the stern gravity of Ellswatta. He could not resist
partaking in the continued and renewed bursts of
laughter, that began with the chiefs and warriors, and
was prolonged even through the crowds of women and
children in the rear, who laughed, they knew not at
what. He had intended the claim to be considered,
as a stroke of wit. But even the self-complacency of
Baptiste was overcome, when, as Ellswatta held up
the mean fish of the white skin of quick movement
and babbling tongue, instead of laughing with him, as
he intended, every man, woman and child laughed at
him. He exhibited visible chagrin, as the shouts died
away, only to be renewed again. He exclaimed, `riz,
s'il vous plait. Diable! me no bon fisherman,
certainment
;
eh bien, sacre, Messieurs, sauvages. De
Frenchman bon pour attrapper des filles, if no bon for
take de fish. Sacre! vos filles savent toute ca!'
More serious thoughts again engaged the attention
of the multitude. A Shoshonee warrior, attended by
his torch bearer, produced an uncommonly large and
fine salmon, but slightly wounded. All present
deemed
it the one, that would carry the prize. The
plaudits
of the Shoshonee rang through the woods.
Baptiste
instantly pointed out the girl, that the taker was
known to love, and at whose feet apparently the prize
would be laid. He turned an exulting eye towards
a good looking Indian girl, that seemed fifteen. His
look told, that he intended the fish as an offering to
her. The admiration of Ellswatta and the other
chiefs, while they weighed the fish, clearly gave
countenance to the acclamations, which considered the
Shoshonee warrior as the winner. Nelesho, to gain
greater effect to his intended triumph, kept back to
the last. At length he advanced with a large salmon,
at view of which the Shoshonee warrior's
countenance
fell, and the reiterated cries of joy of the
Shienne
arose again. Areskoui, Josepha, and all the
Shoshonee
surveyed the fish with downcast and
disappointed
looks. Even Yensi showed chagrin and
vexation
,
while the young men remarked, with painful
surprize, that Jessy turned as pale as death. But
Ellswatta, whatever he thought, and felt, weighed
the fish with the inflexible calmness of Indian justice.
It was unequivocally, the largest and finest fish, that
had been taken. Never was proud exultation and
triumph more strongly marked on human countenance.
His fierce eye glistened, and various shades of
satisfaction
sat on his countenance, as it recognized, caught,
and communicated the satisfaction of his own
Shienne
.
His admirable form seemed to be drawn up to
super-human height, as, amidst a silence of ecstacy,
he held up the shining salmon, exhibiting not a wound
or a trace of blood, and measuring more than half the
length of the tall chief. Ellswatta awarded the first
prize of the salmon spearing to Nelesbo, amidst
acclamation
upon acclamation. Ellswatta and Josepha
stole looks of pity at Areskoui, who waited in
apparent
strong effort at the seeming savage insensibility
to mark where Nelesho would bestow the prize.
To judge of the importance, attached to the
bestowment
of this palm, a thousand circumstances must
be understood, which could only be adequately
apprehended
by living long among that people. To
13*
them it was more, than the palm of the Olympian
games, for it was identified with religious feeling, and
with supposed bearings upon the fortune of him, who
granted, and her, who received it. Though
presenting
the fish at the feet of the favorite girl, according
to the rites of the tribe, gave him no exclusive claims
to her love, there was a deeply prevalent
superstitious
persuasion among them, that the girl, who
refused
the proffered love of one, thus favored of the
Wahcondah, would never prosper. A hundred girls
beheld the shining prize with eyes of desire, for
Nelesho
was a general favorite with the girls of unmixed
Indian blood. It was hard to say, who suffered most,
while the decision of Nelesho was pending, Jessy or
Areskoui. Every circumstance concurred to fill the
mind of the latter with gloomy presages. Though
belonging, in the general range of his thoughts, to the
white race, in his superstitious veneration for this kind
of success, he was altogether a red man. Nor could
he imagine, that this triumph had not as much
importance
in the mind of Jessy and the young stranger
guests, as it had in his own. But he struggled with
himself, and became calm, as he would have been, had
he been about to be bound to the stake. Every eye,
especially every female eye, was fixed upon Nelesho,
his rival, who cherished for him a deadly, and
concealed
hatred, not the less so, because political
motives
induced both to smother it. His eye quailed,
as he noted the young Shienne directing his course
to the point, where Jessy stood. As he moved through
the crowd, cheered by deafening acclamations,
especially
of his own people, the proud spirit of Areskoui
suffered inexpressible tortures.
Nelesho moved calmly on amidst the crowd. The
heart of Jessy beat quick, almost to suffocation. The
chief stood with a look of defying dignity in front of
Yensi. He whispered words in her ear for a
moment
.
Even the young visitants from Astoria caught
the infectious impulse of the multitude, and the thrill
of sensation was not wholly unaccompanied by envy,
as the haughty chief gracefully laid the prize on the
grass at the feet of Jessy. `Receive,' he said, `
Wakona
,
the gift of Nelesho, who received it himself from
the Master of Life. From thy young days, thou hast
well known, and thou hast despised the feeling, that
has been burning here;' and as he said, he laid his
hand on his bosom. `I am a red man, and the son of
a red man, and I am worthy of thee. I know none
greater, except the Wahcondah. If thou returnest
not the love of the young Shienne chief, may thy star
wither thy fair face. Mayest thou never know peace;
and may the little white men of the mountains torment
thee, till thou desire death. Take thy choice between
the love and the curse of Nelesho.' The glowing
countenance and the flashing eye were seen by all.
The fierce energy of his manner sufficiently indicated
the general tenor of his speech. The closing words
met only the ear of Jessy.
It would need no effort of the imagination to paint
the situation of Jessy, as a thousand female voices
cried, `Wakona, accept the love of the young chief.'
The rose and the lily chased each other away in her
fair cheek. A faintness, as of death, came over her.
She felt, that dearer interests, than her own were
involved
in her deportment. She exchanged glances
with her father. She consulted the countenance of
Elder Wood, and she made her election with instant
firmness. She arose, as she had marked the custom
on former occasions, and put her hand upon the fish.
She then inclined herself towards the moon, and thence,
to the chief, according to the prescribed ceremonial.
I accept thy gift, chief of the Shienne, she said, with
thankfulness. `But love,' Nelesho, she added in an
under tone, `is never granted, that is demanded with a
curse.' The shrill female cry burst from the girls of
the Shienne, `Wakona, the Wahcondah has given
thee to our chief.'
All this was explained, and translated by Baptiste
to the young strangers; nor could a more trying
position
be imagined for the daughter of Yensi. It called
forth humiliation, ridicule, shame, disgust and
abhorrence
.
She could read in the pale and agonizing
countenance of Areskoui the gnawing of the vultures
at his heart. She felt, in all its bitterness, what it
was to live among Indians, to see lives, dearer than
her own, involved in their loves, quarrels and
caprices
.
She turned a glance upon the polished young
visitants, in whose person and manner the trace of
civilization
,
and high training were so visibly written.
Shame, natural, instinctive, burning, female shame
glowed in her cheek, to have these fine young
strangers
,
and so many white inhabitants witness this scene,
without knowing her reasons for acquiescing in the
degradation. She could not have spoken her
feelings
.
Her fevered voice would not have allowed her
utterance; and the guests had sufficient tact to see, that
any words of gay raillery, or ironical comment would
have been misplaced, and they had the discretion to
keep silence. The chief, retired at a little distance,
remained attentively surveying the changes of her
countenance, as he stood at the head of his Shienne.
Ellswatta dismissed the assemblage with these words.
`The maize dance and the salmon spearing are past.
Let my red children retire to their homes, and come
to the council-house to-morrow evening, as soon as the
stars are in the sky, to hear the words of the medicine
man of the pale face, Elder Wood. He will declare
to us the good words of the Wahcondah of the pale
face. May the Master of Life send you sweet sleep.'
The Indians instantly began to file off to their
tents; and the lovers to their assignations. Wilhelm
was invited home to share the hospitality of a chief,
and each of the whites had the same proffer from
many hands. Better feelings had come to the relief
of Jessy. As she passed Areskoui, and saw the deep
and poignant suffering on his brow, she said to
herself
,
`shall I basely forego all good feelings, because
these strangers behold me? He has shown me the
confirmed kindness of years, and these men are, as he
says, the acquaintances of a day. Let humanity
triumph
over pride.' She bestowed in passing a look of
unwonted kindness upon him. She said, `chief, I am
full of sorrow, that this has been a dark evening to
thee. Accompany us home, and in all thy fortunes,
know, that thou hast the entire respect of thy sister.
Be calm, chief. The Author of Good, sends clouds
one day, and a clear sky the next.' `Wakona,'
replied
Areskoui, `art thou still kind, as always? This
talk goes to my heart. If thou smile upon me, I can
sustain all the rest. Thou hast seen this a dark night
for thy brother. Thou knowest, Wakona, that
rebellion
and blood are in the thoughts of the Shienne.
I owe forbearance to my people. But thou owest
none to Nelesho. Oh! that the Master of Life had
given thee purpose, to reject his medicine gift. Let
him but have looked resentment, and I would have
settled our ancient grudge on the spot.' `And, it
was, therefore, chief,' she replied, `that I yielded, and
accepted the hateful gift. Thou needest not, that I
tell thee, in what light I look upon that proud and
revengeful man. Thou knowest the customs of thy
people. I longed, and yet dreaded to refuse the gift.
But it was a rite consecrated, as thou knowest, by the
ceremonial of ages, and I conceded out of
tenderness
for thy peace and welfare.' `Sayest thou so,'
he eagerly asked; `sayest thou so, Wakona, daughter
of the sun? Thy words are as the south wind,
breezing
on the first flowers of the spring. Thou hast
chased all the clouds from the heart of thy brother.
Let the Master of Life send what signs he may to
Nelesho, so that Wakona continue to smile on
Areskoui
.'
It was not the least embarrassing trial of this day,
that, thus accompanied on her way home by the guests
from Astoria, and by Areskoui, she saw the lowering
countenance of Nelesho, saw his knit brows, and heard
him murmur, as she passed him, low imprecations to
the little white men of the mountains. Something
of the superstitious dread of the supposed power and
influence of these mysterious personages of Shoshonee
fancy, had been imbibed from them, and thrilled
through her frame. It placed her, too, in a dilemma
sufficiently perplexing, that she conversed in one
language
with Areskoui, and in another with the Astorians,
neither understood by the other. They jested with
her upon the convenience of being able to utter
backward
compliments upon either party, without
consciousness
of the purport by the other. They gaily
insisted on a translation of Areskoui's confabulation.
Ironical allusion to him and the claims of Nelesho
ensued
,
which she could well have spared. She
however
,
rallied with them in their own tone, as long as
her drooping spirits would allow. As they still
showed
inclination to place each of the chiefs in a
ludicrous
light, she menaced them with faithful translation.
But she was unable to put an end to this unpleasant
theme, in any other way, than by showing herself in
earnest, as she requested them to spare her feelings
by never speaking of Areskoui, either in his presence
or absence, except with respect. `Think of the chief,'
she said, `as you pleaseand be as merry, in
speaking
of my relations with him, as you may. I best
know his noble nature. I may not forget his
kindnesses
to all I love. I ought not to endure, to hear
any one place him in a ridiculous light in my presence.'
Both the young gentlemen once more apologized, and
promised never to repeat their offence.
Next day was devoted to no set festival; and all
parties were at liberty to make arrangements for
spending it, as they chose. Captain Wilhelm and the
musicians joined a hunting party, requesting
Areskoui
to head them, to hunt the grizzly bear. Julius
and Frederic declined being of the party. `I leave
you,' said Areskoui, `with Wakona. Allow, that the
young chief is generous and confiding, not to disturb
your enjoyments by his presence.'
A party of mounted Indians moved off, after
breakfast
,
for the haunts of the grizzly bear, in the dens of
the mountains. Josepha, Yensi, William Weldon,
and Elder Wood, formed one party, and the two
young gentlemen, a half breed domestic girl of
William
Weldon's, and Jessy, another, for a long
promenade
to survey various interesting points of the
valley
.
They first visited the blue lake, whence was
presented one of the noblest views of the valley and
the mountains. There was an indescribable charm
from this point, in tracing the winding course of the
Sewasserna among the mountains, bringing irrigation,
cherishing plants, flowers, fertility and verdure along
the feet of these precipitous and awful piles. The
domestic smokes arose; and the low of the cattle, and
the hatchet of the wood-cutter, the hum of life, and
the baying of the dogs, came up delightfully mixed,
and softened upon the ear. The grand mountains
soared aloft in the transparent blue on every side.
The passing shadows flitted over them in one point.
Deep chasms vocal with the war of winds or the fall
of waters were seen in another, and the snows and
ices on the tops of all the higher peaks glittered in
cloudless brilliance.
The parents were intently engrossed in their own
separate themes of conversation, kindly aware, that
the best way, to render the younger party happy,
would be to leave them to themselves. They
admired
the views, that spread before them. They
compared
their own drawings, and those of Jessy, of course
with infinite praise to the latter, and discussed the
comparative advantages of genius, endowment,
discipline
,
and the direct imitation of nature, with that
of the finest models of art. Each saw, that an
endless
field of improvement was open from the advantage,
which each could derive from the other. All were
enthusiasts in their admiration of the delightful art,
which is able to trace the grand and beautiful of
nature
,
and give it the fidelity of life, without any of its
harshness and deformity.
After a long survey from this point, they climbed
to a charming terrace plain, still higher up the
mountain
.
As they passed through a thick grove of ancient
and immensely large chesnuts, William Weldon
pointed
out to them the place where he had come in just
at the seasonable moment to save Ellswatta from the
talons of an enormous grizzly bear. He gave a most
graphic description of the deadly struggle between
them, the terrific form of the savage monster, and the
calm intrepidity of the warrior, though streaming with
the blood of numerous wounds, inflicted by the fierce
animal. The parties involuntarily shivered. It led
to a discussion of the noble forbearance, the calm
wisdom
and untiring benevolence of the excellent chief,
and the young men admitted, that they had been
impressed
from the beginning with his intrinsic dignity,
shrewdness and native eloquence.
This easy and untrammelled intercourse, this
succession
of new and imposing scenery, this
commemoration
of various spots, by some striking event,
connected
with them, gave this promenade every
conceivable
interest. Inspiring prospects, were before them.
Youth and beauty were on their foreheads, and all the
consequent associations in their hearts. The powers
of thought, feeling, and wit, fancy, eloquence and
enthusiasm
were all stirred in their secret cells, and each
one not only admired, that the other at once became
endowed with eloquence, but felt new resources
moved
within themselves. Each one experienced that
delicious sensation, of finding not only the very
thoughts, they wished, arise unconsciously, but the
very words, in which to clothe them, flowed equally
unsought to their lips. Each one, too, felt called out
in his own appropriate way of thinking and speaking.
Hence the pleasure of the mutual survey of
distinctive
character. There was the warm internal thrill
of surprize and admiration in the strangers at the
alternate
strokes of talent, thought, earnest feeling,
delightful
and benevolent wit, and a calm joyousness
peculiarly
her own, in their fair companion. The result
of much reading and study, the scintillations of genius,
the native superiority of strong intellect, would have
showed her in a light too like ostentation of talent, had
not the unrestrained familiarity of the ramble placed
them all so perfectly at their case, ease, that the careless
simplicity of her manner took from her sayings all
appearance
of dogmatism, and a desire of display. Her
countenance glowed with the exercise. Her eye
glistened with fullness of satisfaction, and the lustre
of her beauty showed in its utmost richness.
The dinner, that ensued the mountain scramble,
was equally delightful. They entered the charming
grounds of William Weldon. The clear sun shone;
and the privet and pawpaws were habited in their
brightest green. The rivulets tinkled through the
garden. The meadow pinks and acacias poured their
fragrance and beauty on the senses. `What an
enchanted
mansion is this, which you inhabit,' the young
men exclaimed. `What a scene! What a conception
for a house! The valley, the inmate, the abode, are
VOL. I. 14
all enchantment; a miracle to see in these solitudes,
the ultima Thule of the world.' `Thank you,'
replied
Jessy gaily, `what astonishingly polite and
complimentary
guests. For my part, I am both fatigued
and hungry, like a common mortal;' and they entered
to a table spread with the rural abundance of the
valley
,
and no other company to create restraint, than
Elder Wood.
In the afternoon the same party wandered forth
again, to visit many beautiful spots, which they had
not yet seen. They traversed flowering thickets,
consecrating
each charming place by its appropriate
history
.
At one point they listened to the deep
tumbling
of a large water fall, descending from the
mountains
into a prodigious ravine, where the astonished
eye looked down hundreds of feet on the dark rolling
waters in the channel, and the roots, as it were, of
the mountain laid bare, and its huge spoils torn away,
and swept down to the base. As they returned, in
the cool of the declining sun, they attempted to take
a review of the subjects of their multifarious
conversations
of the afternoon. Each admitted, that, if an
enemy had made a book, and put it all down, it would
have been a very voluminous one; and though it
might not be creditable to them in the eye of critical
readers, that it had been most delightful, while
fabricating
by the authors.
The evening reassembled Captain Wilhelm, the
musicians, Baptiste, William Weldon's family, Elder
Wood, and the customary select number of
Shoshonee
,
at the house of Trader Hatch, for supper. The
hunting party, and Trader Hatch among them, had
been not a little glorious by the aid of the water of
life, and they were quite as merry on this occasion, as
comported with the more sober and chastised thoughts
of William Weldon's circle. The roar went round,
as they recounted, that Baptiste had fixed upon a calf
for a deer; that Hatch had mistaken a hornless steer
for a grizzly bear; and that one of their Indians had
bestridden a log, instead of his horse. In the noisy
dialect of huntsmen, they had many merry feats of
that sort, to recount. They had, moreover, killed
elk, deer, and other game, though they had met no
grizzly bear. The supper table was vocal with the
praises of the Shoshonee valley. Wilhelm averred,
in broken English, that he had a strong desire to
return
to his own country, gather all together, and come,
and offer himself for adoption in the tribe. The
musicians
had found the venison fine, the girls charming,
and saw nothing to make man happy on the earth,
that might not be enjoyed here. Baptiste was
absolutely
in ecstacy, for he was confidante, translator,
Cicerone
,
and factotum for every one; and in the midst
of shouts of laughter, he proposed a
pas des deux
with
a favorite Shoshonee girl, who was present. Elder
Wood interposed, and begged, with due submission,
to know, whether so much merriment would be
calculated
to put the parties in a right frame of mind, to
attend the solemn duties of the evening before them?
The grave look of the minister restored order. The
project was silently abandoned.
This evening was the reign of Elder Wood. He
had gradually prevailed, to be able to introduce
regular
religious exercises, when the tribes were
stationary
in their towns, twice in a week; on the Sabbath,
and on Wednesday evening. As the Indians have
much leisure, and spend but a small portion of their
time in labor, they naturally covet holidays. Any
thing, that creates a distraction for the wearying
monotony of their thoughts, is a relief to them.
Gatherings
to attend Elder Wood's worship were
additional
holidays engrafted upon their ancient stock.
His services were not without their effect. Most of
them spent no profound or painful thoughts upon the
subject; though all thrilled at the grave and serious
presence, the deep words and solemn tones of the
minister. To some, who reasoned with him, and
were capable of that exercise, the exposition of some
of his dogmas was positively revolting. But he
visited
the sick, and prayed with all, who would allow
him. He relieved the wants of those, who failed in
their hunt or supplies, or were in any way poor and
destitute. He cultivated peace and good will among
them; reconciled, as far as they would allow him, their
quarrels, gave always good counsels; and on the
whole, exercised in the tribe a high, salutary moral
influence. There was of course a general and
unequivocal
feeling of respect towards him. Partly from
that feeling, partly from curiosity, and partly from
their natural love of a festival, or any kind of
distraction
,
they generally attended his meetings with a
great degree of punctuality. Two or three Indian
women had professed themselves serious, and were
now catechumens, under his especial care, as
preparatory
for administering to them the ordinance of
baptism
.
To attend upon the service of the evening, to talk
over the preceding evening's circumstances, and to
see and communicate with the strangers, once more
brought a numerous concourse together. The
preacher
was clad in a full black suit of canonicals, put in
order by Jessy and her mother. The added number
of distinguished strangers, and the nearness of the
time to the great Indian religious festival of the
preceding
day, concurred to make this a season of
peculiar
display. Long and deeply had he meditated his
subject; and while he would have severely tasked
Jessy and the young men, for devoting midnight vigils
to considering, in what dress they should appear next
day, he overlooked his own night-watchings, where
the All Seeing Eye, probably, discovered, that the
chief element in his meditations, was to produce an
imposing display of oratory this evening. It must be
allowed, that the scene was one of most impressive
and touching interest. In a deep grove, God's first
temple, under the huge `medicine' sycamore, beside
the Sewasserna, the same calm rolling river, that was
the night before broken by the movements of a
thousand
warriors, and flowing in crimson with the light
of as many torches, was the place of worship.
Beneath
its long, lateral, white arms, held out as if in
shelter, were collected thousands of these simple
people
,
of every age. Their uncovered heads, their ever
grave copper faces, their stillness, and the intense
interest
in their countenances, the earnestness of their
efforts to hush the cries of their children, all united to
give deep interest to the occasion. Half formed leaves
rustled over their heads; and through the branches,
the blue and the stars were seen twinkling in the high
dome of the firmament. The sighing of the evening
breeze, as it came down the mountains, over the
hemlocks
and pines on their sides, sounded in the ear like
the deep whisperings of communication of heaven with
earth. The ancient mountains, with their hundred
peaks, stood forth in the light of the moon, to testify
the eternity of that Power, who had reared these
enduring
and sublime piles, and to bear concurrent
witness
with Elder Wood.
Under such circumstances, the minister appeared
before them, venerable in form and person, serious and
thoughtful in his manner, and with enough of the
peculiar
temperament of his country, to be not only
perfectly
composed, but even to feel the full influence of
an excitement, which imparts to a person, so
constituted
,
the power of achieving something more, on the
spur of the occasion, than he could have
accomplished
in the silence of his closet. It has been remarked,
that the Indians are singular for the decorous
attention
14*
with which they listen to whatever purports to be
worship. The arrangement was in semi-circles,
commencing
a few feet from the preacher, who sat central
to the smallest. On the first were the white people,
the visitants, and Jessy in the brightness of her
beauty
,
but with the thoughtful look, which she always
bore at divine service, as if waiting to hear. Next
were the chiefs and their families; and beyond them,
circle after circle, until the outer circumference of
the multitude was lost in the darkness.
The most conspicuous influence, which Elder Wood
could be said to have wrought upon this people, was
in having inspired in them a taste for psalm singing.
The Indians, it is well known, as a race, are keenly
alive to the influence of music. Though it may be
presumed, that Elder Wood had thoughts above the
sleeping majesty of the eternal mountains, that
constituted
the glorious outer walls of his temple; yet, no
doubt, he felt some leaven of earthly mould, in a
disposition
to display to the best effect, the proficiency of
his red pupils in psalmody, in proof of his own
industry
,
and that a part, at least, of his apostolic labors,
had prospered. It must be admitted, that the heart
of this good man kindled with rapture, as well as
pride, while he heard his catechumens sing.
He arose, after the fashion of his country, without
note or book, save the bible and a collection of hymns.
`The Eternal,' he said, `dwelleth not in temples made
with hands. In ancient days, the pure in heart
worshipped
Him in the covert of groves, as we do.
Yonder
are his goings above the mountains. We have
met in his unwalled temple, to show forth his praise.
He hath sent me to proclaim redemption for sinners,
even for the red dwellers in the wilderness, `who were
once afar off, but now are nigh.' There is hope in
the eternal mercy of God, of the pardon of sin,
beyond
the grave. We are all journeying to the
common
place of meeting in the dust. Beyond is eternal
retribution. Let us then, with true hearts, worthily
celebrate the praises of the Eternal. Let us invoke
his mercy, pray for deliverance from sin, and for a
never-ending life of glory and felicity beyond the stars,
and beyond the grave.' Such was his exordium,
delivered
slowly, and with deep intonation, uttered first
in English, and then with deliberate and distinct
enunciation
rendered into Shoshonee. In the same
impressive
manner, he recited first in English, and then
in Indian, the following lines of a hymn:
Rise, my soul, and stretch thy wings;
Thy better portion trace;
Rise from transitory things,
Towards heaven, thy native place.
Sun and moon and stars decay;
Time shall soon this earth remove;
Rise, my soul, and haste away
To seats prepared above.
Rivers to the ocean run,
Nor stop in all their course;
Fire ascending, seeks the sun;
Both speed them to their source, &c.
These simple children of nature caught the strain
of this beautiful hymn, as he raised the first notes
himself. The very trees seemed to have become
vocal. There was an awful key in the wild sound, as
it rose loud, full and clear in the peculiar accent and
tones of these native dwellers of the forest. No other
people could have produced such music, and in no
other place would it have been so appropriate. The
singing had in itself a wild grandeur; but the
circumstances
would have rendered any singing, from such
people, grand. The music of the hymn was in itself
of the richest; and they sung it with an enthusiasm,
that gave it the fullest effect. As the song was
repeated
,
in bursts and cadences, sent back by echo
from the mountains, it almost raised the impression,
that these venerable witnesses for God had joined in
the strain. The frame, that would not have thrilled,
the heart, that would not have softened, the soul, that
would not have felt the upward movement of
religious
enthusiasm, as these simple sons of the forest
followed Elder Wood through the strains of this
anthem
,
must have been obtuse and insensible.
Frederic
felt the moisture rush to his eye, and the chill of
holy feeling run over his frame. Even the dissipated
heart of Julius Landino acknowledged the painful
compunctious visitings of a moment.
Elder Wood rose to pray, and the vast audience
reverently stood up, listening with grave attention.
Prayer finished, he commenced his sermon,
translating
,
as before, sentence by sentence. The intonation
in Shoshonee showed the hearers the point, on which
it had been laid in English, serving as a kind of
interpretation
,
and giving a singular impressiveness to the
sentences. The discourse was sensible, fervid and
eloquent; for these were attributes, that belonged to
his genius and character. He manifestly strove to be
simple, and to use Indian figure and illustration. In
this effort he was only partially successful; for full
success of this sort can be the result only of the
training
of a life. In the doctrinal part of his sermon, he
evidently failed; for, instead of dwelling on the
simple
and universal, but all important points, in which
thinking beings must agree, he very inappropriately
selected a doctrinal subject, not only wholly unfit for
the Shoshonee, but one deemed equally unscriptural
and unreasonable by the greater portion of professed
Christians. The tenor of his reasoning upon his
subject was abstruse, abstract, and out of the range of
thought of his simple audience, to whom there was
but one way of becoming usefully intelligible; and
that was to address them in simple ideas, clothed in
language and figures drawn from their daily train of
thought, and modes of conversing with visible nature.
Unfortunately, the preacher had deemed it a matter
of duty, to ground these simple Indians in the first
points, of what he considered the only true orthodoxy.
These points had hitherto constituted the chief burden
of his theme. They were the absolute and total
depravity
of human nature, its entire importence and
helplessness
previous to grace, unconditional election, and the
certain and inevitable destruction of all those, who
did not receive all these doctrines and act upon them,
as well those who had never had an opportunity to
hear the gospel, as those who had heard and rejected
it. There was power, and strong though
undisciplined
eloquence, in his way of stating these dogmas.
But those of his white hearers, who attended to his
discourse, and cared enough about the subject of his
discussion, to deliberate and weigh it, clearly
dissented
from both his positions and conclusions, as equally
revolting to Scripture and common sense. Still there
was a serious earnestness and simplicity of truth in
his manner, that caused the hearer, while he disliked
the general doctrine of the discourse, to feel respect
for the preacher. Occasionally, the deep guttural
ugh! the note of doubt and dissent, arose from some
of the council chiefs, as some of the stronger and
more intelligible points of the discourse were
rendered
into their own speech.
A short extract is given, as a sample of the whole
discourse. `This book came from God; and He hath
given me a spiritual understanding to comprehend its
true meaning. Whosoever believeth not all these
doctrines, contained in it, will suffer eternally in hell,
that eternal and bottomless lake of brimstone and fire,
of which I have so often spoken to you. It declares,
that the white men in their cities of splendor, the
simple and moral people of the country, the
inhabitants
of the east and the west, the people of all
languages
and climes, children as beautiful and
seemingly
as spotless as meadow lilies or the mountain
snow, are born wholly corrupt, entirely depraved and
sinful, black with native pollution, at war with the
Great Spirit, and receiving life under his everlasting
wrath and curse. The infant of a span long, who
dies out of Christ, and the hoary sinner of four score,
who has rejected him, will alike wail forever in the
bottomless pit, kindled to tenfold fierceness and fury
by the wrath of an incensed God.' This declaration
was followed by an immediate and general
ugh!
The
preacher paused a moment, a little disconcerted. But
his native firmness came to his aid. `I know,' he
continued
,
`my dear red brethren, I know, that this is a
hateful truth to flesh and blood. I know, that it runs
counter to all the wicked passions of depraved nature.
I know well, that this preaching does not agree with
carnal and corrupt human nature. This is the
preaching
,
that in all time has roused up all the opposition
of man against God's eternal truth. For preaching
these truths, missionaries and martyrs have died
among the heathens. For these truths the prophets
were stoned; the apostles crucified, and the Son of
God bled on the accursed tree.' This too, was
followed
by a gentle
ugh!
`The Great Spirit, from the depths of his own
eternity
,
and to magnify his own glory and the riches of
his mercy in Jesus Christ, did of his free and
sovereign
grace, and without reference to merit, seen or
foreseen, to good or evil works, done, or to be done, and
without any regard to difference of character, elect
from all eternity a fewa very fewI know not how
many. God, who chose them from everlasting, only
knoweth. They were elected to everlasting life;
and the rest, being reprobate, and passed over, must
and will inevitably perish. The elect were chosen
by infinite mercy, `before the morning stars sang
together
,
or the sons of God shouted for joy.' In the
fulness of time they were to be sprinkled from the
native corruption of their hearts, by the blood of the
Son of God, the second person in the adorable
Trinity
.
They were to be renewed and sanctified by the
Holy Ghost, the third glorious person of the
Godhead
.
Bought by the blood of the Son of God, elected
by the Eternal Father, and their salvation sworn by
the oath of Him, who cannot lie, not one of them can
be lost. Not one of them can ever stray from the
heavenly mansions. The rest, the countless millions of
the reprobate, are passed by, and sealed up, as
vessels
of wrath, and reserved for the eternal
malediction
of the triune Jehovah! The spotless throne
of the Eternal is guiltless of their blood, and their
destruction, and will be equally glorified with their
execrations, as heard from the depths of the
bottomless
pit, as with the hosannahs and hallelujahs of the
choral anthems of the blood-purchased elect, who
shall praise Him in the heaven of heavens.' Here
was a long and full drawn
ugh!
He paused a moment, and resumed. `The last
and most solemn head of my discourse is, there is but
one way, truth and life, but one baptism by
immersion
,
one fold and one shepherd. All, that belong to
this fold and shepherd, and have received this
baptism
,
are saved. The rest perish everlastingly. Of
the countless millions, who have never heard the
gospel
allall
will perish everlastingly. This brings
me to my grand point. It is to declare the great
truths, my dear red brethren, for whom Christ died,
that I have put my life in my hand, and come among
you. It is for this, that prophets, and apostles, and
evangelists, have gone into heathen lands, and have
braved every form of torture and death. It is for this,
that my soul is in trouble, that rivers of tears run
down my eyes, that I besiege the throne of God day
and night, that he would give me the souls at least of
some of you, my dear red brethren, in answer to my
prayers and cries, as my crowns of rejoicing in the
day of the Lord Jesus; that he would give me your
souls, my white brethren according to the flesh, that
you may hear, believe and be saved, and shine with
me, as stars in the diadem of the Redeemer. The
case would not be so terrible, so worthy of labor, pity
and tears, if it were not, that every one, who doth not
receive this gospel, in its full import, truth and
simplicity
,
into a new and converted heart, will be
everlastingly
scorched in the flames of the bottomless pit,
under the inexorable doom of a just and benevolent
God. By what motives, ye children of wrath, ye
dead in trespasses and sins, shall I warn, and adjure
you, to arise, and call upon Christ to give you light
and life!'
Here the preacher commenced a simple, fervid and
affectionate adjuration. It was earnest and solemn,
and in some points even thrilling and of the most
touching pathos. He continued to kindle his own
feelings with the subject, until, stern and little
addicted
to the melting mood as he was, his voice
quivered
with emotion, and his eyes streamed with tears.
This part of his address went home even to the hearts
of the Shoshonee, and many a hard featured warrior,
who had brandished the hatchet, or drawn the yager
with an unblenching eye and an unfaltering hand, was
seen to drop tears in silent sympathy with the preacher.
Such was the scope of a sermon, not without sense
and eloquence, but without judgment and
discrimination
,
which produced little impression upon most of
the white people, which operated in the naturally
acute and discerning intellects of the Indians positive
dislike, and unbelief, and which confounded the docile,
but enquiring spirit of Jessy. Having finished, as
was his custom, he called upon any of the hearers, if
they had any thing on their minds relating to religion, to
declare if; and if they had any thing to object, he would
be willing to hear them state their objections, that at
the next meeting he might be ready to obviate them.
Tutsaugee, or The Changing Wind, was the chief
reasoner among this people; and to him was
generally
assigned the part of reasoning, and commenting
upon points, which, it was expected, the Indians would
answer. He had acquired great readiness and
acuteness
at this kind of exercise, and was the professed
debater and disputant of the Shoshonee. When
Elder Wood gave out the challenge, a number of the
chiefs, disposed, as it appeared, to have the
amusement
of a little wind in the form of religious
disputation
,
looked round to Tutsaugee, and gave the usual
ugh! in token, that it was expected, he would reply
to the positions of Elder Wood. Tutsaugee arose,
showing a calm and plausible countenance, and an
admirable sly natural physiognomy for a lawyer. He
reached forth his brawny right arm from the folds of
his buffalo robe, and began raising himself to his
utmost
height, and speaking gracefully, and with
vehement
gesticulation. `Our white father will forgive
the ignorant words of his untaught red brethren. We
are sensible, that we know nothing, and that the pale
faces know all deep things. Still it seems to us, that
all the talk of our white medicine father, this evening,
is not good talk. It is a strange and strong talk, and
our red men are too ignorant, to understand it.
Hearken
,
white father, and explain. You say, that the
little babes of the white and red people are born
under
the wrath and curse of the Master of Life. Your
Wahcondah, then, must be quite different from ours.
Our Master of Life is too good to send little,
innocent
babes, who have no strength, nor understanding
to do wrong, into life, to make them bad, and then
VOL. I. 15
bestow his curse upon them for being so. Hearken,
father, and explain. You say, that the Master of
Life chose, before the sun and moon rolled in the
firmament
,
a few to go to the good place; and chose
them, not because they were good, or would be good;
and passed by the rest, not because they were bad,
or would be bad; but merely for his will and
pleasure
;
that the chosen will surely go to the good place;
and the reprobate forever burn in the brimstone lake.
This seems to us not a good talk, father. The worst
red men in our nation would not act so cruelly, and
our Wakondah is far better, than the best of our men.
We have even seen no pale faces so bad, as that. The
Wakondah of red men chooses, and sends to the
shadowy
land of souls brave and free spirits, because
they are brave, true and good. We do not feel, as if
we could love, and trust the Wakondah of the pale
face, if he conducts in a way, that seems to us so
partial
and cruel, merely to show his power. We may
fear his power; but if he so shows it, we cannot love
him. Hearken, father, and explain. You say, that
your Master of Life hears the groans of the damned,
making as pleasant sounds in his ears, as the
hosannahs
and praises of the blessed. Ah! father, is it
because
the pale faces worship such a being, that we
have heard, that they are all so hard-hearted, cruel,
and unjust? Hearken, father, and explain. You
say, that the brown faces and the red skins, and the
black people, and all the strange people in the far
countries, and the islands of the great salt lake, who
have not heard of the Wakondah of the pale face,
will be damned, and burned forever in the brimstone
lake. Ah! because they never heard of him? Father,
will the Great Spirit of the white men punish the
ignorant
red men, because they never heard a talk, that
no body was able to tell them. The red men are
ignorant
.
The Master of Life placed them where they
must be ignorant, and ought to pity them for their
want of knowledge. But do you say, father, that he
first makes them ignorant, and then damns them for
being so? Father, that seems to us a bad talk. We
fear, that you do not say right words of the
Wahcondah
.
We think you slander him, and that he will be
angry with you. Put your ears to your medicine
book again, and be sure that it speaks just such words
as you declare. Father, explain. We are ignorant;
but we believe, that the Master of Life has always
had kind thoughts in his heart, and kind deeds in his
hands. You ask, since we so think of the words,
which you find in the book of the Wahcondah, why
we so respectfully hearken to our white father, and
love him, as a wise man, and give heed to him, as a
medicine man? Father, we hear you speak strange
words of the Wahcondah, which we neither
understand
nor believe. But we see you doing good deeds.
We think, you must be a very good medicine man, if
you worship a strange and cruel Wahcondah, and yet
always do good. We love our white father, because
he does not act like the other white men. We know,
that words are wind. Deeds stand fast like the
mountains
.
Father, next time you declare to us a
medicine
talk, we hope you will explain. I have done.'
Most who heard, were convinced, that missionaries,
who preach the mild and sublime truths of the gospel,
to simple and ignorant people, ought to dwell chiefly
on the clear and innate truth of that divine system,
and not strive to perplex these children of nature
with abstract, not to say revolting doctrines. Some
took the preacher at his literal word, and others cared
for none of these things.
The moon was nearly at her zenith, when the
service
was closed. The breaking up was attended by
circumstances not unlike those, which mark the close
of the solemnities of the whites. Human nature
shows much more nearly the same actings every
where, than we are ready to imagine. The Captain
and the musicians walked home, each striving to make
himself understood by his elected damsel. Areskoui
and Nelesho lingered near the daughter of Yensi, as
was their custom. She walked thoughtfully, between
her father and mother, with the young strangers at
their side. Some of the women of the tribe
commented
on the talk of Elder Wood, and found it good
and reasonable. Others among the whites
pronounced
it both unreasonable and unscriptural, as
their previous habits of thinking and education had
been. All criticised more in fault, than praise. But
their present pleasures, passions and pursuits soon
banished Elder Wood and his subject from their mind.
He, on his part, walked home, musing in sadness and
discouragement upon the hardness of heart, and
stiffness
of neck of those, who would not at once give full
credence to the doctrines of the five points. Jessy,
too, as she retired to her rest, could not but admit
with Tutsaugee, that his doctrines were hard to
understand
,
and revolting to the common apprehension.
But the tones of his voice and his look of purity and
his life of sanctity, so well remembered, came in aid
of her confidence, and unabating respect for him. The
past, the present, and the future floated before her.
This passing moment of existence is all a dream, she
said. Not so with these awful realities of the future
about which this good man speaks with so much
confidence. Let me banish all illusions, and give
myself
up to meditations upon the eternal concerns of the
soul. But after her simple prayers were said, earthly
visions again rushed upon her. The honied words,
the fascinating manners of Juliusof countenance,
form and deportment so captivatingrevisited her
memory. What beauty in his countenance! What
sweetness in his tones, and how irresistibly easy and
graceful in manners! Still, it struck her, that there
was insidiousness lurking in his eye; and that a want
of principle, a slighting of the sanctions of conscience,
moral obligation and the scriptures, had occasionally,
though almost covertly, crept into his discourse.
Might not the most real worth, the most sound
understanding
,
the most generosity and good feeling be
concealed
under the sterner manner, the less striking
countenance of Frederic? The more closely she
contemplated
him, in the more interesting light he
appeared
.
`I would be glad,' she thought, `that his
abode among us might give time to study his
character
.'
Then the transition was natural to the
magnanimous
forbearance, the constant struggle for self
control in Areskoui. `I am destined to these valleys,'
she thought. `I can never hope to go forth to the
paradise, which these fair young men inhabit. Why
can I not command the discretion to control my
imagination
,
and see the chief, as my dear father would
wish?' As her mind, her imagination and her heart
alternately
had the ascendancy, her thoughts floated in
vague confusion, and sleep fled her eye lids. She arose,
went to the window, looked up to the blue and star
bespangled
arch. `Our Father, who art in heaven,' she
said, and fixed, and devout communion with the Father
of Spirits composed her mind. The repose that
ensued
was the deep sleep of innocence and prayer.
Such is an outline of the intercourse of the visitants
from Astoria with the Shoshonee, during the allotted
time of their visit. The young gentlemen had spent
as great a portion of it with Jessy, as William
Weldon's
stern interpretation of propriety would allow.
They had hunted, and angled, and walked, and
conversed
together, or in company with the Indians; and
upon every allowed pretext had walked with Jessy,
accompanied by her mother, or Josepha, or their half
breed female domestic. Much of this time passed in
15*
her bower on the shore of the blue lake, professedly
in discussing their respective paintings; but in fact
in conversations, which, originating in this subject,
wandered, before they closed, upon many points very
little related to painting. The distinctness of
character
,
which belonged to each of the strangers, had
begun to be apprehended by Jessy; and, much as she
was struck by the first appearance of Julius, she
perhaps
more strongly regretted the approaching
separation
from Frederic, who had scarcely said a civil thing
to her; while the other was continually seeking
opportunities
to pour into her ear extravagant
compliments
.
But the considerate and forbearing young
chief, feeling that he was a constant drawback from
the pleasure of this visit, and aware that the general
theme turned upon subjects which he neither
understood
or regarded, and was conducted in a strange
language, avoided his usual frank familiarity with her,
restricting himself to an occasional salutation, as they
passed.
The morning of the departure of the visitants on
their return to Astoria had arrived. At the parting,
all the white people, with the family of Ellswatta,
breakfasted at the house of Hatch. The departing
guests were apparently sincere in their expressions of
regret. Apart from the attraction of the splendid
daughter of Yensi, this wild life, this intercourse
untramelled
by the usages of society, this image of Indian
range, with no limit but vague opinion, the unequalled
beauty of the scenery, all conspired to give this kind
of life a charm for men of such characters and
pursuits
.
They declared, that they had never been so
happy; that they had enjoyed themselves so highly,
and had been under the influence of such a spell, as
they feared, would render all other places tedious and
tasteless. The party had been more successful than
they had anticipated, in obtaining supplies of salmon,
furs and peltries. The periogues would, in fact, be
ladened with these articles. Captain Wilhelm again
affirmed, that when he should have revisited his
country
and disposed of his property, and arranged his
affairs
,
he felt serious purposes to return to the
Shoshonee
,
and select an Indian wife, and spend his days
with his friends. The young men looked so many
more things, as they said less. An exchange of
paintings
and drawings between them and Jessy, took
place; and assurances, to which at the moment she paid
little attention, that they intended, this should not be
the last meeting. Josepha and Ellswatta were glad
they were gone, it must be admitted; for their son
would once more be left with no rival in the views of
Jessy; and these formidable impediments to his hopes
would once more be out of the way. The farewells
of the guests drew tears from the eyes of Yensi; for
they were returning to that society, for the pleasures
of which she still sighed. It may not be disguised,
that certain indefinite emotions, and those certainly
not of satisfaction, arose in the bosom of Jessy, as she
saw the fine forms of the young men gliding down
the Sewasserna in their boats, and disappearing
behind
the wooded point.
CHAPTER VI.
By day, by night, on hill, or plain,
Whate'er my task, where'er I go,
In dreams, awake, in joy or woe,
I fondly trace those scenes again;
For they are memory's hoarded store,
And, miser-like, she counts them o'er.
M. P. F.
The
night previous to this departure, Julius
Landino
and Frederic Belden had performed vigils
together
in the same apartment, at the house of Hatch.
The trader and his Indian wife shared the same room.
But the one had taken such copious potations of his
own rum, that he snored most sonorously, beside his
spouse of the red skin. The one heard not a word,
and the other understood nothing of the language, if
she heard. The young men, fearlessly and without
reserve went into the history of their past, and their
purposes for the future.
Julius Landino was the only son of an opulent
Portuguese
merchant of Macoa, by an English wife. This
son, talented, handsome, and probable heir to
immense
wealth, had been educated in England.
Courted, equally on account of his wealth and his
extremely handsome person, and consigned to the
guardianship of unprincipled flatterers and panders,
he plunged into every species of dissipation and guilt.
His parents were finally aroused by reiterated reports
of his dissipation, to send peremptory orders for his
immediate return to Macoa, and they arrived just in
time, to break off a disgraceful intercourse, which he
was carrying on with an abandoned woman. He
returned
to his own country, only to resume similar
connexions
there. In Macoa, circumstances brought him
in contact with Frederic Belden, supercargo of an
American ship from Philadelphia. As unlike in mind
and character, as Baptiste and Elder Wood, similar
causes operated in this case, as in that, to produce a
particular intimacy between them. This intimacy
was heightened by the circumstance, that Frederic,
with great personal courage and exposure, had
rescued
Julius from a perilous dilemma in the streets of
Macoa, in which his dissipation had involved him, as
he returned home late in the evening. The parents
became intimate with the preserver of their son. As
Frederic sustained a high reputation for sobriety and
good morals, and as Julius seemed not averse to the
proposition, they proposed, that their son should
accompany
him to the north-west coast of America, in
the trade of which country his father was engaged,
and thence back to China. The contract was settled.
The penal banishment for the profligate son was
arranged
,
and they sailed together. It was expected,
that Julius would continue his studies, regain his
doubtful health; and more than all, his parents were
aware, that he would be restrained from dissipation,
by inability to follow it. He was, also,
recommended
to the particular surveillance of a confidential
friend of his father, who was to sail on board. It
was optional with Frederic, to remain at Astoria,
during
the absence of his ship, on her voyage to China,
to collect furs for her; or to return in her to China.
The confidant had orders, if he found Astoria free
from enticements to dissipation, to allow his ward to
remain with his friend, during the absence of the ship
on her China voyage, or to have him take passage in
her to China, according to circumstances. He had
consented, that Julius should be on this excursion to
the Shoshonee, and the question of their remaining
at Astoria, or taking passage in the ship to China, was
to be settled on their return.
Frederic Belden was from Pennsylvania, the son of
respectable parents, in straightened circumstances,
but rigidly orthodox presbyterians in religious
opinions
,
and under the guidance and almost absolute
control
of a pastor, still more bigoted than themselves.
They were sincere in their opinions, and honest in
their bigotry. The pastor was an affected zealot,
from motives of interest and ambition. His
orthodoxy
was of course more violent for being semblance,
and kept up for the occasion. Feeling, that he acted
a part, it was natural, that he should suffer continual
apprehensions, that his acting would be detected.
Frederic, from the circumstance of family
connexions
,
had been sent out of the state to a college,
reputed
to be under the influence of heretical sentiments.
The pastor, by correspondents, exercised a constant
espionage upon the young student. His faults, and
he had faults, were magnified. Under such
construction
,
venial errors became crimes. Liberal enquiry
was considered, and represented to his parents, as the
buddings of infidelity and atheism. Every thing, that
he did, seen through this medium, was misconstrued.
His parents became suspicious and soured towards
him. When he came home, in his vacations, he was
preached at in church, and treated as an irreclaimable
reprobate and prodigal son. He first became
dejected
and unhappy; then threw himself upon the good
feeling of his parents, and pointed out the injustice,
the minister had done him. But this only drew on
him a more aggravated condemnation, as a graceless
and hardened unbeliever, who wished to alienate the
hearts of his parents from their excellent pastor. His
filial piety was finally worn out in resentment of
unrelenting
injustice. Detesting the minister, and
miserable
at home, he left college, and through the
kindness
of remote family connexions of a more liberal
mind, obtained the place of a kind of sinecure
supercargo
in a China ship, that traded between Canton
and the North-West coast. His place on trial was
disagreeable. He left it at Macoa.
Such was the narrative of the two young men, at
mutual confession. At least such was the purport of
their story, when divested of circumlocution, foreign
matter, and the colorings of self flattery. They both
seemed to have steered thus far on the course of life,
without chart or compass. On board the ship was a
person placed over Julius, as a spy, who discharged an
office naturally odious, and the latter had preved
himself
such a refractory and troublesome subject, that
provided only he could give a satisfactory account of
his stewardship, to his parents, he cared little what
became of his charge. The other had been
abandoned
by his friends, as a hopeless outcast from grace,
and neither of them had any pole star, or fixed
purpose
for the future. They were both of an age,
discipline
and temperament to predispose them, to
admire
the boundless range and the wild license of
Indian
life and manners. They compared their
sensations
from these few holidays, in the most beautiful
vale of the west, with the hackneyed, and
commonplace
enjoyments in social life; and viewed the happy
dream of the few past days, with the beautiful
daughter
of Yensi to make part of the picture, as a fair
sample of Indian life, and a steady residence among
them. In the discussion and the comparison, with the
different views resulting from their different
temperament
and education, they agreed in declaring,
that they had seen more enjoyment here in a week,
than they had felt in cities in a year, and they
sustained
William Weldon, in saying that Rosseau had
reason, when his eloquent pen portrayed the
advantages
of savage over social life. They dwelt in terms
of enthusiasm upon the wild, sublime, and yet soft
landscape, the Sewasserna, the most devious and
beautiful of rivers, upon the fine old philosopher
William
Weldon, and the striking physiognomy of his
pretty Chinese wife, the Kentucky minister, with his
orthodoxy, his broad back, and warm heart, the jolly
Dutch trader, the fine family of the chief, admitting
by way of parenthesis, that Josepha herself had not
ceased to be pretty, and drawing young men's
inferences
in the case, the capering, mischievous and
diverting
Frenchmanall these things were as they
should be. To crown all, there was the divine Jessy,
a thing of another worldan ethereal exhalation, an
angel, an image of beauty, to which there was no
likeness
in heaven or earth or waters, or even the world
of imagination. Such, including the whole host of
superlatives and comparisons, were all put in
requisition
by Frederic, as he spoke of her, and added with
a long sigh, `that he wished, he had never seen her,
or that, having seen her, he might never cease to
behold her.'
Julius went with him certain lengths, admiring the
valley, allowing that he had there got rid of ennui, and
expressing reluctance to return to the dull,
drudging
,
and money-getting world. But his friend's
eloquent
and rather extravagant eulogy of the daughter
of Yensi drew him from a seeming reverie. `In truth,
my yankee friend,' he said, `Wakona, as they call her,
has in fact put you hors du combat; and I doubt not,
we shall have your silken chains done into most
harmonious
verse. She is beautiful, I grant you; and
has a kind of piquant loveliness, which perplexes you
more, from not knowing to what class to refer it. I
suspect, though, that much of her fascination depends
upon the effect, it has upon the imagination, to find
such a singular production in so strange and savage a
place.'
`You will give us a new theory upon beauty and
taste,' said Frederic, `will you?' `No doubt Alison
and the rest will go into disuse, when your views
appear
.
I, for my part, made the same allowances; and
I endeavored critically to scrutinize the premises. I
found it, like an intense view of the mid-day sun,
rather an infliction upon the beholder, than a
diminution
of the object contemplated.' `Better and better,
'pon honor, Frederic. But, sir, this sweet essence of
roses, this super angelic double-distilled, ethereal
sublimate
of the spheres, oh, my dear friend! isa little
squaw! Now redden, will you? Not exactly a squaw
but destined to be the wife of an Indian. We, my good
fellow, are a kind of episode, a new dish, with a new
garnish of spice for the girl's curiosity. The young
chief is the standing article. As soon as her eye
becomes familiar with us, she will, unquestionably,
return to her Indian.' `Never! never, Julius!
Areskoui
is a fine fellow, for an Indian, that we must allow.
But there is sacrilege and murder in the thought,
that Jessy should become the wife of a savage. Do
not desecrate your imagination by such a vile idea. I
have been tasking my poor brain to the utmost, to
invent
some pretext to remain behind, and see the end
of this drama, to which we have been so strangely
introduced
!'
`My good fellow,' replied the other, `you have hit
my own fancy, and have anticipated my own thought.
What should we do at Astoria? What pleasure is
there in tumbling about upon the stormy sea, and
doing penance in sea sickness? What novelty is there
in the yellow frights at Macoa and Canton? Here
every thing is at least green and fresh, and one snuffs
with the mountain air a keen relish even for the comely
red skins. By heaven, the same thought has
occurred
to me, to turn Shoshonee by way of variety. When
I am weary of playing that part, and return to the
pleasures of affluence, I shall have something in the
past, of which to think pleasantly. I should like to
operate upon the triumph and saucy defiance in the
eye of this little Indian witch. With what easy sang
froid she receives us, as though she had been
perfectly
used to fine gentlemen, and felt all the
consequence
of being a belle! Would it not be an
achievement
worthy of a romance, to win her love, steal her
away, and carry her to London, as a show of the
American flower `of the wilderness.' `What would
you do with her?' asked the other impatiently. `My
good fellow, you ask the question with a very
impertinent
look. What would I do with her? What
would you do with her? I am the only child of an
ancient and opulent family, and I conceive I have
some claims to amuse myself. What would I do with
VOL. I. 16
her? I would render her as happy, as money and
love could make her, until we had both pursued the
partnership to satiety; and then I would put her in
the way of rendering some other person as happy, as
she had made me.'
`I will not be offended with you, Julius, for you can
only be jesting. It is impossible, that a gentleman of
your appearance can be really actuated by the
principles
of' `Of what? Speak out, my pious yankee
friend.' `The principles of a fiend, then! I would
be content, to spend my days in this valley, and hunt
buffaloes and deer, and never speak with any person
again, but an Indian, so that Jessy Weldon loved me,
and would share my fortunes with me. This would
crown all my wishes on this side the grave. Practise
seduction with Jessy Weldon, and abandon her!
There is horror in the thought!' `Indeed,' replied
the other, laughing, `Sir moralist, we will not fight
about her yet. All in good time, after we have won
her love, we shall come to that point. It seems to me,
you had better join yourself to the baptist minister,
go under the water, turn missionary, and sing psalms
with Wakona! What charming alternate strains
you would sing! Would you really, Frederic, join
yourself to her in holy and everlasting wedlock?'
`Indeed would I, and feel too happy in the bond.'
`Come on then, Frederic, Let us be good friends.
They will be glad to get rid of us at Astoria. We
may as well stay here, until the return of our ship
from Canton, as at that miserable place of sailors and
desperadoes. I will make love to Jessy on my
principles
.
You shall do the same on yours. Her
natural
predilection for Areskoui shall have scope, and be
watched. That racy devil, Nelesho, shall make a
copper colored episode. We will turn Shoshonee,
and be adopted, until our ship returns to Astoria. If
we are sick of our country, or too impatient, to wait
for the winding up of the plot, we will be off in her
next voyage. There is my plan. I mean to remain,
whether you do, or not.'
`Then, Julius, I will remain too. I would not trust
such a flower, to be handled by such a personage
without witness. If you stay to plot, I will stay to
counter plot. I understand well your personal
advantages
.
It will be a study to me to mark how the
gradual
development of such principles, in such a
seductive
shape, will affect her. Although I was deemed,
in my own country, a recreant to grace and goodness,
comparison has taught me to discover in myself a half
formed saint. You will play before her the polished
and seductive Lothario. I, the plain, honest
North-American
,
will place before her the embodied truth
and sincerity of love. If she should not prefer either
Areskoui, or me, to a man with your principles, then
I shall be convinced, that I have adored an illusion.
I shall no longer believe the characters traced by
heaven itself.'
`Your humble servant, my yankee Mentor! You
are exceedingly complimentary, and you have piqued
me, to show you the fabric, of which a woman is made,
touching her regard to principles, as you call them.
I will cause you to feel the texture of the article in
general. I will exert myself to the utmost, I assure
you.' The other replied with eager vivacity, `if you
play tempter in this paradise, I will play Argus, and
be her good angel. I am aware, that her trial must
be a fearful one. At any rate, we must seem to be
friends, or our project, which smacks not a little of
insanity
,
will fail at the very outset. If Areskoui or
Nelesho were to divine our purpose, they would,
probably, mince us with their tomahawks, or roast us
for a supper for some of their fair red skins. It is
easy to see, that we have tortured them with jealousy
already. It would be a charming affair, I confess, to
steal this sweet girl away from these brutes. But
we must manage every thing cautiously, until our
project
,
whatever it may be, is ripe for effect.'
`Bravely said, my yankee moralist. You are now
discoursing to some purpose. It were pity, if we,
who have the adroitness and training of society, could
not play our part with a brood of savage cubs, and a
fair faced little rustic, who has no more experience
than a heath partridge. She is amply endowed with
the Scotch gift, I admit, as women naturally are. But
I have played my part with the most wily of the whole
of them, aided with all the trick and cunning of society
to boot. You will see, how easily I will manage this
matter.' `One thing I forewarn you, Julius, if we
are to act our parts in this affair in good temper, you
must learn always to speak with respect of Jessy
Weldon
.
There is another difficulty to be overcome. I
do not see under what pretext we can desert our
companions
,
and remain behind.'
`Sir, as to Miss Weldon, the divine, henceforward,
when I speak of her, I will always move my hat. I
will perform a genuflection, as thus, and do as is my
duty, my humble service to her shoe tie. As to
clearing out from the sea-monsters, leave all that to
me. In the first place they have found neither use
nor comfort in us, and will be glad to get rid of us.
In the next place, they have no control over us. In
the third place, my guardian will be rejoiced, to be
able to give such a clear account of his stewardship,
as I will put him in the way to prepare in this event;
and lastly, we had our option to remain at Astoria,
during the present voyage of our ship, if we chose.
As to getting off from our companions, hearken to my
plan. We are expected to go forward of them in our
periogue. When we have turned the wooded point,
below the town, we will spring on shore, among the
thick hemlocks, capsize our periogue, push it into the
stream, hide ourselves in the dark forest, and have the
pleasure of hearing our own funeral oration, and
dirge; and knowing what they think of us, and how
much sorrow they will feel at the supposed drowning
of two such hopeful youths. We will remain, in
durance
vile, until the party descends the river. We
will then return to the village, and offer ourselves for
adoption. It is evident, they are delighted with the
coming of white people among them. Areskoui will
be jealous of us, and will wish us at the devil. But
he is evidently playing the magnanimous in the eye of
Jessy. We will kindly aid him with real torture, and
accommodate him with the poisonous shirt of
Hercules
,
and have the pleasure of seeing him writhe and
struggle, and attempt to conceal his agony. You can
easily see, that his mother governs him; and he
governs
his father, and his father governs the tribe. If
we wish to manage him, observe, that his mother yet
retains a full Spanish eye, and a ripe cheek. I will
make love to her, by way of underplot. Do you
smoke me! What a pity, the young copper colored
fiend has such an admirable form! The young prince
has a fine face, too, it must be allowed. So much the
better. All will make the right sort of material, to
effervesce our cauldron of Hecate.'
`Upon my truth, Julius, I startle at you. I
discover
neither tail nor cloven foot. It cannot be that one
of the dark spirits has taken such a form; neither can
I realize, that all this ready contrivance can be
indigenous
in the brain of a mere son of the earth. You
are a perfect Machiavel at an intrigue. After all, we
may be too cunning for ourselves, and it is not at all
improbable, that we shall pay the penalty by being
roasted alive. Mark you, my chief motive, in
consenting
to this hopeful plan, is, to guard your
intercourse
with Jessy. You place before her the
seduction
of a fascinating person and manners. I stand, as
16*
a guardian angel, between her, and your libertine
principles. I rely upon truth, honor and love. If I
have rightly divined her character, I shall carry the
prize.'
`Agreed to all that,' replied the other. `You have
added another motive. A glorious mark and
marplot
!
We can hunt, spear salmon, and episode it with
the red skin damsels, by way of variety of
divertisement
.
My serious business shall be to make love in
my way, put the young savage on the gridiron of
jealousy
,
and circumvent a simple yankee, who thinks to
win a girl's heart by downright honesty, and love to
the point of marriage for life.'
Such was the momentary project of these idle
young mena project, partaking of their character of
indolence and recklessness; but colored in each mind
by their peculiar temperament. In furtherance of
their plan, when the guests descended the Sewasserna,
they proposed to row, when the wind and current bore
them not with sufficient rapidity, and to move in
advance
in their Indian periogue. It would require
little effort to keep forward of the squadron of heavily
laden boats. Their party consented to this
arrangement
,
giving them many cautions not to keep too far
ahead, nor to capsize their frail craft, and get drowned.
According to their arrangement, the first point,
which they turned, being nearly a mile in advance of
the other boats, and at a place where the river was
broad and deep, they paddled ashore, and overturning
their periogue, left their hats swimming in the water,
pushed the canoe into the river, and concealed
themselves
among hemlocks, of an umbrageous
compactness
,
to make it dark at noon-day. Suppressing their
laughter as they might, they remained within hearing
of what might transpire. The other boats in a few
minutes floated on. The party exclaimed, as might
be expected in such a case, as they saw the capsized
periogues and the floating hats. `The lads have
taken
the short cut to the lower country!' they cried, as
they sprang on shore. It struck them with surprize,
indeed, that both should have been drowned. But
there were eddies in this deep and wide space, which
would naturally whirl them from the shore. At any
rate, they were evidently both drowned, and all
speculation
,
as to the mode, was alike gratuitous and
unavailing
.
The water was deep, and there was little
chance, that their bodies would be found. But the
party humanely paused, came to land, and sent their
Indian rowers back to bring assistance from the town
to search for the bodies.
While the Indians were out on this errand, the party
fired funeral minute guns. The band played a dirge,
and different persons occasionally shouted, so that if
they had gained the shore any where below, they
might reply. No noise was heard in answer, but the
echoes. After satisfying themselves of the
fruitlessness
of such efforts, they fell into a strain of
moralizing
over the untimely fate of these young men, with
the indifferent tone of those who inwardly
congratulated
themselves, that if others were dead, they were
alive. `A pretty fellow, and a rich,' said they, `that
Julius, and a great libertine to boot. He has lost a
fine estate, and the ladies a charming fellow. But
Frederic, though not the likeliest, was a thousand
times the cleverest lad. Neither of them, however,
will be much missed in the world. There is some
comfort in that.' In a hundred grave remarks, of
this general import, did these people discuss the
premature
fate of the young men, who were so near at
hand, as to hear every word, and gain the practical
conviction of the depth and reality of that sorrow and
lamentation, they would have caused, had they been
really drowned.
A concourse of Indians soon arrived at the spot,
and with them all the resident whites. Each
contemplated
the catastrophe with different emotions.
Areskoui looked intently on the countenance of Jessy,
to estimate how deeply her short acquaintance with
them had graven their remembrance in her thoughts.
He saw a distinct impress of sadness upon her face,
which served in no degree to increase his own regrets.
Elder Wood took up his own burden of thought, and
discoursed solemnly upon the uncertainty of life. `But
two hours since, and no hearts were more gay or glad
on this side of the grave; and now the Sewasserna,
a river unknown to geography or song, will roll over
their sleeping dust, till time shall be no more.' Hatch
scratched his bead, and talked about the immense
estate
,
to which Julius was heir. Baptiste insisted,
that they who would be drowned from such a
periogue
,
and in such a place, ought to be drowned for
fools. Josepha and Yensi spake with moistened eyes
of their beauty and youth, and pitied their mothers,
when they should hear of it. Nelesho whispered
half articulated curses upon the whole white race,
and wished they might all have thus perished together.
Ellswatta said, `they were noble young warriors, and
it was a pity, such brave and free spirits should so
early have taken the last journey to the land of souls.'
`Pale faces,' he continued, `sing your deepest death
song. Let their spirits enter into the land of
shadows
,
cheered by the pleasant sounds, in which they
delighted, while alive.' The place, meanwhile, was
dragged in every direction for the bodies, while dirges
were played on the shore.
The sun had past the meridian, before the
exertions
were discontinued. The Astorian party,
hopeless
of finding their bodies, concluded to resume their
descent of the river. The Shoshonee and the whites
returned, some in sadness, some joyful, and some
indifferent
,
retaining such impressions and discoursing
such reflections, touching the supposed catastrophe,
as would have been drawn forth, had a similar event
occurred in a civilized country.
The two sojourners in the hemlocks, meanwhile,
began to find the clamors of hunger no small
drawback
from the amusement of listening to their own
funeral eulogy and obsequies. They were nothing
loth to leave their lurking place, and set forth towards
the town. They thought it expedient, not to appear
there until the shades of the evening would screen
them from observation. They then presented
themselves
at the door of Hatch, who having very little faith
in ghosts, was startled indeed, but not much
frightened
,
when he saw, and recognized them. It was
not difficult, to make him comprehend their project;
nor, as they would be likely to be profitable
customers
,
to obtain his hearty consent to the plan, and his
promised aid, that they should remain incog, until it
should be ascertained, what reception they might
expect
from the tribe.
Next day the project was known, and discussed in
the family of William Weldon. As might be
expected
,
he saw no harbingers of good in the event.
Yensi was clearly delighted, and not backward in
expressing
it, that the young men had been so well
pleased with their excursion, as thus to choose to
domesticate
themselves in this valley. If they could not
remove to civilization and society, she rejoiced, that it
was coming to them. Elder Wood protested against
the deception; but was too much a Kentuckian at heart
to be severe upon such clever management, to carry
into effect a project so natural to a hunter and
backwoodsman
.
Jessy thought something of the
morality
of their project, as Elder Wood had done; but her
heart was relieved, when she learned, that they were
not drowned. Neither in truth was she sorry, when
advised, that their intent was to domesticate
themselves
among the Shoshonee. The views of
Areskoui
and his parents may be easily imagined.
On the morning of the third day a council was
convened
,
in the great council wigwam. The young
men announced, by their interpreter, that they had
voluntarily absconded from their friends, with a
purpose
to dwell among the Shoshonee; and if on trial,
they should be found active hunters and trappers, and
brave warriors, they desired to be adopted into the
tribe.
Accustomed to the practice of self control, Areskoui
determined, that Jessy should see him neither
showing
selfishness, nor wanting in magnanimity and
forbearance
in this decisive trial. Nelesho,
comprehending
the position of Areskoui, and anticipating the
tortures of jealousy he would suffer, was decided, in
expressing his wish to receive them. The whites
were as yet a novelty; and their arrival in the tribe
was associated with the pleasant ideas of ardent
spirits
.
All the influence of the squaws was in their
favor
.
On the whole, the two tribes were unequivocal,
in manifesting their wishes to welcome the young
strangers, and grant their request. Elder Wood,
whose influence among them was distinctly felt, had
been won to be favorable to their desire, by the
intimation
on their part, that in the retirement of the
valley
they intended to find time, to examine the claims
of religion, and to consult him on the concerns of
their salvation. Baptiste, who also exercised his
appropriate
bearing upon the lower classes, was
charmed
with the idea of such an addition to the gaiety of
the Shoshonee circle.
When in council it came the turn of Areskoui to
speak, after his father, no one but Jessy could have
divined from his thoughtful but composed visage, with
what feelings he regarded the measure. In a few
significant
words he gave his assent to their request.
All, who had any claim to the expression of an
opinion
,
having spoken, the executive council chiefs
smoked
awhile, as if in profound meditative deliberation.
A word or two, and a significant gesture passed
between
them, when Ellswatta arose, and declared the
sense of the council in the usual Indian phrase, which
would import in English, `stay with us, and welcome.'
Certain ceremonies of admission to the tribe, in
the customary form, took place, and the council broke
up. The young men became boarders with Trader
Hatch, the publican of the tribe. They had now
before
them a most perplexing task, to arrange their
future
plan of operations in relation to their intercourse
with William Weldon's family. They needed not be
told, that the management required infinite policy,
prudence and forbearance. The head of this family
had both sense and dignity. The moment any step
on their part, that had the slightest aspect of
indecorum
,
or officiousness, or of such a character as would
affect the reputation of Jessy in the most scrupulous
circles in society, should be taken by them, they were
but too well forewarned, that a final interdict would
be put upon their intercourse. They were equally
well instructed, that the jealous eyes of Areskoui, and
the vindictive inspection of Nelesho, were upon them.
They covenanted, therefore, to be exceedingly
cautious
,
in soliciting, or indulging in the pleasure, or
hastily urging the effort, which was their chief
object
in joining the Shoshonee. They laid down a
plan which, whether sagacious or not, was the result
of their severest studies, the issue of which will
hereafter
appear.
At this time occurred an affecting incident, which,
though it does not necessarily belong to these annals,
ought, perhaps, to be related, as tending to throw
light upon the influence and character of the
intercourse
of the American people, with the primitive
and unsophisticated Indians. Shortly after the
adoption
of these young men into the tribe, and while they
were absent on a trapping expedition, to which it was
necessary for them at this early stage of their
habitancy
,
to join themselves to save appearances, the
New-York white wife of Hatch arrived at
Shoshonee
town from Astoria, to reclaim her truant husband.
He had been forewarned of the prospect, that his first
spouse was coming to join him. But with the natural
disinclination to think of a disagreeable affair, no
previous
arrangement had been made for this event. His
devoted and faithful red skin wife was first
admonished
of the existence of this rival in claims upon her
husband, by seeing her actually land from a periogue.
It might have been supposed, that this daughter of a
chief, by whom he had two children, would have
taken
deep umbrage, on learning this painful fact. But
the usages of the people regarded polygamy as no
crime, or as honorable, rather than otherwise. The
only limit fixed by opinion was inability to maintain
more than one wife. As Hatch was well known to be
rich, this arrival was considered by the father and
brother of the Indian wife an affair between the
husband
and the wives. The incident, that follows, is
recorded in commemoration of the deep and heroic
attachment, of which Indian women are often seen
capable, and in consequent proof of the guilt of those
white sojourners among them, who trifle with such
attachment, and abuse such confidence.
As soon as the Shoshonee wife was told of the
arrival
of the white claimant of her husband, she shed
some tears, assured him, that she was ready to offer
her the first place of love and authority, consented to
resign her charge as mistress, and only requested, that
she might remain, as a kind of servant, to take care of
her children, and share such transient marks of his
kindness, as he could spare from her favored rival.
All this she stated in a subdued and quiet tone, that
won strongly on the heart of her husband, who, in truth,
liked his Indian wife best. But the new comer was
a small, brisk, sharp-faced woman, with red hair,
a curved nose, and thin lips, who had, in bygone days
in New York, drawn forth upon Hatch the famous
proverb, touching the superior points of the gray nag.
As the petition of the red skin wife and mother was
stated to her, the object of debate stood before her,
meekly holding one of her children in one hand and
the other at the breast, looking steadily in her face with
intense interest, to divine by her looks and tones, for
her language she understood not, what fate was in
reserve
for her. The white wife required no time for
deliberation. She raised her shrill voice, and
peremptorily
insisted, as a preliminary step in the new
domestic arrangement, that her red rival should be
discharged, in her phrase, bag and baggage.
Perhaps
,
it was the first time in his life, that Hatch
blushed
in earnest, and his face glowed to the color of his
red whiskers, when he explained this hard necessity to
his Shoshonee wife, in her own speech. Obedience
in these usages is implicit and without reserve. She
once more shed silent tears, turned round, and
wistfully
surveyed her late peaceful and happy empire, as if
taking a final leave. Wiping her eyes, with her long
black locks, she then sternly walked forth, leading one
child, and holding the other to her breast. As soon
as she was abroad, she began, in the deep, monotonous
Indian death wail, to sing, `The proud white skin has
come, and my poor babes and I go to the land of
spirits
.'
Such was the burden of her strain, as she
walked
on with her charge to the Sewasserna. She
paused
a moment on the bank. She kissed her little ones,
and the tears streamed down her cheeks, while she
looked alternately in their faces, and then towards her
late residence, the domestic smoke of which was
VOL. I. 17
peacefully curling aloft. Her purpose for a moment
seemed to falter. But the lament arose strong and
full again. `We go to the land of spirits,' she said,
and threw herself into the stream, with both her
babes in her arms. Her husband and a number of
Indians had observed her departure, and divining her
purpose, had followed her at a distance. In a moment
some of the best swimmers plunged in after her.
They drew her up by the locks, holding in the
spasmodic
grasp of affection and death, fast to her babes.
The three were brought, though apparently lifeless,
to the bank. All soon gave proofs of resuscitation.
The first movement of returning life in the mother
was, to raise herself a little from her recumbent
posture
,
open the blue lips of her half expiring babe, and
give it the breast, imploring the husband not to drive
her from him. `See,' said she, `the pretty one looks
like its father. Why will you have me kill it? Only
let me remain in the house, and tend my little ones,
and I will be as a faithful slave to the proud white
skin.' It was a scene to move the hearts of the
Shoshonee
.
Tears even started under the red eye
lashes
of Hatch. A harsh, but decisive murmur from all
the Indians present, the purport of which he but too
well understood, notified him, that, in this case, he no
longer had an alternative. He uttered an oath, `that
the white wife should know her driver for this once.'
He did more. He took the eldest child in his arms,
and gallantly led on his Shoshonee spouse, now gaily
holding the other to her bosom. The Indians
followed
,
murmuring applauses. He arrived at the
house, and saluted his white wife, who had come to
the door, to learn the object of this triumphal
procession
.
`Mein Gott and Saviour,' said he, `dey will
roast me alive. You take her in, madam, well and
good; you refuse, and by mein Gott and Saviour, I
trive you off, and keep mein good red skin.' The
New York madam saw the aspect of things, and well
understood the looks and gestures of the listening
Indians. Her terrified consent was prompt and ample.
The recovered mother and children re-entered the
house, and Baptiste observed with a knowing shrug,
`Ma foi, Hatch no need go to I'infer for his purgatory.
He get him between he's two vives.' At the joyful
termination of this affair, the Indians marched off with
acclamations.
The object, for which the young men had stationed
themselves in the valley, had not escaped the
penetration
of the family of the chief. A private conclave
was held between the father and mother and son.
`What shall we do, how shall we conduct towards the
fair sons of the pale face?' Was the question of
Ellswatta
,
as he beheld the downcast countenance of his
son. `Thou canst not doubt, that they are watching
to gain the favor of Wakona, as the eagles scale aloft,
to survey their prey beneath them. Would, that the
Wahcondah had given thee a heart, my son, not to
be moved with the witching influence of the daughter
of Yensi. A warrior should have a heart too proud,
a chief should look too much towards the sun, to allow
his manhood to droop as thine. It is fit only for
squaws, and babbling men, like squaws, to prate about
beauty. Yet since the mischief has been wrought,
since thoughts of Wakona make thee always look sad,
what is to be done?' `Ellswatta, my husband, has
forgotten all, that he once said to me about my
charms,' drily said Josepha. `Have all thy fine words
passed away, as it had been a dream? Thou couldst
then talk about beauty, as fluently as a young
Spaniard
,
serenading his mistress beneath her lattice. No,
AreskouiIt is right, it is natural, and the pitying
Mother of God allows, that we should love what is
lovely. Thou shouldst rather, my husband, guide
our son on the way to win the love of Wakona, or put
forth thy power, to drive these deceitful though fair
young guests from our nation.'
`That I will never consent to have done,' replied
Areskoui. `From my parents I have inherited a
nature
too noble, to wish the favor of Wakona upon any
other terms, than her voluntary consent. Neither my
father nor my mother could counsel me, to adopt other
measures, than those of kindness and honor. If she
be inclined already to love these young men of the
fair face, what would she think of me in comparison,
were my father, my mother, or myself to resort to
violent
and cruel measures? The first movement of that
kind would forever incur for me the hate of Wakona.
All else I could endure. But her hate would be
insupportable
.
No. My purpose is fixed, as yonder
mountain. I will offer no hindrance, to their
intercourse
.
Let them exult in the light of her beauty.
Let her smile continually upon them, since the
Master
of Life will have it so; and if it be necessary, let
Areskoui die. But counsel him not, my father and
mother, to put forth the strong arm against these happy
pale faces.'
Such were the thoughts of Areskoui, in reference
to the strangers; and from that time his conduct was
observed invariably to square with his magnanimous
purpose. But the smile, that had formerly played on
his noble countenance, wholly disappeared. A
pensive
and subdued gloom was indelibly fixed there in
its stead. When he met Jessy by accident, there
was something difficult to describe in his manner. It
was not reproach; nor did it ask either love or pity.
But the conflict of different emotions, pride,
forbearance
and magnanimity imparted the predominant
coloring. Jessy interpreted it, and was infinitely more
affected than she would have been either by
entreaties
or complaints. It did not diminish her pity, to
learn, that he was often with Elder Wood; and
conversed
much and seriously with him about the truths
and mysteries of the Christian religion. The minister
was himself affected, as he remarked the gloomy
temperament
of his mind. He was often heard to declare,
that he found all empty and unsatisfactory on this side
the grave; and that if religion offered such infinite
satisfaction and joy beyond it, it became him, who was
compelled to renounce his hopes here, to enquire into
his chances in the land of souls. Elder Wood, with
the unconsciousness of perfect simplicity, proceeded
to express his surprize, what could have happened to
the young chief, in the pride of his youth and
expectations
,
to render him so dissatisfied with life.
Whoever
had marked the countenance of Jessy, alternately
pale and scarlet, would have perceived the tenor of
her thoughts.
Meanwhile the adopted guests were tasking their
powers, to acquire the necessary semblance of Indian
habits. They trapped, and hunted, however
involuntarily
,
with the best. At the points in the dashing
and precipitous mountain streams, where they
broadened
and slept in quietness, where the beavers built
their magic dams and cities, and expanded their
little
lakes in the depths of the mountain forest, they
learned to watch these sagacious and happy animals,
to ambush their domestic paths and the highways of
their towns; and, as though fortune was disposed to
smile upon their freaks, or as if she were uniformly
disposed to dispense her favors to the young and the
happy, they were singularly successful, both in their
hunting and trapping. This ingratiated them with
the Indians at once; and disappointed the hopes of
Areskoui, that their awkwardness and indolence, in
the appropriate pursuits of his people, would leave
them no consideration with the tribe on that score.
But the young men were frank, jovial, in high health,
and in furtherance of their plan, took incessant pains
17*
to be popular with the Indians, to caress their wives
and daughters, and to gain, as they eminently did gain,
the character of brave and free spirits.
Jessy and her mother exchanged words of
gratified
surprise, to perceive that the young men were
wise, to divine the proper steps in their new line of
march. Elder Wood was equally astonished. `They
could not have promised better,' he said, `as hunters
and trappers, had they been raised in Kentucky. He
had thought, in coming there, that they were only
sowing wild oats most foolishly. They had redeemed
his good opinion, and he had no doubt, that they had
asked adoption from the honest love of Indian life.'
Relations of unquestioned intimacy being once
established
with the family of William Weldon, it was
easy to draw them closer by imperceptible degrees.
To take tea with them, two or three times in a week,
was very natural. To have new books, engravings,
publications, journals and magazines brought, by every
arrival from Astoria, would be a compliment, and
give a pleasant variety to their intercourse. They
played duets most charmingly on the flute. Jessy
ordered a harp from Canton. Julius had learned but
one thing thoroughly, and that was music. He was
one of those nature taught musicians, who furnish to
phrenologists their soundest argument, that the strong
points of character and development are laid in the
unchangeable organization of the brain. He played
the harp admirably; and in teaching it to Jessy, when
he laid his own master hand upon the strings, he had
a very marked advantage over his companion, who
understood music but imperfectly, and only played
the flute. Both painted, and Jessy was, as has been
seen, an enthusiast in that pursuit. They
philosophized
,
and were misanthropic with William Weldon.
With him they found Rousseau in the right; and thus
extolled the free and independent life of the
Shoshonee
valley, as infinitely more pleasant than any thing,
which social life could offer. And they extolled their
present mode of life as a kind of antepast of paradise.
William Weldon found them rapidly drawing upon
the untouched stores of confidence, in his bosom, `and
was astonished,' as he said, `to learn, that such
handsome
young men, so spoiled in society, could thus early
become such sound and practical philosophers.' With
Yensi they held conversations upon the tea fields, the
cane patches, and the spice gardens, the pagodas and
pavillions, the cities, canals, and miracles of nature
and art, in her wonderful native country; and Yensi
allowed, in grateful return for their winning
politeness
,
`that she had admired the `red heads,' as the
Chinese call the European people, from her girlish
days.' With Elder Wood, they spake of the dignity
and the eternal obligations of the Christian religion,
and hoped soon to find a time at the foot of those
heaven-pointing and religion-inspiring mountains, to
investigate its claims, and study its duties. With
Baptiste they babbled bad French, and talked over
the everlasting chapter of the Shoshonee gossip.
With Hatch they debated the means and the
mysteries
of money getting, and the profits and per cent. of
a continued voyage from Boston to Chinafrom
China
to the North-West coastand thence with silks
and teas back to Boston. Josepha they gained,
especially
Julius, by playing the guitar, talking of
Spanish
romances, and canzonnettas, many of which
Julius
,
who was Portuguese on his father's side, could
both say, and sing.
Thus studying every character, and becoming all
things to each, they won universal favor. For variety,
they taught Jessy to dance; and oftentimes, while the
Indians held their war or rejoicing dance by
moonlight
under the sycamores and pines of William
Weldon's
grounds, did Josepha, Yensi, Jessy, the adopted
guests, and Baptiste, join in joyous accompaniment
under the shadow of the over-arching cliffs, making
the ancient valley glad with these sounds and
movements
of interior and secluded joy. From beginning
with the occupancy of two days in a week, these
parties
shortly extended to four, and imperceptibly to
every evening, save that of the sabbath. And, when
the sun began to bend his broad disk behind the
mountains
,
shedding a delicious coolness in his departure,
not only Jessy, but her mother, and even William
Weldon, from habit and the expected pleasure,
turned
their eyes in the direction of the cascade;
impatient
,
without avowing it, to see the elastic bound of
the young men, as they cleared the pawpaw hedge,
and walked up the alleys of multiflora roses. Even
Josepha and Ellswatta felt the charm of their
insinuating
manner subduing their jealousy, and would
have entered into the spirit of gladness in their
society
,
had they not too keenly felt, with what sorrow
for their son it was purchased. He too, sometimes
came generously with the rest, and strove in vain to
seem to take an interest in their pleasures.
`Well,' said the adopted guests, as they walked
alone one morning, `let us report progress in this
hopeful project of ours. We have had no chance of
being alone, and putting our scheme in operation,
with Wakona. `For my part,' said Frederic, `I find
myself sufficiently in danger, when we are surrounded
by inspection. I should not dare encounter the
fascination
alone in these charming and love inspiring
solitudes
.
Did your fancy ever picture such a shading
of glossy curls? Have you ever conceived such an
expression, such a charm of manner, at once the
endowment
of nature, and the highest reach of
refinement
?
Where did she obtain it, and how?'
`I grant you,' replied Julius, `it is a singular, what
do they call it,
lusus natur
. The enchantress, too,
has a certain pretty quaintness and rusticity, with
which she sometimes conceals her art. But the
wicked
archness, with which she parries my compliments,
and causes me to doubt, whether she is making me a
study, or a mockery, absolutely provokes me.'
Frederic, in turn, proceeded to discuss the
enraptured
glance of her eye. He expatiated on the air
of saintly innocence, with which she manifested her
glowing approval of whatever was generous and
noble
,
in the moral and intellectual scale. He lauded
her ever-changing versatility, in varying the shades
of her lovelinessand closed by affirming, that she
not only filled out his
beau ideal
, of whatever
imagination
had associated with beauty and loveliness, but
infinitely transcended it.
The other, not to be outdone in this strain, with a
slight air of ridicule thrown over what he said,
expatiated
on the same text in terms of the most
extravagant
admiration.
They finally interrupted this series of alternate
eulogy, each by laughing at the other, and regretting
that they had no umpire to determine which of the
two, had sung her praises best. `But,
au fait
,' said
Julius, `what are her beauty and perfections to us?
Born among these Indians, among them she will die.
With all her seeming polish and high breeding, and
astonishing tact, touching what, it would be thought,
could have been only the forming and teaching of
society, she is clearly an Indian at heart. Did you
not observe what an infernally melting and pitying
look she gave that haughty looking Areskoui, last
evening, when he parted from us? I could have
knocked the teeth out of the brute's head. I admire,
if she thinks it civil treatment, to bestow such looks
upon another, and that other an Indian, in our
presence
.
Were we all three on our knees before the
beautiful rustic, and she compelled to select one of us,
I dare swear Areskoui would be the man. Who of
us, think you, Frederic, would be her second choice?'
`You,' replied the other, `clearly, if she chose by
the eye, at present. But me, pardon my
presumption
,
when she shall have been acquainted with us
longer, and known us better.' `Indeed, my very polite
and dear friend and Mentor, Mr. Frederic, I say
again, you are most soothingly flattering, and I feel
my spirit warmed to attempt my best efforts to bring
the alternative to experiment.'
`Is it fact, Julius, that we are verging from jest to
earnest in this talk? I should judge so, just now. If
it be, we had best drop the subject altogether. Allow
me to explain. You are too much a libertine, in
principles
and conduct, to win the affections of such a
girl as Jessy Weldon. I generously forewarn you of
the advantage, you are giving me. Do you not
remark
something about her of sanctity mingled with
her gaiety, that awes and perplexes one? When I
catch the calm sanctity of her eye, I despise myself
for ever having had a low, impure, or unworthy
thought. It strikes me, as a mystery, almost a
fearful
one, that we should have found such an
astonishing
girl in such a place. We have all read of such
personages in romance; but here we have found the
living model, that outruns all my imaginings; and we
have come from a remote and desert sea shore to the
barriers of nameless mountains, to contemplate this
marvel among an undescribed tribe of Indians. On
my conscience, Julius, as I have looked on this
beautiful
vision, I have felt my own hands, to determine,
if I were not under the influence of enchantment.'
`In truth, most worthy and most pious Frederic, I
design to woo her for mere earthly love, and you may
play pipe and whistle to entertain us, if you choose.
Or you shall drive up the cattle and pen the flocks of
Areskoui, if he marries her, and you may
undoubtedly
be privileged, to carry the quarteroon children for
them; and learn, the while, to sing psalms for Elder
Wood. This copper devil Areskoui, too, is a marvel
to me. If I were he, though, I would give my Indians
a wink, and deprive both of us of the honor of our
crowns. He is either an immeasurable blockhead, or
magnanimous beyond all my conceptions, to allow us
such opportunities with his idol. But suppose,
Frederic
,
she should be pleased with one of us, suppose it
were you, seriously, what would you do in the case?
How would you dispose of your conquest? Do you
remain of the same opinion, as formerly?'
`Sir, I will answer you in a moment, I love this
daughter of Yensi sincerely, and honorably. If she
would return my love, and share my humble
condition
,
I would be content to live with her in the
gloomiest
spot on the globe, and earn my subsistence by my
daily toil. But this valley seems to me the
pleasantest
spot on the whole earth. I would marry her, be a
son to her parents, and a peaceful and unambitious
hunter and trapper among the Shoshonee. Or
perhaps
,
on second thought, with such a wife, I would
persuade her parents to return with me to my own
dear country, and the possession of such a treasure
would give me faith and industry, to remove
mountains
.'
`Well done, Master Frederic Mentor, shall we not
sing a psalm, after such a collect? But we are both
of us wandering from the main point in hand. How
are we to bring about some interviews of greater
privacy
with her?' This question led to a long
discussion
,
ending in a well devised plan, to obtain her
society
with only the attendance of her half-breed girl,
who resided in her father's family, as a domestic, and
who, from her smartness, had been selected as a kind
of companion for her.
Another part of their project took hopeful effect. It
was to fit up the bower on the shore of the blue lake.
All the skill and industry of the Indians were silently
put in requisition for a number of days; during which
circumstances called her away from it. Under the
direction and taste of the two companions, aided by
the labor and money of Hatch, a neat pavillion,
impervious
to the rain, and finely covered within with
Chinese
hangings adorned with landscapes, was fitted up.
They then invited William Weldon's family to take
tea there. All their paintings and drawings and books
had been transported there, and all was charmingly
arranged with reference to the purposes of a reading,
painting and music room. It had been the work of a
week, and the progress had been kept wholly a secret.
The delighted surprize of Jessy, when she saw the
magic
erection, may be imagined. The face of William
Weldon became once more animated with the sunny
smile of pleased astonishment. All the accustomed
inmates of the family, with the dark and frowning face
of Nelesho among them, were there; and a beautiful
summer evening passed away pleasantly. In the
course of the evening, it became the subject of remark,
how much more pleasant and convenient that place
would be for painting, than William Weldon's
habitation
,
where part of the valley prospect was bounded
by the arching bluff, that rose directly in the rear of
it. The father was in a mood of uncommon
cheerfulness
.
The countenance of Areskoui fell at the
proposition
.
But, may it be told, or forborne? The heart
of Jessy was in the plan. The bower, rude as it had
been, had always been her favorite spot for meditation
and painting. It was doubly so, when it was fitted up
with taste and magnificence, with all the books and
paintings and engravings, which the young men could
furnish. They informed her at the same time, that a
much larger collection had been ordered. It need
scarcely be added, that what Jessy wished, she so
arranged, that her fond parents consented. Thither,
then, her own drawing apparatus was removed; and
there she was, henceforward, to receive her lessons
from Julius on the harp.
Sometimes the parents, sometimes Areskoui and
his parents, and generally Elder Wood, accompanied
them. But, as they had planned, and as it happened,
they were frequently left to themselves, with no other
companion than the half breed domestic girl; and as
she understood little English, her presence had no
effect
,
to repress the confidential character of the
conversation
.
The first time that they were together there,in
pursuit
of her plan of taking lessons, Elder Wood and
her father had walked with them to the bower. They
had commenced their several pursuits with a
seriousness
,
that left them no attention for the father or the
minister. They both alleged an engagement; and
remarking, that they were of no use there, charged
the girl to remain with her mistress, and be home at
early tea, and left them.
The hearts of the young men throbbed, until they
saw the father and the minister fairly out of sight.
Nor may it be presumed, that Jessy Weldon
perceived
herself alone with these two fine young men
for the first time, without similar palpitations. Each
was silent, as might have been expected, for some
time. The half-breed girl busied herself in weaving
eglantines in the glossy locks of her mistress, and
singing
wild snatches of Indian songs.
The three were painting, and two were stealing
looks from the landscape, the mountains and the sky,
upon the fair face of their pupil. Jessy threw down
her pencil, in seeming embarrassment. `Your labor
is lost, gentlemen,' she said, `in fitting up this charming
place. I cannot paint here. I look upon that
beautiful
vale, its deep green, the wood-fringed and
winding
VOL. I. 18
river, the columns of smoke, the flocks and
herds, these hundred blue peaks, those eagles,
seafowls
,
and that sky, and so many thoughts rush upon
my mind, that I am unable to seize the right one. I
wish for new powers, of which I am thus taught the
need. I am obliged to throw down my pencil, and
give up my mind to the thousand mingled meditations,
that crowd, one upon the other. I see clearly, that
my own dear home is a better place for painting.
The view indeed is more confined. But I have
better
chances to collect my thoughts, and catch
individual
features. Look now, gentlemen. Who could
think of fixing with the pencil, that mass of rolling
mist, that half wraps the dark peaks of yonder
mountain
?
Look at the enchanted world, that sleeps, as
if a thousand leagues below us, in those depths of the
lake! Mark the shades of the clouds, sailing off in
the distance, and, as they pass, scattering sunshine
behind them in the hollows of those far mountains!
The beautiful Sewasserna, too, see how it winds away,
seeking its devious channel among the mountains to
the sea, and bearing my thoughts on its bosom to the
great ocean! Hear the eagles scream, the heards low,
and the birds sing in mingled harmony. What a bass
in that deep hollow roar of the winds, rushing down
the defiles of the mountains! Who, that had ever
seen, and felt nature, would sigh for the poor
contrivances
of art! Indeed I am sensible, that you will
never teach me to paint in this place.'
`For my part,' said Julius, throwing down an
outline
,
evidently intended to be the form and
countenance
of Jessy, `I find myself just as unable to class,
and fill up my conceptions, as you do yours. Every
thing is beautifulsome parts of the view too much
so. But it is certainly a fine place for music, if not
for painting.' So saying, he laid his hand on the harp,
and swept its chords with his own appropriate
inspiration
,
while Frederic accompanied the strain with
his flute.
When the piece closed, Jessy evinced by the rapt
attention, which she had given to it, that she entered
sufficiently into the music, if not the painting, of the
afternoon. A silence of some length again ensued.
It was broken by Julius. `This precious time is
passing
in silence. We two have been contriving
laboriously
,
and waiting patiently, for this interview; and
now we seem neither of us to know what to say.'
`Indeed,' she answered Julius, `I am sorry for that.
You ought to have been perfectly aware, that nothing
may be uttered here, which might not as well have
been said at any time within the walls of my father's
dwelling.' `Certainly, Miss Weldon,' he replied,
`much as you seem of another order of being, you
cannot
be so wholly devoid of human sympathies, as not
to admit, that we may innocently, and properly
advance
much here, which we would not choose to say
in the presence, for instance, of Elder Wood, or
Areskoui
,
if he comprehended our language.' She
answered
,
`plain and simple thoughts and words only are
in keeping with this scenery and the humble
personage
before you. I comprehend not what you mean,
by classing me with another order of beings. We
know only of two kinds here, the simple inhabitants
of this valley, and the little white men of the
mountains
,
deemed not a respectable rank of existences, in
the estimation of the Shoshonee. I hope you do not
class me in that order.' `I see, Miss Weldon,' said
Julius, `that we shall never reach our purpose in this
way. Have you not divined our object, in
domesticating
ourselves in this valley?' `Indeed, Sir, I have not
felt it necessary to bring the sickly hue of thought
over my face, by entering into any deep or painful
enquiries
on the subject. I have been willing to hold
the thing explained, as it is on the face of it. I thought
it probable, that you were two persons, who could be
spared without any particular inconvenience, from
your place in societythat your time hung heavy on
your handsand that you came here, as the poet
makes a certain personage whistle, `for want of
thought.' `Miss Weldon is pleased to be merry at our
expense,' said Frederic, thoughtfully. `We can both
assure you, that, senseless and wanting in plan and
self-respect, as we may have seemed to you, we have
an object, and a serious one.' `Very probably,
gentlemen
.
I am surely inclined to a charitable
interpretation
.
I have not considered the matter deeply. I
think, you would not have come here, to see men and
cities, to study laws and modes of government, or the
professions of law, medicine or divinity, to obtain fame
or wealth; or to strike out any particular career. I
do not deem, that you will ever distinguish yourselves,
as trappers or hunters, the only professions, that it
would seem, you could have thought of fully
acquiring
here. I am passionately fond of music. I should
be delighted to learn that of you. You can improve
my painting. I am selfish enough, to be pleased at
the prospect of such advantages. But allow me to be
frank, peremptory, and, I may add, final, upon the
terms, upon which we are to meet hereafter. You
must always speak to me, when alone, as you would,
were my parents present, and treat Areskoui with
undissembled consideration. We must not often meet
in this way; and then our conversation must be
general
.
Such are the terms. Will you ratify the treaty,
and conform to every tittle upon your honor? I am as
peremptory, as an empress, if you do not, and you
never
meet me alone again.'
The young men yielded a kind of awkward consent,
as they exchanged glances, and felt in the necessity of
such a constant restraint imposed, what, perhaps,
piqued
their interest and curiosity, more than the most
unrestrained intimacy. The afternoon passed in such
pursuits, as befitted the restraints prescribed. It
would be absurd to suppose, that such interviews had
not charms for her, as well as them; and under
different
pretexts they were repeated, until the idea of
danger
,
or impropriety, was gradually obliterated from her
mind and that of her parents, according to their
anticipations
.
In fact, they marked the respectful
forbearance
and rigidly decorous deportment of the
young men, noted nothing reprehensible in it, and
perceived
,
that it brought at once instruction and
pleasure
to their daughter; and they rather encouraged,
than repressed it. The espionage of Areskoui and
Nelesho was a drawback only of occasional
recurrence
.
They were ready to endure the restraint, for
the sake of the pleasure of being at times free from
observation. Reserve was gradually banished; and
conversations were incidentally and naturally
introduced
,
which had verged to subjects and points, that
would have been interdicted at first. So certain it is,
that every where the natural order of things will
take place; the most rigid resolves against it
notwithstanding
.
The respective character of the two young
men was marked constantly with stronger
development
.
The good sense, native integrity and moral
dignity of the one gradually disclosed. The covert
advances of ingenious and seductive flattery, the
insidious
approaches of licentious and unprincipled
selfishness
in the other, stole upon her almost in
imperceptible
progress. At first she had felt the natural
juvenile admiration of his perfect face and form; and
the high polish of his insinuating manners. The stern
and uncompromising decision, and the silent dignity
of the other, steadily acquired that preference with
her, which in a virtuous, instructed and regulated
mind, moral always obtains over mere corporeal
beauty.
18*
If the young men had commenced this project in
play, it soon became to them a matter of sober and
absorbing interest. Constant and daily intercourse
with the daughter of Yensi, and deeper acquaintance
with the treasures of her mind and heart, kindled the
first impulses of admiration in the heart of Frederic
into deep and impassioned love. He painfully
discovered
,
too late, that his hopes and his happiness for
life had been rashly committed in this youthful freak
of folly. But with the insane calculation, generally
inspired in such cases, the deep draughts, he had
already
drunk, only inspired an unnatural thirst for
more. One day after another wore slowly away in
the semblance of pursuit and employment, until the
usual time when he was again with Jessy; and then,
although interdicted, equally by her explicit words,
and by his own fears and humble estimates of his
standing in her good opinion from any, but general
conversation, he saw her, was satisfied, and respired
happily in her presence. The other, too, although he
might not be said to be capable of love, in the high
and proper sense of the term, for the first time in his
life imbibed a passion amounting to pain, constantly
accumulating power, which in a more principled mind
would have been called love. Without
understanding
very definitely his own motives, or questioning
his own ends, he felt as restless a desire for her
society
,
as the other; at the same time mingled with
infinitely
more of the bitterness of jealousy, and the
conflicts of wounded vanity.
When Areskoui came among the rest, he was
uniformly
reserved; though he intermitted none of his
former
courtesies, nor omitted any opportunities to
perform
kind actions, for her family. He evidently acted
upon the presumption, that he was considered an
unwelcome
guest. Jessy one day kindly inquired of him,
why they saw him more seldom than formerly? `Thou
smilest,' he replied, `thou smilest, Wakona, on thy
brother as formerly; but do not I know, that thy heart
is not in the smile? Thy brother understands too
well, that thy thoughts are with thy new fair faced
friends of a day. I neither blame thee, nor repine.
It is the misfortune of the red men, that they know not
to move pleasant sounds from instruments, nor the
flattering words, nor the polished and dissembling
ways of the pale face. But I will watch thee from
afar, Wakona. The time may come, when thou wilt
need the heart and the arm of thy brother, and then
thou shalt know, who loved thee best. Until that
time, thy brother will redouble his diligence, in
discharging
his duties to his own people.'
Meanwhile the elements of all degrees of
excitement
,
that could have been called forth in the annals
of a polished and civilized community, were strongly
fermenting, and in constant action in the republic of
Ellswatta. While Julius, Frederic and Jessy, with
her gay and unconscious attendant girl, as a duenna,
had their long walks, in this secluded retreat, their
interesting conversation, their concerts, and trial of
skill at painting; while the young gentlemen recited,
or played duets on their flutes with her, Areskoui
performed
his warrior-duties, at one time planning
employment
and pursuit for the restless spirits of his own
tribe, and at another counteracting in secrecy and
silence the plottings and machinations of Nelesho.
He dwelt in fancy upon the enjoyments of Jessy and
her friends, and meditated within himself gloomy
thoughts, and suffered so much the more bitterly the
tortures of jealousy and hopeless love, as he said less,
and struggled more to conceal his feelings. The
unhappy
young chief was precisely at that crisis of
thought and of suffering, which would have caused
him to pour his complaints to echo in song, had he
been trained to books, and the cunning and clerkship
of the white race. Such thoughts, as beseemed the
relation, he did indeed commit to the faithful and
untiring
ear of his mother. Never mother more
affectionately
loved a son. They talked over his prospects
and his despair together. She, too, had felt the charm
of the appearance and manners of the young men.
They had paid particular court to her. She could
point to no part of their conduct, that had not been
soothing and respectful. She admitted the natural
influence of their beauty, their complection, their
advantages
of education, and the observances of the
whites. But they were humble, for aught that
appeared
,
and undistinguished. Had they the port of
command? Could they guide the storm of battle?
Were they born to authority? Had they the lofty
look and noble form of her dear son? Sometimes
Wakona seemed to have her share of ambition and
pride. Would it be nothing to be wife of a chief of
two nations? Such were the words of Josepha to
her son. She told him, that she could not longer
endure
,
to see him daily drinking the wormwood and
gall of jealousy and hopeless love. She spoke of
philtres and medicated drinks, that in her own
country
,
and in her young days, she had been taught by
women learned in the mystery of the art of love, were
of potency to inspire corresponding love in the man
or maiden, who should drink of them. She assured
him, that she had a thousand times fallen on her
knees, and implored the Virgin mother of God, by
all her own tenderness of heart, to have pity upon
the sorrows of the mother of an only son, and inspire
mutual love for that son in the bosom of Wakona.
Then waxing in wrath with her own theme, she
counselled
him if nothing would influence her inflexible
bosom, either to destroy his rivals, or to fly with her
to the Blackfeet, compel her companionship, if not
her love, and forever leave his own tribe.
The son was deeply affected with the tender
interest
of his mother; but he assured her, that since he
could not follow the noble counsels of his father, and
rise above this passion, he could not sink to listen for
a moment to such unworthy thoughts from his mother.
While they held earnest conversation together, the
young gentlemen, accompanied by Jessy and her
attendant
girl, were seen gaily directing their steps for
the bower. Josepha turned pale at the sight. Her
son cast a glance upon her countenance. `My
mother
,'
he said, `I have heard speak of Him, whom I
know not, but whose name and religion I revere; of
Him who felt no revenge towards those, who caused
Him to hang bleeding on the tree.' The mother
looked upwards, crossed herself, and bowed her head
submissively. Her purposes of revenge were
abandoned
,
and she murmured to herself, as her son walked
silently away, `he is far more of a Christian than his
mother.'
In the mean time an incident occurred, which
produced
laughter even among the stern and musing
Indians
,
for the most part not much addicted to
merriment
.
It operated to diversify a little the
monotonous
tenor of present events among the Shoshonee.
The tribes had been for some time occupied in tilling
their grounds. Even the customary intercourse with
Astoria had been in a measure suspended; a single
periogue only, laden for the young men, having
arrived
thence for some time. There had been no
striking
amours terminating in quarrels; no news of their
enemies, the Blackfeet; and if Nelesho brooded
revolt
,
it was without any overt manifestations. They
were, therefore, in pressing want of the customary
materials for gossip. The festival of the corn dance,
when the first green corn was fit for eating, had taken
place, and had been celebrated with the usual
splendor
and rejoicing. The wonted sounds of dancing
and feasting had been heard. The whole had been
concluded with a religious exercise by Elder Wood.
The first fruits of his ministry had been gathered.
An Indian girl, it was thought, had fostered designs
upon him, as a husband; but more intimate
acquaintance
with him had ended in her conversion and
baptism
.
On an occasion so new, solemn and affecting,
he delivered a more eloquent and impressive
discourse
than he had ever pronounced before. It was
free from sectarian views, pathetic and exciting, for
the reason, that the fountains of feeling in his own
heart were deeply moved. Both Julius and Frederic
had remarked, that Jessy and the young chief had
shown strong marks of being impressed; while Nelesho
arose at the close of the discourse, when the
customary
permission had been given for any one to make
remarks
,
or enter objections, against what had been
said. `He was averse,' he said, `to these innovations.
He wished to see no new religion. The Wakondah
would look upon them in wrath, if the red men turned
away from him to the God of the pale face. The
turning
seemed begun. He feared, the superstition would
spread. He had seen some of his young warriors shed
tears, like squaws. For his part, he should abstain
from these meetings in future; and he hoped, that all,
who were in favor of the good old ways, would follow
his example.'
The collection returned, as usual, some approving,
some blaming, some deeply affected, and some taking
part with Nelesho. Baptiste, always a standing lover
and gallant for all the undistinguished Indian girls of
the nation, had been observed, at the close of the
services
to walk off, in earnest dialogue with T'selle'nee,
or
the Piony
, the pretty daughter of Mon-son-sah, or
the Spotted Panther
a vindictive, proud and fierce
Shienne
warrior, who doted on this, his only child.
Whatever
injury or insult was offered the belle of round
and vermillion rouged cheek, does not appear. But
next morning, it was the current gossip among the
fair of the nation, that T'selle'nee had had a
medicine
dream. At any rate, she was reported to be in
tears, shut up under the customary and severest
interdiction
of Indian usage, and her cheeks painted
black. There was great trouble in the wigwam. The
fierce father ventured through the interdict, and
forced his daughter to confession. The story of the
wrongs and injuries of Baptiste proved to be a
medicine
secret. But the smooth-tongued and voluble
Canadian had vague intimations, that this affair was
likely to bring no good to him. Truth was, as a
general
lover, he had the reputation of being particularly
slippery and unworthy of confidence. Various girls
had made particular calculation upon him, for a
husband
.
But Baptiste had a manifest preference for
being a general lover, and a specific aversion to
matrimony
in particular.
Whoever among this people has had a dream of
sufficient import, to cause the dreamer to wear black
paint, and to proclaim an interdict, becomes for the
time a subject of universal speculation and remark.
The general whisper, especially among the women,
was, what has Baptiste done, and what has caused the
interdict of T'selle'nee?
Mon-son-sah, meanwhile, was not idle. The
deepest
indignation of his burning spirit was called forth.
The frequent amours and infidelities of Baptiste were
circulated, and generally not at all to his advantage,
by the Indian post office establishment, the female
tongues. A medicine outrage and infidelity of his,
touching a Shoshonee girl, was blazoned with many
a minute circumstance of wanton cruelty. `What
right,' they said `had the proud and babbling pale
face to conduct after this fashion towards the red
skin girls?' `They would learn him to repent such
courses.' The cunning young T'selle'nee, though
interdicted, and of course supposed to be unable to
see or converse with any one, was, in fact, at the
bottom
of all this. The result of the long brooded
mischief
for poor Baptiste was at length disclosed to the
day.
Hatch was the envoy of Mon-son-sah to Baptiste
Dettier, to make known to him the purposes, that
were settled in respect to his case. Hatch, Dutch
though he was, enjoyed a comfortable broad joke, to
a luxury. His internal enjoyment was concealed
under
an elongated and tristful visage, which seemed
by its gravity to carry the fate of an empire.
Baptiste
,
in passing, heard him call him to stop, with a
pale face and palpitating heart. Baptiste seemed
disposed to walk on. `Will you stop, Mynheer
Baptiste
,'
said the Dutchman, with a visage of mysterious
importance? `Perhaps you will find it your interest,
to hear what I have to say to you.' `Vell, sare,' said
Baptiste, stopping, and squaring himself, `suppose
you tell me, vat for you stop me from mine
promenade
?
Is it von mighty dem big ting, dat you hab to
tell me?' `Oh no, Mynheer Baptiste, it is not great
matter. It only conzarns your life. Sacre!
Monsieur
Dutchman,' cried Baptiste, shrugging and
turning
pale; `Spose, you tink it von mighty dem leet ting,
to concern my life.' `Sacre! Monsieur Dutchman,
vat for make you look so dem big? I pray you, sare,
speak out vat for you stop me?' The Dutchman
continued
to economize the luxury of his joke, as long as
possible; and proceeded in his customary dialect, and
with the most perfect
sang froid
, to ask him, if he had
ever known such an Indian demoiselle, as T'selle'nee?
`Sare, vat for you axe me dat? Tis mine own affair,
sare!' `Well, Baptiste, they say, she has had a dream,
and that her face is painted as black, as a thunder
cloud. It is common report, that the matter closely
concerns you. At any rate, the Spotted Panther is
not to be trifled with, and he takes a deep interest in
the business. You know the Spotted Panther?' `Yes,
Sare, dat garcon is one dem farouche villain, Sacre!'
`Perhaps you like his daughter, better?' `Sacre! no.
She is von demwhat you call him in Hinglees?'
`Never mind. She will make you the better wife for
that. I have an errand to you from the Spotted
Panther.' `You make me frissonne all over my body,'
said Baptiste, looking deadly pale. `I have it in
charge from the Spotted Panther, to ask you,
Baptiste
,
if you are disposed to marry T'selle'nee, as soon
as she is out of her black paint and her dream? They
say she loves you to distraction.' `Sez bien,' replied
Baptiste, giving his wonted shrug of self
complacency
;
`so do twentee oder demoiselles of dese dem
sauvages
.
Dat all for vat you stop me?' `No. I am
commissioned only to propose to you the simple
question
;
do you choose to marry T'selle'nee, or not? and
you are to let me report an immediate answer.' `
Parbleu
!
Monsieur Dutchman. Spose, I say no?' `You
will hear the consequences, and then I will say him
no, if you wish it.' `Vell, Sare, vat are de big
consequence
if I say no? Tis von dem farouche affair, ca!'
`He proposes you one of two alternatives, to marry
his daughter, or be roasted alive at a slow fire. It is
no great matter,after all. The beautiful T'selle'nee,
or a roasting, that's the alternative.' `Tis von dem
what you call him, alternateeve. O mon Dieu! Mon
Dieu!' cried Baptiste, crossing himself, and seeming
in an agony`You dem Dutchman have no heart on
your body, or you no tell me dat dem word, and half
grin your teeth all the time, sacre! You call him leet
matter to roast von Christian, like a pig, sacre!'
`Why, certainly, you don't think it so great a thing
to be roasted? You know, Baptiste, that an Indian
smokes his pipe, and sings songs, and tells stories, and
VOL. I. 19
provokes his roasters, and thinks it little more than a
comfort to be roasted.' `O ciel!' cried Baptiste,
apparently
feeling faint at the horror of the idea. `You
are von dem hard heart Dutchman, to make sport of
dis farouche affair.' `Still, Baptiste, something must
be done. You know the Spotted Panther is not a
personage to be trifled with. Have you made up
your mind for your answer?' `Tis von dem sommaire
business, ca! O mon Dieu, aidez moi. Oui, Oui.
I vill marree dis dem crapeau. Spose, how like dem
fool you talk, that it be von leet ting to be roast.
Certainment, me no make experimong.' `Very good,'
answered Hatch, with the same unmoved calmness.
`Then we need not discuss the matter of roasting at
all. I thought you would prefer the wife. But you
will please tell me the very words, I am to report to
the Spotted Panther.' `O mon Dieu,' cried Baptiste,
wringing his hands. `Tis trop dur, a ting tres
miserable
.
Me love all de demoiselles. Dey all love me.
Tis ver hard affair, to tie me up to von dem crapeau,
like un chien in a string.' `Are these the words, you
wish me to carry back to the Spotted Panther?' `No,
certainment, no. You tell that sauvage gentilhomme,
vid my best complimens, that I am trop sensible of
de great honneur, which his belle fille hav don me.
Spose his belle fille no say that word to me fuss, den
I tell her, I offer my love and my devotions and my
heart wid von satisfaction infini, and dat I lead her
to the altare with great plaisir, sacre!'
Hatch omitted the last word, and reported all the
rest with great fidelity. The invincible solemnity of
the Dutchman's narrative gave greater zest to the
enjoyment
of the Indians, who all knew, amidst these
forced compliments, what a bitter pill matrimony was
to such an indiscriminate gallant.
T'selle'nee came out of her interdict at once, on
learning which alternative Baptiste had chosen. Her
black paint was washed away, and she asked but a
short notice, to be ready for marriage. The wedding
was got up with great eclat, equally to gratify the
pride of Mon-son-sah, and the vanity of Baptiste. It
was a long struggle in the mind of the bride-groom,
whether the ceremony should be performed by a
medicine
man of the Indians, or by his heretical
companion
in hunting and trapping, for whom, in those
relations, he entertained a great esteem. But his
predilection for the modes of the whites finally carried
it over his orthodoxy. Elder Wood had acquired
considerable and growing influence among the
Indians
;
and they gave full consent, that he should
perform
the ceremony, as near as might be, after the
American mode. That nothing might be wanting, in
point of state, Baptiste waited upon the young
gentlemen
,
with the `totem' of T'selle'nee, and his own
coat of arms, which they were requested to paint, and
have ready for inspection on the bridal occasion. The
Indians are as fond of shows and festivals, as the
people
of Paris. A vast concourse of the two nations
assembled, to see Baptiste lead his red skin `crapeau,'
as he always called her, except in presence of the
Indians
,
to the altar. Buffalo tongues, fresh elk meat,
and smoked salmon graced the rustic table of
Monson-sah's
marriage feast. As he was comparatively
rich, and of consideration, the appliances of artificial
joy were not wanting. The mingled glee and envy,
with which the Shoshonee girls regarded the result
of the fortunate dream of the bride, the solemn
gravity
,
with which the Indians regarded the forced
politeness
and apparent satisfaction of Baptiste, the deep
seriousness and sacerdotal authority, with which
Elder
Wood united them in holy wedlock,
a la mode
Kentuckaise
, and the awkward efforts of T'selle'nee to
fill up the outline of deportment, marked out for her
by her husband, gave the whole scene an air of
ridiculous
gravity, which had the happiest power to create
that internal laughter of the mind, the only species
that is medicinal.
A circumstance, that deserves to be noted, was,
that as soon as Baptiste was married, he became at
once as distinguished for a disposition to lay up
money
,
and become snug and comfortable in
circumstances
,
as he had been indifferent and reckless about
property before. It did not appear, that T'selle'nee
was not happy in her husband, or that she ever
evinced
jealousy. She had no interdicts afterwards, and
the salutary dread, which Baptiste had of his
vindictive
and high spirited father-in-law, and of the
unseemly
operation of being roasted alive, had a most
moralizing
issue, in limiting the visible range of his amours.
When the white people wished to enjoy the utmost
luxury of his shrug, it was only to compliment him
upon his fair spouse, and his particular matrimonial
comforts.
The materials are wanting for a series of annals of
all, that passed within the green precincts of the
valley
of the Shoshonee, during this era. The historian,
who should be able to delineate with fidelity the
incidents
transpiring, and the passions and motives in
operation
between these ridges of the Rocky Mountains,
would produce a picture of human thought and
action
,
as really interesting, as the history of all the
Russias, modern Europe, or the rise and decline of
the Roman empire. The Indian belles painted
themselves
with the same beating bosom, the same proud
dreams of conquest, and the same complacent
industry
,
with which the city toast finishes her toilette in
her boudoir. The young warriors, albeit there are
philosophers who gravely assert that they have not a
temperament to love like the whites, planned their
amours, and pursued their objects with the keenest
sagacity, developed their ambition in caucus, and, in
their jealousy or their wrath, threatened the knife and
single combat, just like the same given number of idle
and useless dandies in civilized life. Elder Wood
rose in his unwalled temple, under the covert of the
rustling leaves of the white armed sycamores, to
preach to these simple people, with feelings of the
same general cast, with which the bishop of London
makes his inaugural address, or the pope of Rome
gives the annual benediction
urbi et orbi
. To them
this valley was the whole world, and the events of the
reign of Ellswatta as important, as the intrigues of the
court of Nicholas of Russia. Within these narrow
precincts were love and ambition and vanity and
traccasserie
,
and backbiting, and anecdote and scandal.
Infants came wailing into life, and hoary warriors left
it with satiety of what it offers. Sickness and sorrow,
good fortune and joy, ambition, wars and rumors of
wars, Indian politics and projects, in short, the
miniature
history of an empire, was here. Let not the
favorites
of fortune, in the great world, exult as though
they were the people, and all, that concerned life,
would die with them. The short and simple annals
of the Shoshonee are those of a world.
CHAPTER VII.
She sleeps alone! She sleeps alone!
But yearly is her grave turf drest;
And still the autumn vines are thrown,
In annual wreaths around her breast,
And still the sighing autumn grieves,
And strews the hallowed spot with leaves.
M. P. F.
Projects
ripened, meanwhile, in the intercourse
between the two adopted guests of the Shoshonee and
the family of William Weldon. The Indian hunter
traced the haunts of the deer, elk or mountain sheep
19*
in the depths of the forest, or the gorge of the
mountain
.
The trapper repaired under the covert of night
to the secluded lakes, where the beavers had built
their amphibious cities. Jessy had finally fixed her
abiding estimates of her daily companions. Blinded
at first by the fine person and specious manners of
Julius, perhaps influenced in some degree by the
studied
richness and elegance of his dress, she had paid
the natural tribute of juvenile impulse to these
advantages
.
But her strong perception of character soon
disclosed to her his innate want of principle, his
narrowness
of heart, and his cold blooded selfishness.
She saw, that self gratification, at whatsoever risk or
expense, or howsoever procured, was the simple and
single motive of his pursuit. She was still struck
with the elegance of form, the beauty of countenance,
the grace of manner, the polished deportment and
quickness of tact, which she was sensible the society
of the great world only could give; but the
superficial
admiration, the involuntary homage of a young
female eye to these external attractions were
constantly
giving way to the higher ascendency of intellectual
and moral worth, which was imperceptibly raising
her estimation of Frederic. She began to discover,
that his seeming sternness was principle; that his
silence
resulted from the self criticism of a highly
disciplined
mind; that his moral courage and capacity
of self control were great, and that when he did speak,
it was always wisely and to the purpose. She
observed
,
that his estimates of character were clear and
just, that his judgment was ripe, and generally
dictated
the true and right in action. When he bestowed
an attention, it had the value, as of coming from the
heart, and as paid on reflection, and as a felt debt. A
compliment from him came with the flattering
unction
that it was not intended as such, but as the
simple
tribute of truth. Her eye soon learned to trace
with more pleasure the harsher and stronger lines of
thought in his manly countenance, than the perfect
model of unmeaning beauty in the other. His words
were remembered. His kind remarks were
treasured
as the testimonies of a sort of external
conscience
.
Yensi was slower in reaching the same issue. She
had at first, with her daughter, paid a like tribute to
the personal beauty of Julius. A thousand trifling
circumstances, none of them weighing much singly,
but together turning the scales, settled her estimate
of him. To William Weldon he was simply
indifferent
.
There were no points of union in their
temperaments
and dispositions, and he gave himself no
trouble
to study his character. His thinly veiled
contempt
of religion, in every profession and form,
procured
the silent, but cordial dislike of Elder Wood.
Areskoui had viewed him at first with the bitterness
of invidious and jealous comparison of his advantages
of person. To this was soon added dislike, the
natural
repulsion of good to bad, a worthy to an unworthy
mind.
The consequence was, the gradual assorting of the
elective attraction of like to like, began to take place
among the inmates of the valley. Kind feeling and
something like friendship began to grow up between
Frederic, Elder Wood and Areskoui. No rupture
had yet taken place between the two adopted guests,
but any keen observer could have remarked a gradual
shyness, and an increasing distrust of each other.
Whereas Baptiste, Julius, Nelesho and Hatch, were
seen imperceptibly to assimilate, and to connect and
draw round them, by the ties of common feeling, a
party of the more reckless Indians from the two tribes.
When a trapping party made an excursion, this
division
of the whites moved off with the Shienne, while
the others as naturally associated with Areskoui, and
his faithful Shoshonee.
Nelesho, without any sanguine hopes, after the
prize of the salmon fishery, had, according to
prescribed
custom, waited on the father of Jessy, and
solicited
her as designed for him by the Wakondah, in
the success of that evening. Neither words nor
deliberation
were needed; and he received from father
and daughter an unqualified refusal. He again
imprecated
the evil influence of the `little white men of
the mountains,' in half audible murmurs, and, as
appeared
in the sequel, henceforward transferred his
claims to Julius.
It was not until after some time, that things had
found their bearings in this secluded society. The
self complacency of Julius was as slow to be
enlightened
as the unassuming modesty and the unaffected
humility of the other. According to the stipulated
arrangement between the young men, as far as might
be, without making their purpose known to her, each
allowed the other equal and alternate opportunities to
converse with her, and have his chances of gaining
her good will. When any circumstance engaged her
in conversation with the one, the other by the terms
of the compact, fixed himself intently in some pursuit,
which left the conversation undivided, and
unmolested
to the other. Frederic loved intensely, in the
energy of a first born passion; and felt all the natural
diffidence and distrust of such a passion. In presence
of the beloved object, he became timid, silent, reserved,
and showed to less advantage, than in any other place.
This restraint and distance was, in consequence,
interpreted
by her to indicate any feeling but love.
The other, associating with her daily, his pride and
self consequence piqued, having no other object of
comparison, or distraction, feeling the power at once
of her beauty, and influenced, no doubt, in some
degree
by the charm of the place, and the peculiarity of
the inspiring scenery, showed signs that a seminal
principle of uncorrupted nature remained in him.
The feelings which he entertained for her, though not
worthy the dignified name of love, were yet new and
unexperimented sensations. They brought no
inspiration
of virtue and high thought, but enough of
bitterness
and jealousy, enough of wrath and
vindictiveness
.
But, accustomed to conquest from the
commencement
of his career, he felt no diffidence, no
humbling
comparisons, no doubt, nor fear. He not only
gave scope to all his powers in this pursuit, but there
was an excitement in it, which elicited all his
conversational
talents, all his acquired wit, vivacity and
insidiousness
.
Jessy sometimes sighed, after an hour's
conversation with him, and wished, that the other,
with his generous principles and elevated mind, had
possessed something more of the amusing vivacity,
and easy and flowing conversation of the former.
An occurrence soon offered Julius a chance, to
bring his standing in her thoughts to the test of
experiment
.
They were together in the bower. It was a
beautiful afternoon, toward the close of summer, when
the sun and the clouds diffused upon earth, valley,
mountains and sky, that mixture of light and shade,
of cerulean with gold, purple, orange and green, in
which stillness rested every where on the face of
nature, and even the eagle suspended his scream, and
seemed to be sleeping, as he sailed slowly up and
down the sky. The hunter's fires threw up
cylindrical
spirals of smoke at different points in the cope
of vision. Elder Wood and the two young men sat
silently admiring the beauty of the day. A flock of
mountain sheep bounded by, just above them. Elder
Wood and Frederic had too much of the hunter in
them, not to be stirred to pursuit. They took their
yagers, of which there were always some at hand,
and followed them. Julius saw his opportunity, and
remained to improve it.
`You have asked me,' he said, as soon as they were
by themselves, `for a view of my long labor, since I
have been a visitant with you. I felt reluctant, as
you will suppose, to show it in presence of our friend,
as I have no particular taste for being the subject of
ridicule. If you knew, how little used I have been
to patient industry, you would at least allow me that
meed, in the painting.' At the same time, he
produced
a painting of the vale of the Shoshonee, upon
which, she knew, he had been laboring, since his
residence
in it; and which he had hitherto refused to
exhibit. At first look, the painting had an aspect of
imposing and dazzling splendor. The period in the
season was about the time of the salmon festival, and
every point of vision presented all the flauntiness
and gaiety and depth of verdure of spring. The
coloring was rich and glowing, and rather marked
with warmth, than mellowness. Different points of
vision were copied with a gorgeous fidelity. There
stood the mountains, with their black and awful peaks,
high in the blue. There were the lights and
shadows
,
the gorges and waving indentations of the forest,
the skirted and meandering river, the green sward
enlivened with its Shoshonee, their dogs, flocks and
herds, all apparently moving, or ruminating. The
sea fowl, with their long necks stretched out, seemed
to be in flight up the stream. The very eagles,
hawks and buzzards, between the banks of clouds of
crimson and brass, showed, as if suspended on the
wing, and reposing in the heavens. There were the
domestic smokes from the Indian cabins above the
dark grey bluff. The drapery was splendid, and the
coloring respired the pictured thought of the painter;
while it was at the same time admirably true to
nature
.
Those parts of the valley, most remote from
the assumed point of vision were first displayed; and
as her undisguised admiration, in the keenest degree
alive to the beauty of painting, increased, he
uncovered
it, nearer and nearer to the point whence it
was taken, still evincing a power of the pencil more
graphic and vivid. There was no need that she
should affect delight. As the scroll was uncovered,
she saw that the bower was the centre of the picture.
It was completely unrolled. She saw herself just in
advance of the bignonias of the bower; and she would
have known herself even by the fidelity of her
pictured
reflection in the sleeping mirror of the blue
lake below. She had seen no effort of portrait
painting
to compare with it. All the taste, skill and power
of both the young artists had been thrown into this
common effort, until they had disagreed, touching
what might be called the keeping of the painting.
Frederic would have had the drapery chaste, plain,
and even severe. The beau ideal of Julius was the
bard's conception of Cleopatra, on her excursion with
Anthony. Voluptuous imagery was decidedly
predominant
.
There had been even an attempt to
flatter
in the richness and the clinging and gossamer
humidity
of her dress, and the artificial glossiness of her
curling tresses. The costume and style were of the
ultra and latest fashions of London. The dazzle of
gems, which she had never seen, seemed to sparkle on
the canvass. She had never before fully conceived
the power of the pencil. Never had mind given
birth to a more splendid conception of beauty, robed
in her most voluptuous attributes, and the whole
adjusted
and colored to the poet's dream of pleasure.
The natural impulse of a young and unsophisticated
female mind, perhaps unduly attached to the
creations
of the pencil, was the first, she felt in view of
such a laborious and expensive compliment. She
saw herself in this glorious landscape standing forth
in loveliness and light, resembling a thing descended
from the spheres, more enchanting, than even her glass
had ever flattered her she was in reality. Julius saw
the sparkling admiration in her eye. He noted that
he had been able to give birth to unwonted and
unconscious
feelings of delight, which he enjoyed none
the less for knowing, that her sense of propriety would
seal up the expression of those thoughts. He
remarked
her changing countenance. He discovered
an embarrassment, the struggle of mingled emotions,
a thousand times more eloquent to the effect, than any
words or exclamations. There was no single image,
to revolt purity of thought. The idea of the painter,
and the effect intended to be produced, were gathered
from the
toute ensemble;
and this was entirely the
conception
and the finish of pleasure in the `Choice of
Hercules.' `I shall know,' thought Julius, as he
waited with intense curiosity, to catch the ultimate
effect upon her thought. `I shall know, what choice
she would have made. I shall be satisfied, whether
she is a prude, or a woman, like my former
acquaintance
with the species.'
She looked more intently, and seemed perplexed,
and in study. His estimation of what she was, or his
beau ideal of what he would have her, gradually
unfolded
to her innate perception of right. `I have but
one question,' she said at length, `to ask, Julius,
respecting
this most splendid painting. Was the
keeping
of this landscape your friend's conception, or
yours?' `Mine, I assure you, entirely,' replied Julius,
his self-complacency settling the feeling, with which
the question was asked, and wishing to appropriate
all the honor and advantage. In the confidence of
the moment, he took her hand, fell on his knees, and
poured forth a profusion of declarations of love in
forms, which he had so often, and so successfully
practised
before. `Love inspired the idea,' he said.
`Love colored the landscape. Love imparted
patience
and industry to finish it. In drawing the figure,
he had only enlarged on the canvass the miniature
impress which was indelibly engraven on his breast.
His wealth, his rank, his familyall were hers. He
would transfer her from these pleasant, but savage
solitudes. He would show her to the world in all the
embellishments, in which she was here painted. He
would remove with her and her parents, to London.
He would see her the idol of admiration of one sex,
and the general envy of the other.
When he had exhausted his wonted routine of
words, the speaking flush of triumph in his eye
indicated
,
that he expected at first an affected semblance
of coyness, and then an eager acceptance of his offer.
She had withdrawn her hand from the first. She
now raised her eyes from the painting, and, looking
him calmly in the face, questioned, `is this all, Julius?'
The question and the accompanying look, confounded
him, and put his self-complacency for a moment to
flight; but he summoned his effrontery, and, coloring
a little, commenced another series of protestations.
`Enough! Enough! my friend,' she interrupted him,
laughing. `The first will answer. I ought to be
grateful for all this. But we cannot always command
our gratitude. The ladies, with whom you have been
acquainted, would, probably, have been charmed with
such a flattering painter, such fluent protestations,
and such an earnest lover. I need not fear to say,
that I have found pleasure in your society, and have
been so much delighted with your talent at painting,
that I wished no evil hour of love-making might occur
to interrupt it. But, since you have been so explicit,
it becomes me to be equally so. I would not accept
your love, if I could. I could not, if I would; and
this, on the score of love, is my final answer.'
Unaccustomed
to control a feeling, and wholly unprepared
for such a prompt and unqualified negative, his face
reddened rather with anger and wounded pride, than
VOL. I. 20
regret. He recoiled, and made an effort to repress
the first words, that rose to his lips. `I am to
consider
this, then, as a decided refusal?' She smiled,
still looking him calmly in the face. `I hope, I
expressed
myself in terms sufficiently clear and positive.
It seems to me, Sir, that I remember to have heard
you speak rather disrespectfully of marriage.' The
blood flashed back in his face, as he eagerly asked,
`was that your reason for refusing me? If a
gentleman
of opulence and family has conquered that
dislike
,
and has shown himself ready to contract a union,
under circumstances of an apparent inequality, which
I need not explain, I should deem, you would see in it
a triumph of love over all considerations of interest,
more complete, and a bond of confidence more
worthy
of dependence, than any that a mere preaching
moralist could offer.' `You mistake the matter, I see,'
she answered, `altogether. I have no idea of leaving
this valley. I do not believe my parents have. If I
had, I assure you, I should not accept you, as the
companion
of my departure, in such a relation, or in any
other.'
He stepped back from her, drew himself up, and
absolutely bit his lips with undissembled temper. `I
dare say,' he cried, `I owe the remark that I disregard
marriage, and your apparent dislike, to the sincerity
and good offices of my friend, Frederic, with you in
my absence.' `Sir,' she answered, manifesting
resentment
in return, `you forget yourself, your friend and
me. It is time for me to return. Frederic is as
incapable
of slandering the man, whom he calls friend,
in his absence, as he would have been of painting
that picture. He ought to know, how little like
himself
his friend is in these particulars. Sir, my own
observation and memory have told me all, I know,
touching your general views of morals, and your
estimate
of marriage in particular. We need have no
discussion. I repeat to you, I have not even thought
on these subjects with any relation to you at all. One
thing more. I do not say, that our acquaintance is at
an end; but I say, that if ever you utter a word, or
make an allusion to this subject again, or insinuate a
remark unfavorable to your friend, I shall deem it my
duty to be invariably denied to you in future.'
She turned from him, as he was mustering his pride
and indignation to reply again, and arose to return,
calling to her side her simple companion, who had
been chasing butterflies, perfectly unconscious of all
that had transpired. He, too, walked, as in scorn, in
another direction, revolving dark thoughts of pride
and revenge.
The marked change in her deportment towards him
from that time was only apparent to the parties, who
took the keenest interest in it. Frederic and
Areskoui
,
from the same impulse, had misjudged her
estimate
of him. They had calculated the influence of
his beauty and manners by their own jealousies
and fears. They discovered that something
unpleasant
had transpired between the two. Frederic, from
the moment that he sincerely loved, had indulged no
hopes. But he had become sufficiently enlightened
to the principles and character of his companion, not
to feel disinterested satisfaction at the idea, that she
had broken with him. He had imagined every
symptom
of a growing affection between them; and would
have warned her of his principles, but that it would
have had the aspect of originating from selfish
jealousy
and envy. Happy was he to see, that the right
issue had resulted, without the necessity of such a
questionable interference. Shyness and distrust had
been growing for sometime between him and his
quondam
friend. It now proceeded to the point of
apparent
mutual avoidance.
By a kind of tacit understanding, the labors of the
pencil, and the charming evening concerts of the bower,
were suspended. At least, if Jessy continued to repair
there, it was with no other companion, than her girl.
In regard to the society of both the young men, she
manifested not a studied, but a general avoidance, and
seemed imperceptibly sliding into her former solitary
way of passing her time, before they came to the
valley.
Not long, however, after the interview mentioned
above, accident brought the two companions together,
as they returned from different hunting excursions, the
one with a swan and the other with a wild turkey
slung over his back. They were still half a league
from home, and they stopped on the green moss at the
foot of a sycamore that held out its ancient arms over
the Sewasserna. They sat down murkily, at some
distance from each other, and each fanned his temples
with his hat. `A rare pleasure this, of late,' said
Julius
,
`to meet, and compare notes, as we used formerly.
I think, we were then accustomed to call each other
friend.' `I am not conscious of having forfeited that
appellation,' answered Frederic. A conversation,
thus commenced in coolness, shortly verged to
crimination
and recrimination. Julius, finding that he was
in a fair way to be foiled at this kind of rencontre,
changed the conversation, by adverting to the
ridiculous
part they had both been acting for some time;
and remarked that, as the return ship might shortly
be expected from China at Astoria, he thought it quite
time for them both to drop the curtain upon the
ridiculous
drama, and relieve their friends from the regret
of supposing them drowned, by returning to society,
Frederic replied, that he felt himself completely an
isolated being in the world, that he did not imagine,
the news of his supposed death had reached his friends,
that he felt himself accountable to no one, that he had
not been the first to propose this sojourn, and that he
should not be the first to abandon it, that listless and
reckless as his existence was here, he felt himself as
useful as he had supposed himself any where, and far
happier than in society, and that he had no present
purpose to return to it.
To these cool remarks Julius replied in a tone of
dryness and decision. He admitted, that his friendly
Mentor had formed more accurate estimates of the
wonderful daughter of Yensi, than he had. A pretty
affair, truly, to give herself such airs, as though she
were already an Indian princess. It was not to be
denied, that she had a pretty face and beautiful locks,
and could converse, in terms, like a book. But what
was all that? Was she not after all a simple,
affected
,
awkward thing, an Indian blue-stocking, that was
all! They ought to have had too much sense from
the beginning, not to have been forewarned, that her
modes of life had been so different from theirs, and
her scale of judging so humble, as to have precluded
the hope, that she would be pleased with any one,
but an Indian. `Lay not,' he continued, `the
flattering
unction to your soul, my virtuous and considerate
friend, that while she slights me, it is through a
preference
for you. On the score of putting our mutual
chances of interest to trial, I am persuaded, that we
are both on one footing. Areskoui is the man, Sir.
While he is at hand, we may both paint, and whistle,
and pipe, and flatter, and look killing with all our
might. The Indian prince will always carry it over
us, humble commoners.' `Be it so,' answered
Frederic
.
`It proves the soundness of her judgment, and
the correctness of her taste. She ought to prefer
him. He is the nobler person. The more I study
him, the more I feel small beside him. True dignity
and real greatness lose none of their claims, because
we call the possessor savage. He is a study, and a
20*
high mark of imitation for me. I wish, I had a sister
for him, as good and as beautiful as Jessy, that I might
learn her to love this being, so nobly forbearing and
magnanimous, so generous and elevated in motive and
action; and that he in turn might learn this simple,
awkward, rustic Indian girl, against whom you have
indulged in so much tirade, to love me. For a long
time, I thought you were the favored man. You
would have been, had you deemed success worthy of
securing, by a little more concealment and disguise.'
`Frederic,' he replied, `you know I cannot cant.
Do you think that I am a man to sit down and prate
about morals and principles, to gain the good will of
a girl among the Indians; I, who have borne the palm
of success from females of so different an order? But,
Sir, we are wide from the point. You know, I
presume
,
from her own lips, for she rates you in her
confidence
next to Elder Wood, that I am at this time in
mauvaise odeur
with her? I warrant me, my faithful
friend has talked me over with her often enough. At
any rate, I can assure you from her own lips, that we
are both alike indifferent to her, or rather positively
disagreeable.'
`Julius,' replied the other, `I respect myself too
much, and you too little, to answer to such charges.
While you supposed me capable of availing myself of
her private ear to prejudice you in her thoughts, you
measured me by your own conscience. So would
you have done, with the chance so to do, and she
would have despised you for your pains. That
knowledge
alone would have kept me from the baseness,
to which you allude. That I am indifferent to her,
I have no doubt. But, Sir, I do not believe, that I
am disagreeable. I have striven to avoid all offence,
and she is intrinsically too good, to dislike without
cause.'
`Canting,' answered Julius. `Base canting. It
surprises me, to hear, how nearly you both converse in
the same strain. I am positive, you must have learned
your lesson together. I shall wait to hear, that you
have both been under the water with Elder Wood.
However, just be pleased to take warning, Sir. In
pursuit of love, of his purpose, or his revenge, Julius
Landino is neither to be trifled with, nor frightened.
It is for those, who come in his way, to fear.' `Julius,'
said the other, `I do not mean to understand your
threats, until you compel me. But I can assure you,
that Frederic Belden fears Julius Landino as little,
as he fears any thing beside, and throws down
defiance
against defiance.' `Look you here, Frederic,'
he replied, `I shall not quarrel with you, except at
my own time and place, and that is not the present.
I only say, that I am persuaded, you two good and
pious people have an understanding. It gives me
pleasure to believe, that we shall both be alike
rejected
,
and that Areskoui will cage the pretty bird
after all; and he shall have all my interest, when I
find it will not make for myself. Some boats depart
next week for Astoria. I offer to depart with you.
We are both egregious fools to remain here longer.'
`Sir, let us remember, that neither of us has more than
his individual folly for which to answer,' replied
Frederic
.
`You may be thankful, that I will not allow
you to have mine upon your conscience. I choose to
remain here; and I will not go with you next week.'
`Well, my Master Frederic,' retorted the other, `if
you will not budge, so neither will I. You staid at
first, to play Mentor over me. I will shift parts, and
enact Argus for you. Good night'and they
murkily
separated in opposite directions.
Though the incident recorded below belongs not
directly to these annals, yet, as it tends to elucidate
the influence of Elder Wood in his Missionary efforts,
perhaps it should be related. It was an affecting
passage in the humble history of the valley, and it
deeply moved the feelings both of the whites and the
Indians. Though Elder Wood had not been favored,
in his own phrase, with any special success in his
Apostleship among the Shoshonee, his undeviating
uniformity of correctness and sanctity, his earnest
desire
to do good, manifested by his active and
discriminating
benevolence, was steadily acquiring for him
an increasing influence among that silent, but
observing
people. They saw him disinterested, chaste,
temperate and just. His earnest devoutness in his
own way, his silent dignity, the tenor of his life
giving
constant proof of his own undoubting conviction,
were steadily operating the natural effect upon the
minds of the Indians. A young woman among them
had taken a fancy to Elder Wood, as a husband; had
dreamed a dream in relation to him; had painted her
face in black, and had caused him to be instructed,
that she was under an interdict. `Let her remain
interdicted
,
then, if she will,' was the reply of the
minister
.
`They may burn me, if they choose, and give
the crown of martyrdom to me, when they please.
But I will not marry her!' The answer was reported.
But there was no one to sustain her. No shadow of
suspicion rested upon the minister. The girl became
the derision of her own people; and, after an ample
experiment of the inefficacy of her interdict, came
forth in vermillion again, to make a more fortunate
set at some other person.
But though few were so far converted, as to profess
the religion of Elder Wood, many were observed,
after his earnest sermons and religious exercises, to
be thoughtful, and now and then an individual,
generally
a woman in the more advanced stage of life,
went into the Sewasserna with him. He had a small,
but growing church, and he felt, when he was
dispensing
the word of life to this little flock, gathered from
the red wanderers of the mountains for the great
Shepherd, that he was performing no humble nor
useless labor.
Among his converts was Lenahah, or the Song
Sparrow, an orphan girl of seventeen, of uncommon
attractions of person and mind, for an Indian girl; at
least it seemed so to Elder Wood. In fact, except
for her black hair, and her peculiar eye, her
countenance
would have proclaimed her a Creole-Spanish
girl. She had always been a selected favorite with
Jessy. She was the poetess of the valley, and her
songs had sweetness, simplicity, tenderness, and
graphic
fidelity to nature; for she painted what she saw,
and felt; and painted directly from nature. They
were in the mouths of all the singers in the nation, and
she thence derived her name. She was, in short, one
of those gifted minds, that sometimes shoots forth
among a simple and unlettered people. The
tenderness
and the ardor of feeling, that had prompted her
songs, finally took the direction of religious
impression
.
She had been among the first, that had been
struck with the preaching of Elder Wood. Moral
worth and dignity had more charms for her, than
youth and beauty, the common objects of attraction
for one of her years. It is saying all, that can be said
of an uninstructed Indian girl, that she had a heart to
feel the charm of worth. Had the handsome Julius,
and Elder Wood, reckless as he was of appearance,
presented themselves for her favor before Lenahah,
she was one of those rare minds, that would instantly
have preferred the stern and high minded minister to
the handsome and unprincipled youth. This single
trait will serve, as an index to her character. The
beautiful, tender and gifted Lenahah, though humbly
born, a circumstance of peculiar disqualification
among the Indians, and an orphan besides, had
received
the best offers of marriage in her tribe, and
had refused even the powerful Nelesho himself. But
among no people under heaven is the course of love so
perfectly free, as among the red people. The
rejection
even of Nelesho passed off without offence. It
was said, that Lenahah did not love him, and there
was the end of the affair. The rejected warrior, who
afterwards took so much offence at the rejection of
Jessy, went his way, and attributed his failure to his
destiny, and spoke as kindly of Lenahah, as before.
She had been observed, after she had attended the
services of Elder Wood, to remain thoughtful, and as
if deeply pondering what she had heard. With
favorable
impressions, in regard to his religion, began
to be associated kind thoughts of the preacher himself.
She had been heard to say, that it was pity, the good
medicine man of the whites had no wife to bring him
water, and dress his venison for him. After the
arrival
of the two young men in the tribe, she was at
first strongly impressed with their fine appearance,
and she gave an extemporaneous song to the stranger
youths of fair hair, and bright complection. But
their gaiety chimed not with the thoughts that Elder
Wood had awakened. Her feelings vibrated back,
and rested again upon the minister. She went into
the Sewasserna, and professed the Christian religion
in the form of Elder Wood's worship. Her earnest
devotion
,
her undeviating purity and sanctity of life,
corresponded with her profession. Her being the
first convert of name among the Shoshonee, her
natural
attachment to her spiritual father, so artlessly
expressed
,
finally won first the unconscious and
unacknowledged
tenderness, and finally the avowed
affection
of Elder Wood. The young people of the ruder
sort laughed, when they heard, that the minister was
smitten with the Song Sparrow, and that she returned
his love. But the Indians generally respected the
one, and entertained kind thoughts of the other, and
approved the connection. They had learned from
different sources, how the white people conducted
towards
their ministers, when they settled among them,
and they determined that the couple should see that
they knew how to imitate such an example. The
respectable
warriors met, and labored a number of days
in succession, to build them a comfortable dwelling, in
the same range of the other habitations, between that
of Hatch and William Weldon. As was the case with
theirs, pine trees caught the breeze in front, and the
everlasting battlement of rocks curved for their roof,
and formed the rear. They enlisted their pride to
make it spacious, convenient and comfortable; and as
they are very exact imitators, they succeeded in
producing
a house much resembling that of Hatch.
The time was announced for their marriage; and
it is probable, that this man of profound sentiments,
which had been concentrated, and disappointed, loved
this tender and gifted daughter of another and a
heathen
race with a romantic affection, more ardent than
he could possibly have bestowed upon a woman of his
own people. Her wild and sweet songs, the poesy of
the daughter of a red hunter, had first operated on
the imagination of this son of a Kentucky hunter.
Where there were few subjects of comparison, she
was uncommonly pretty; and it may not be said, how
far Elder Wood, like other people, was influenced by
his eyes. He first pitied her, as an interesting
heathen
.
She was subsequently his first convert of any
consideration, earnest, simple, docile, humble,
devoted
among the first fruits for the Redeemer between
those unnamed mountains. This last tie was
strongest
of all; and Elder Wood unconsciously gave,
more than once, sufficiently amusing proofs that he
was under the full influence of the tender passion.
As he walked alone in the forest, or beside the stream,
in his customary vocation, full often had the name of
Lenahah been wrought into a hymn, partly religious,
and partly amatory, and committed to the echoes of
the forests and mountains, as thinking, that echo only
heard. But Baptiste had the song in the vilest
travesty
,
and even the long visages of the Indians
relaxed
,
as they chaunted the songs and the loves of the
Song Sparrow, and the grave and broad shouldered
Kentuckian, so solemn even in love, and whose head
was already well sprinkled with snow. But the laugh
abated none of their deep respect for the parties and
the connection. It may be, the mingled dreams of
earth and heaven of the Song Sparrow, and the
Indian
Missionary, were they as worthily sung, possessed
as much intrinsic interest, as those of Eloise and
Abelard
.
The Song Sparrow had been long a selected
favorite of Jessy, who had completed for her a
wedding
dress, after the fashion of the whites. William
Weldon and Ellswatta and Areskoui had made liberal
contributions to enable the house keepers to
commence
in comfort; and few pairs had happier
expectations
for the future.
Though this vale was generally blessed with an air
of extreme salubrity, and most of the deaths there
were those of nature, sometimes, when the full and
enlarged
orb of the harvest moon shone in crimson
through the dim mists of Indian summer, and a kind of
unnatural and relaxing sultriness returned upon the
coolness of autumn, at that early period, when red and
orange begin to mellow the green of the leaves,
diseases
sometimes sunk down with the mists upon these
vales. At such a time, Lenahah, now within a week
of her nuptials, was taken ill of a bilious fever. On
the very day, in the evening of which she fell sick,
she had wandered, singing extempore songs, on the
sides of the mountains, gathering evergreens, to deck
the common dwelling for the approaching marriage.
The first night, the fever chiefly touched her head.
She sang through the night, and the names of her
parents
,
who died while she was yet an unconscious
infant
,
of Elder Wood, and her Saviour, were woven into
her imagery of rocks, streams, woods, and mountains
the figures usually painted on an Indian imagination.
Next morning the fever was fixed. Her eyes
glistened
,
and she breathed quick and pantingly. The
medicine men of her people stood about her bed; but
she motioned them away, and yet with a courtesy,
that showed, that she wished not to revolt their
customs and prejudices. While she held her arm
to Elder Wood, and he felt her tense pulse, and
laid his palm on her burning forehead, tears started
simultaneously into the eyes of both. `My head is
wild,' she said, `and every thing whirls in confusion
before me. Let the Indian maiden speak, what is
on her mind, while that mind is still clear, and before
she goes down into the sunless valley. Hearken, my
father and my husband! The Saviour, whom thou
hast declared to me, hath showed himself the last night
to my dreams, all glorious in light and loveliness, as
thou hast described him to me. He held out his arms
to me, and offered to conduct me to the high and sunny
hills of paradise, where he hath a place for me and
thee. There, father, will I wait for thee. Do thou
commit my body to the dust, after the ways of the
Christian people, and do thou sing over my remains
those sweet and holy songs, from thy medicine book,
which speak of the life to come. Do thou plant
flowers and creeping vines over the sod that covers
me, and in thy medicine discourse do thou tell, that
the Song Sparrow loved thee much, but loved her
Saviour
more; and that because she loved Him, she was
resigned to leave her love, and the green earth, and to
go down, confiding and fearless, into the sunless valley;
and do thou ask, as my last request, that the Wakona
will walk behind the bier of the young orphan.'
VOL. I. 21
From the time, that she had given these last
charges
,
her mind was never long collected; but she
continued
to utter breaks of her wild songs, still
mingling
the name of her affianced husband with that of
her Redeemer. Universal interest was excited
towards
this favorite of the nation. Elder Wood
evinced
,
that the man in his bosom was mingled in
struggle
with the Christian. He remained constantly by
her bed, pale, absent, and giving answers wide from
the purport of the questions proposed to him. But
from the time she was seized till she drew her last
breath, he was not absent an hour at a time. From
his hand alone would Lenahah receive her food and
medicine; and when he spoke to her, however wildly
she answered others, to him her replies were
collected
and calm. But it was in vain, that the white
people
and the red made joint stock of their experience,
and proposed a hundred remedies; it was in vain that
Josepha and Yensi, with untiring zeal, lavished their
nursing and watching. It was in vain, that Jessy
kissed her burning cheeks, and implored her to keep
up her courage, and try to get well. It was in vain,
that Elder Wood administered decoctions, and
sweating
drinks, and wiped the starting moisture from her
brow, and knelt in earnest wrestlings with the Author
of existence for her life. He had numbered her days,
and she closed her eyes upon her native vales, and
upon sin and sorrow at the same time. Not a noise
interrupted the awful stillness of her departure, but
the breathing of the breeze of sadness, moaning her
dirge in the tops of the pines over her cabin. It was
one of those impressive scenes, that carry home
solemnity
to the most thoughtless bosom. The
countenances
of the passing Shoshonee and Shienne gave
proof, that the departure of worth, innocence and
truth, snatched prematurely away, is every where
alike a subject of regret.
Lenahah was buried, partly after the Indian and
partly after the Christian ceremonial. Directly at
that point under the sycamore, where she had been
wont to sit, and listen to the preaching of Elder Wood,
was her humble grave; in digging it the whites and
Indians
mingled labors. Elder Wood, his arm and his
hat in crape, and Jessy in full mourning, walked
behind
the bier. The wail of Indian mothers, as they
bore her body to its last house, told the tale of real
grief, that pierced the heart of the hearer. The
Indian
medicine men were so far indulged in their
ancient
usages, that they walked behind the chief
mourners
,
now and then striking a blow on their drums,
crying
at the same time in their deep and guttural note
`The songs of the Song Sparrow are no more.
Her spirit has gone down to the sunless valley. Weep
for the young Shoshonee maiden, for she was true.
Weep, and ask the Master of Life, to shed light upon
the path of her spirit, as it seeks its way to the hills
of paradise.'
When the procession reached the spot of worship,
under the shadowing sycamore, they sat down the
body, uncoffined after their fashion, but on a bier
covered with fawn skin, and strewed with flowers,
beside
her open grave. Elder Wood drew his bible and
psalm book from his pocket, and his first essays to
speak were almost inarticulate. But he looked
upwards
,
made a strong effort, opened to his place in
the hymn book, and though his voice trembled, the
words were articulate, and line by line, translated
into the Shoshonee speech.
Hear what the voice from Heaven proclaims,
Of all the pious dead;
Sweet is the savour of their names,
And soft their sleeping bed.
They die in Jesus, and are blest, &c.
His own deep and trembling voice, as usual, gave
the key note of the dirge. The song of grief, of the
grave and immortality swelled, and sunk away, and
again increased and fell, and came back, in repeated
echoes from the mountains. The eyes of Yensi, of
Jessy, and many an Indian maid, of Frederic, and
many
a stern warrior, filled at the thrilling impression.
Beauty and innocence and worth every where leave
the same halo around their departing course. Many
a warrior, that had never softened before, felt his
spirit moved in him. Even the heart of Julius was
for a moment impressed, that beauty and guilty
pleasure
are not the only pursuit on the earth. Some of
the closing paragraphs of the funeral sermon follow.
`My dear red brethren, dear to me, as of my own
kind, and for Jesus' sake, I thank you for the
considerate
kindness, with which you have performed the
last sad offices to one of your own daughters, who was
mine also in Jesus Christ, and was shortly to have
been my spouse. Though I preach to you a
crucified
Saviour, it would poorly beseem the sincerity,
required
of me before the All-seeing eye, not to
acknowledge
,
that I am in the flesh, and a vessel of clay,
like yourselves. As such, I loved the deceased; but,
I trust, a thousand times more, as a new born child
of God. Her poesy was both wild and sweet, when
she was an alien from God; but a thousand times more
so, after she had learned the name and the high praises
of Jesus. You all do know, how kind hearted and
true she was to all; I doubt not, that it was only,
because
she believed, that I, too, was born of God, and
loved the Saviour, that she loved me, and was to have
been mine. That Saviour whom she loved, had the
highest claim to her, and has taken her to himself.
The mortal body of her, we loved, is here before us;
but he will take charge of even that. Not an hair of
her head shall perish. She shall be raised
incorruptible
and immortal. Therefore I have cause to wipe
away the tears of nature. I surely need not weep for
the meek and gentle spirit, that hath gone to the
heavenly
country where all are alike good and happy.
But while I remember my beloved, safely gathered to
the fold of the Great Shepherd, let me implore you,
in presence of Him who formed these ancient
mountains
,
and whose mercies are as unchangeable as their
rocks, the fountain of everlasting love, let me implore
you to make yourselves acquainted with the same God
and Saviour, and the same hope of immortality. This
I will ask of God day and night, when I draw near to
him. Rivers of water will continue to run down mine
eyes, until I see you washed from your sins in the
same crimson fountains.
`I will detain you no longer with my private griefs.
Let us hasten to perform the last sad offices to my
beloved
;dust
to dustashes to ashesbut, blessed be
God, and the good word in this book, in the sure and
certain hope of a resurrection from the dead.'
Four aged chiefs then approached the body, taking
it up gently, and depositing it in its last dwelling.
Then every person present walked round the grave,
throwing in flowers and a handful of earth in passing.
The song of sorrow and death was raised again; the
grave was filled, the benediction given, and the
concourse
thoughtfully returned to their places. The
only memorial that remained of Lenahah, except in
the country beyond forgetfulness and death, was in
the heart of Elder Wood, and the record of a stone
tablet, on which he engraved these words in English
`Lenahah was among the first fruits to the
Redeemer
from the Shoshonee. She was alike good and
gifted
.
She came forth, as a flower, and was soon cut
down.'
21 *
CHAPTER VIII.
The streamlet hath shrunk from its full summer tide,
And the forest is doffing its mantle of pride,
And its red leaves twirl in the wind's lightest breath.
M. P. F.
Not
long after the burial of Lenahah, the
consequences
of the brooded revenge and intrigues of
Julius
began to assume a visible form. Some
Black-feet
Indians had assaulted a party of the Shoshonee,
who had gone to the sources of the Sewasserna, to
set their winter traps. Two persons were killed, and
the remainder plundered of their horses, guns, traps,
provisions, and every thing appertaining to the party,
upon which their enemies could lay hands. The party
was obliged to return immediately, on foot, at the
risk of perishing with hunger by the way. A loud
cry for revenge arose. A detachment from both
tribes, in proportion to their respective numbers, was
ordered by Ellswatta to be levied, and to be
commanded
by Areskoui, to make a campaign of reprisal
against the Blackfeet. The Shienne murmured
against the requisition, alledging, that it was the
single
affair of the Shoshonee; and that the season was
so far advanced, that the expedition would, probably,
perish with cold and hunger on such a distant winter
campaign against an enemy, who would, after all, be
found invisible. The demonstrations of the Shienne
were so decidedly hostile on this occasion, that
Ellswatta
,
after consulting with William Weldon and
Elder Wood, on whose wisdom and fidelity he relied
much, determined to relinquish the expedition, until
spring; and to defer any notice of the openly
refractory
spirit of Nelesho, until an opportunity should
occur, when he did not carry the voices of his people
with him. But a contumacious spirit, ripe for revolt
and rebellion, if it find itself thwarted, and
circumvented
in one direction, will soon show itself in another.
From the time that Jessy gave a decided rejection to
the suit of Julius, he had preserved a distance almost
amounting to an entire cessation of intercourse. It
was a relief to her to have it so. Her conscience had
constantly reproached her, during the intimacy, with
the pain which, she perceived, it inflicted upon
Areskoui
.
She had more than once instituted a stern
comparison of the truth and magnanimity of the one,
with the specious manners and hollow character of
the other. She said to herself, `why should I be
influenced
by the unworthy prejudice, which considers
the possessor of these qualities savage, because he
has not been bred in the schools of refinement and
deception
?
Can I retain self respect, while I am caught
in the fact of balancing a fair complexion and a
polished
exterior with true greatness, as I see it in
this child of nature?'
Truth was, also, that she had made the discovery,
that Frederic possessed, with better principles and a
much sounder understanding, more to fix the
affections
,
than his friend. She saw in him unwavering
integrity of purpose, and uniform decorum of
manners
.
When he did converse, there was richness and
interest, in what he said, and the hearer always wished
him to speak again. She had not failed to remark,
that in her presence he was silent and constrained;
that when, in occasional courtesy, he had offered her
his hand, it always trembled; that he seemed to court
her society only in the presence of others, and
disposed
to avoid being alone with her; and that,
whenever
this occurred, however conversible before, he
become grave, and embarrassed. Such conduct,
according
to her inexperienced logic, could receive but
one construction. In some way, for some unimagined
cause, she concluded, that he had taken dislike to her.
A compliment from him would have had value with
her, for it would have been received as the tribute of
sense and sincerity. But compliment, be the
occasion
as fair as it might, she never received. A
little
pique, a great deal of respect, and no
inconsiderable
portion of curiosity, to divine, why he had come
to estimates of her, so different from his friend's,
induced
her to wish a more intimate acquaintance with
him. She had enough of the nature of our common
mother, after looking in her glass, not to derive any
particular gratification, from imagining it probable,
that she was disagreeable to the stern youth of high
forehead and reserved port.
So estranged had both her former visitants become,
that her father, little as he was in the habit of
remarking
such circumstances, enquired of Yensi, `why
the two young gentlemen, formerly so sociable, were
now seldom seen at the house?' He answered his
own question by remarking, that he supposed, this
joining the Indians was but the passing freak of idle
and unstable young men, who would soon get weary
of it, and return again to society. His daughter had
become accustomed to the high treat of this instructed
and accomplished companionship. She was ashamed
to admit to herself, how much she suffered, from
having
it broken off. She felt, more than all, in
reference
to the imagined coldness of Frederic, more
keenly, than comported with the wonted repose of
her balanced character. `This, then, is society, she
asked? A beautiful face and person, with a hollow
head and heart. A fine understanding and capability
of exciting high interest, that is yet cold, capricious,
and estranged, it knows not why nor wherefore.
Alas! my father is right. There is no truth, except
with the Shoshonee. Old friends understand each
other best. I see that I may explore farther, and find
worse. Let me remain satisfied with the frank and
noble nature of the unsophisticated Areskoui.'
It may be, too, that some almost unconscious
disposition
to pique the young men in her turn, mingled
with her thoughts. The consequence of such thoughts
was, that, without any thing, that could be pronounced
trifling with the affection of the young chief, she
showed him more marked attention, and received his
courtesies with unwonted kindness, which, without
inspiring
him with confidence, satisfied his humble
expectations
,
and rendered him again happy. Gladly
would the young chief have resigned his early
expectations
,
so that he might have been with her in the
innocent and confiding intercourse of their early years,
and been sure, that she would never be more to another,
than to him. `She has found, then,' he said to himself
with infinite satisfaction, `that they are not altogether
the children of the Wacondah, though they are so
fair. She avoids them, and she regards me with the
same look, as when we played together as children.'
As he indulged such thoughts, cheerfulness returned
to his visage and elasticity to his step.
An undefinable emotion of gladness swelled the
heart of Jessy, as she once more felt a return of the
full confidence and paternal affection of Ellswatta and
Josepha. It is true, they had never shown her
unkindness
or marked avoidance, from the time of the
arrival of the young strangers. But it was not to be
expected of any form of human nature, that parents
could see a beloved and only son suffering all the
tortures
of despairing love, on her account, and yet
regard
her with affection. `How much misery,' she
reflected
with herself, `results from the slightest
transgression
of the laws of prudence and duty! How
much joy flows from a single act of self control and
regulated affection!' In realizing the amount of
happiness
,
she imparted to these faithful and devoted
friends, by desisting from more courtesy towards the
adopted guests, than Areskoui, she returned to the
pleasure of a self approving mind, and felt the pain
of these suspended enjoyments alleviated.
Rumor has a hundred tongues, with the Shoshonee,
as with the whites. The young men, with whom she
had for months past spent so many hours in her bower,
were now evidently held in estrangement. No more
wanderings to the blue lake. No more music, nor
painting. Areskoui visited William, as heretofore;
and Jessy received him, as in days gone by. Frederic
seemed to have become a disciple and convert of
Elder
Wood's, so closely did he hold communion with
him. On the other hand, Nelesho, Julius, Baptiste
and Hatch, met in conclave, whispered, and appeared
to have a masonic tie, excluding the uninitiated.
From these strong changes in the deportment of
the Shoshonee guests, it soon came to be rumored,
that Wakona, on being pressed, had finally made up
her mind to discard both her white suitors, and
marry the Shoshonee chief. This rumor had
obtained
undisputed currency and credit, as often happens,
while the parties chiefly interested had not the
slightest
suspicion of the thing themselves. Nelesho heard,
and believed it, and his heart rankled with the rage
of a fiend. Baptiste announced it to him and Julius,
as they discussed their conclave projects. `May I
burn with a hundred fires, and may the Wahcondah's
lightning blast me, before I allow it,' said Nelesho.
`I would sooner see the little white men of the
mountains
feed upon her cheeks.' `May I descend to the
burning abysses of Elder Wood's hell,' said Julius,
`if I do not anticipate them. Nevertheless, it were
better so, than, that she had chosen Frederic.' `You
must be prompt, and in earnest,' said Baptiste, `or you
will come after the feast.' The result of their dark
purposes will shortly appear. Frederic heard the
report, and repaired to William Weldon's once more,
from whose house he had refrained for the unwonted
space of four days. Fortunately for his wishes, he
found the daughter of Yensi alone, as her parents
were visiting Ellswatta's cabin. He made bashful
apologies, as fearful of having intruded. She replied,
`that it was equally matter of surprise and regret, to
find it necessary, that they, who had until recently
met so frequently, should now deem it necessary to
frame apologies, when that converse was resumed.
Circumstances, not necessary to be explained,' she
continued, `had induced her to deny herself hereafter
to his friend; but the same reasons not existing in his
case, she assured him, she should continue to find
pleasure in his society, whenever he found no better
way, in which to devote it, than in the house of her
father. But,' said she, `you seem sad, and as it were
the Knight of the woful countenance. I have
observed
you drooping, for some time. You are, no
doubt, borne down with ennui. Your idle fancy of
domesticating among us has had its hour. More
sober
views of duty have returned to you. Such an
one, as you, ought not to remain, thus wasting the
prime of your days to no purpose. I counsel you,
Frederic, to return to society. You have parents.
Render them happy. You are capable of
discharging
important duties to your country. I say nothing
of some fair one, whom providence has probably
written for you in the book of its decrees.'
`I am grateful,' he replied, `for such wise and
disinterested
advice. I propose shortly to put some part
of it in practice. But I have one ungratified wish,
that will detain me for a few days in this fair valley.
I am informed, our chief expects soon to call you'
`What?' asked Jessy, laughing through her blushes.
`It must be some sad name, or you would not make
such difficulty, in pronouncing it.' `To call you his
own! I wait to see the nuptials; and when they are
over, I will away, no matter where; and I will no
longer annoy you with the sight of a recreant Knight
of the woful visage, loitering his useless days among
the Shoshonee. Though, to say truth, I know of no
place, where I should be of any more use than here.'
`If you wait for that event,' she replied gaily, `we
shall have the pleasure of your society for a long
time to come. You seem so much in earnest, that I
have a right to ask you, if there is really such a
ridiculous
report, as you mention, current?' `There
certainly is, and I had not a doubt of the truth of it.'
`Well then, allow me to say, that I do not believe the
young chief has any more thought of such a thing,
than I. At any rate, there is not a shadow of
foundation
for such a report, nor a word of truth in it.'
`Thank God! You have removed a load from my
mind.'
`I can hardly imagine, why it could have been to
you an object, to remain, until after the event, had it
been about to take place; or why denying the idle
rumor
should remove a weight from your mind. After
the assurance, that no such event is likely to take
place, at present or hereafter, I may surely ask, why
the prospect of it was regarded by you with so much
horror? What is there so terrible in Areskoui? Is
it in his birth of a white and a Christian mother, or a
father the noblest of red men, with more sense and
worthiness to rule, than many, who have been in high
places among the whites? Is it in his understanding,
person, or deportment? Is it in his forbearance
towards
you and your friend? Why, I ask again, should
it inspire so much horror to hear, that I, who seem
destined from my birth to pass my days in this valley,
should be about to becomeyes, I will speak it out
the wife of Areskoui? Were I compelled to an
alternative
,
which, thank God, I am not, between him,
and your handsome friend, Julius, I assure you, I
should not hesitate a moment.'
`You have removed still another load from my heart,'
he added. `How I trembled, lest his beautiful person,
his specious manners, his birth and fortune, should
have proved temptations to you, as I may now say
without hesitation, they have to so many others! He
is not my friend, nor am I his. Understanding his
principles and character, I could no longer be his
friend. As to the chief, you misapprehend me too.
In view of the truth of the rumor, I might not be able
to control my envy; but I have never allowed it to
blind me for a moment to his pre-eminent worth. My
heart has done ample homage to his character. I
know, too, full well, that to be a gentleman is not the
gift of society, nor wealth, nor the result of manners,
or beauty of person; though these factitious
circumstances
are generally deemed all, that is requisite.
Areskoui carries in his mind, his heart and deportment,
his claims to that high appellation. I admire not to
see him, such as he is. Who could have been reared in
the midst of this inspiring scenery, and this patriarchal
people, with such a father for example, and such a
companion, as he has had from infancy, and not have
been all, that he is?' `All this,' she replied, `explains
not, why the refutation of this rumor removed such a
weight from your mind.' `And that,' he answered, `I
may never explain; nor, in fact, trust myself longer in
these dangerous confidential conversations.' Saying
this, his countenance betrayed extraordinary
agitation
,
as he suddenly arose, and took his leave.
`Can it be possible,' thought she, `that this man,
whom I thought so obdurate, and so unfavorably
disposed
towards me, conceals an affection too deep and
timid, ever to have been committed to words?' A new
VOL. I. 22
train of emotions pressed upon her. She saw the
clouds gathering. Harbingers of danger were
thickening
round her. `Oh!' she mentally exclaimed, `that
my parents would see, as I do; and remove from these
people to the land of law and of order; that we could
go under the guidance of this intrepid and wise young
man, whose last words and looks enabled me to
divine
every thing; and who has yet, even beyond the
forbearance of Areskoui, the courage not only to have
been silent, but to have assumed the appearance of
the most perfect indifference.'
Next day the young guests were absent on a
hunting
expedition, each with the parties of their
customary
association. Her mind and her heart were full
of the meditations, inspired by the interview of the
former evening with Frederic. It occurred to her,
that the reasons, which had for some time banished
her from the bower of the blue lake, did not exist for
the moment. She was seized with a strong inclination
to spend one more afternoon in that delicious place.
She repaired thither with her drawing materials,
followed
by her customary attendant. The dim and
misty air of Indian summer hung over the waning
landscape, above, and around. Glorious tinges of
orange, red, and green, were blended in the forests,
and the rustle of frequent falling leaves in the silence
of the woods proclaimed the decay of vegetable
nature
,
and raised the mind to `solemn thought and
heavenly musing.' The sun, broadened, and of the
hue of blood, threw a portentous glory behind him, as
he climbed over the western peaks. She was
profoundly
meditating the character and person of
Frederic
.
She remembered the countenance, with which
he received the refutation of the idle rumor, in
relation
to her and Areskoui, when the truth of his
feelings
,
in regard to her, flashed upon her in a moment,
speaking a language more emphatic, than any
declaration
.
She recalled the position, in which she had
heard him recite the lines of Byron.
But shape or shade, whate'er thou art,
In mercy ne'er again depart;
But onward with thee bear my soul,
Where winds can waft, or waters roll.
She was sketching his look and attitude, as he had
pronounced these words in one of their former
interviews
,
and was wishing, that she and her parents were
flying under his protection from these solitudes, where
savage violence had so often had the ascendency, and
where she dreaded the omens of mustering storms.
She was so intently occupied in this employment,
that she barely noticed the approach of horses to the
foot of the declivity. A moment afterwards, a
powerful
Shienne Indian rushed upon her. He cried
fiercely
in his own language, as he raised his hatchet over
her head, `be silent, or die.' He grasped her in his
sinewy arms, with a force, to which all her resistance
was powerless. Half a dozen Indians, discovered by
their dialect to be Shienne, aided him to bear her
down to the bank of the stream. Her cries were
disregarded
,
or only redoubled the rude brutality of the
force, by which she was borne along. She was lifted,
as she had been an article of lading, into a periogue,
which was instantly filled with the Shienne. Their
paddles struck the stream with unwonted force.
Borne on, at once by the powerful current and this
rapid rowing, the periogue glided swiftly down the
stream. If she attempted to cry, savage hands were
applied to her mouth. If she attempted to struggle,
she was in the grasp of the brawny savage, who held
her, as if controlled to stillness by the iron machinery
of mechanic power. `Help, Father in heaven!' was
all the forlorn daughter could utter, as she saw the
peaceful smoke of her father's house disappear from
her vision. She glided by the trees with such
fearful
rapidity, that, with her overwhelming emotions, it
made her brain dizzy to behold them. At the distance
of a league from the Shoshonee village, where pursuit
seemed no longer dreaded, the savages refrained from
attempting to stifle her cries, assuring her, that if she
remained quiet, and made no attempt to escape, no
harm should happen to her. She made efforts to
soften
them. She fell on her knees, and uttered such
words, and made such appeals, as nature would
dictate
to a child torn from the arms of parents, so
honored
and loved. Their brutal laugh, their
conversation
about their own matters, in the midst of her tears
and petitions, convinced her in a moment, that
wisdom
and duty called for silence and resignation, in the
assurance, that whatever their purpose was, she might
as well expostulate against her fate in the dull cold
ear of death. She murmured in a low tone, `my
parents
!
my home! farewell.' A shower of tears
relieved
her bursting bosom.
That long night, which seemed to her an age, elapsed,
as she still continued to be borne rapidly down the
stream. As the beams of the morning began to tinge
the orient, and the distant mountains, she perceived,
that she was passing the gap of the Sewasserna. The
frowning and iron-bound mountains here present a
fearful spectacle to a person descending the river,
which laves either side of the cleft mountain, that
towers
with its dark cliffs from the bosom of the stream to
an immense height above. The view, dimly
discernible
by the uncertain dawn, seemed to her imagination
in keeping with the inexorable beings, who were
hurrying
her through these frightful scenes, she knew not
whither. Dark and interminable shadows rested
upon
every part of the outline, except where morning
had begun to scatter the light of her watch-fires in
her triumphal march.
A mile or two beyond the gap, the periogues came
to shore in a thick wooded bottom. The same
powerful
savage, who first bore her on board, and who sat
constantly near her, during the descent, bade her
follow
him on shore. She answered in his own speech,
`thou canst kill, bad Shienne; but the heart defies thy
power. I will not move for thee.' `We will see to
that,' he quickly answered. `The young bird does
not easily resist the bald eagle.' He once more seized
her in his arms, and bore her through the woods,
preceded
by three savages and followed by the same
number
.
Just as a belt of gold began to mark the eastern
horizon, they emerged from the wooded alluvion to a
little prairie, bounded by a magnificent black parapet
of rocks, which sprang up, as it were, to the sky, from
the level of the prairie. Amidst the terror,
exhaustion
and overwhelming sensations of her forlorn
condition
,
she discovered by a glance, that she was
brought to the roots of that range of mountains, awful
and interdicted to Indian thoughts, sacred to the little
white men of the mountains, and known in the
Shoshonee
dialect by the name Manitouna, the spirit's
dwelling, or as Elder Wood rendered it, the devil's
house. She had more sensible evidence of the fact,
a moment afterwards. Her savage bearer relaxed his
grasp, and seated her on the grass at the foot of this
stupendous
wall. The savages all paused, and clapping
their hands to their mouths, and passing them rapidly
backwards and forwards, gave forth that sharp and
terrible Indian yell, which is so well remembered by
those, acquainted with the red men. The mountains
rung. The wolves heard in their dens, and answered
by a long dismal howl, waking up the sleeping
morning
echoes. This was repeated two or three times.
Soon afterwards, a movement appeared in a small
orifice
in the wall, a few feet before them. A stone
sunk, and left a narrow chasm. The Indians entered
one by one, inclining to a position almost horizontal.
After three had disappeared in this way, under the
superincumbent wall, her muscular tormentor signed
22*
her to incline herself, and follow in the same way the
Indians who had preceded her. As she demurred,
she was compelled to enter as before, the savage
without
placing her in the grasp of invisible arms within,
by which she felt herself rapidly drawn through a
long dark chasm, from which she emerged to the
bright light of morning, and was released, as she
raised
herself erect upon a tender, green sward, and
looked round with equal amazement and terror upon
a little square prairie, walled in on every side by
perpendicular
walls of stone, reaching, as it seemed, to
the clouds. She saw herself a prisoner in the
Manitouna
,
or spirit house. Renewing the yell, with
which they had entered, the sharp notes of which
reverberated
in a thousand sounds, inflicting pain upon
the ear, as they came back like electric strokes from
the frowning walls, they disappeared, telling her,
that she was now the charge of the little white men
of the mountains.
This strange spot, in Shoshonee dialect,
Manitouna
,
was a result of one of those astonishing freaks, that
nature is sometimes seen to take in the transition
region
of mountains, when she seems hesitating between
lime stone and sand stone formation. The prairie
might contain six acres, of which a parallel belt of
two acres was a thick wood. From the roots
of the mountain welled a pure spring, which gurgled
across the prairie, just on the margin of the wood, and
parallel with it, and disappeared on the opposite side,
sinking there, in the same manner as it had risen.
The wood was vocal with the song of thousands of
birds, the barking of squirrels, and the joyous cries of
various small quadrupeds. Sheltered by the high
walls from the rude blasts, and open to the influences
of the sun, nature had here formed a kind of
green-house
,
where spring and autumn showed as in a
covenant
,
to linger, the one until replaced by the other;
and, while all beyond this strange enclosure was sear
and brown with the autumnal frostsspring showed,
as if returned without the intervention of winter.
On the thousand flowers, that convered the verdant
carpet of the prairie, hummed innumerable wild bees,
who were here, unbidden, and unwitnessed of man,
pursuing their solitary labors; and here hovered the
gay butterflies, seeking admiration from each other,
rather than the fairest daughters of women. This
strange prison was walled in, nearly in a
quadrangular
form, by walls on three sides eight hundred feet
high; and on the fourth, where it constituted the foot
of the mountain, at least half that height. To this
there was but one entrance, except from the sky, and
that was by the orifice, through which Jessy had been
compelled to enter. A huge poised rock, which a
single hand was sufficient to move, so as to incline it
downwards on a pivoted point, opened sufficient space,
to allow but one person at a time to enter the chasm,
and pass through it into the interior. The stone
required
the same force to incline it back, so as that its
outer face again completely closed the chasm. The
person who commanded the entrance within, had but
to block up this pivoted point with rocks, and it
remained
firmly and immovably barred against mortal
power, however great. There was then neither
ingress
nor escape, except such, as was practicable to
the mountain eagle.
This spot bore marks of having formerly been
occupied
,
as a fortress. But for immemorial duration
of the Shoshonee annals, it had been a medicine place,
interdieted to Indian feet by dread of its invisible
terrors
,
and a consecration to the little white men of the
mountains. For some years past, the sole known
occupant
had been a Shienne woman. From a number
of singularly ugly and ill-tempered old women, who
had been burned, as happens among most Indian
tribes at intervals of some years, as witches, she had
been spared, from superstitious dread, on account of
her superlative ugliness. She affected to dress in the
skins of female opposums, the most monstrous of
quadrupeds
.
She was belted in the middle with the
sloughed
skins of yellow rattle snakes; and her whole body,
and especially her legs, were ornamented with the
crustaceous and crackling bags of their rattles, which,
as she moved, subserved the purposes of the favorite
Indian brass leg-tinklers, and caused her step to
imitate
the rattling of a thousand of the horrid serpents.
Her grizzly black locks were ornamented with little
dried scorpions, newts, chameleons, and other
diminutive
and loathsome lizards. Dried bull-frogs and toads
were reserved, as jewels for days of gala festival, and
extra ornament.
Nature had done much to form a body, for which
all this was in keeping. Her shrivelled face was
adorned with blue and green paint. Her nose was
an exact resemblance of an eagle's beak. Her tall,
muscular and powerful frame was bent in the middle,
so as to leave the beholder in doubt, whether the
bending were the work of continual spasm, or of age.
The eye almost invariably is of one color among the
savages. But nature had awarded her one of green,
and the other of blue, for the sake of variety. These
were the outlines, which words can catch. But there
was a diabolical
j'ne scais quoi
of ugliness, which
would baffle all power of language. Years before she
left her people, she had dwelt alone. Even the Indian
dogs howled, and fled, as she came in sight. She
turned her terrors to account, and muttered
incessantly
about her communion with the little white men
of the mountains. She calculated wisely her
influence
upon the superstitious race. On returning from
an unfortunate expedition, some sixteen years before,
the Indians in a panic instituted a witch ordeal.
Many
old women perished in the flames. But this
frightful
object, called in their language Maniteewah, or
the devil's aunt, was spared, on condition, that she
should forever expatriate herself, enter the
Manitouna
,
and thus as perpetual priestess, dwell alone, to
avert the wrath of the little white men of the
mountains
from her people.
She had been transported here, thrust into the
cavity
,
and left to her native ingenuity to subsist herself
on the numerous animals, with which her inaccessible
residence abounded. Here she had dwelt alone, till
the late intrigues had reminded Julius, and Nelesho,
and some infidel spirits of the Shienne, whom the very
hardihood of guilt had raised above invisible terrors,
how fit a place it was, both by nature and opinion, for
the perpetration of their purposes in relation to the
daughter of Yensi.
Chilled alike with terror and the cold dews of the
preceding night, and rendered almost incapable of
movement, by confinement to a single position on
board the periogue, the fair and frail girl surveyed at
a glance the walls of her prison. She knew the
terrors
of the place by report. `No entrance or escape'
was written visibly on every side. `Let me not sink,'
she thought. `I owe it to my dear parents, not to
yield to imbecile and childish terror. Omnipotence
dwells here, and the strength of Israel hath already
scaled these walls. Let me confide in my Father in
Heaven.'
Thus fortified, she arose, and moved onward, in
efforts
to bring circulation to her benumbed limbs.
With what delight would she have surveyed this
beautiful
and astonishing solitude, had her parents, and
friends been with her. As it was, the pleasant hum
of the bees, the sportive flutter of the thousand
butterflies
,
the charming verdure of the sward, the
magnificence
of the wood, enlivened with a thousand joyous
cries, the beautiful and brilliant morning, brought
to her desolate heart the cheerful omen of the
presence
of the Author of good, as traced by these marks
of his presence in this inaccessible and strange prison.
`He, who hath made this spot so beautiful for himself
alone, can protect and rescue me,' was her inward
ejaculation. Step by step, she advanced towards the
wood, and was already beside the pellucid little
brook, when suddenly she saw various figures
emerging
from the wood, and moving with shouts of
laughter
towards her. Among them she clearly
distinguished
Baptiste and Julius. The whole purpose of
her abduction stood unveiled before her. A chill
perspiration started from every pore; dizziness seized
her head; the trees, every thing whirled; she escaped
misery in the loss of consciousness.
When she recovered recollection, she found
herself
on a mattrass, in a large tent. The finest linen
was spread under her. Her mattrass was enveloped
with the richest damask curtains. Beside her was a
table, spread with refreshments, all denoting
arrangement
got up from Astoria. In the tent was a female
voluptuously dressed on one side, and, moving and
muttering on the other, the horrible vision of
Maniteewah
,
of whom she had heard so much, that she
instantly
recognized the frightful original. She hid her
eyes with her hands, and uttered a feeble cry of
horror
.
The two figures disappeared, and Julius
entered
alone. He took her languid hand, which she had
not strength to withdraw. `Have I frightened thee,
my pretty Wakon-bird?' he asked. `Has that
hell-fiend
taught thee by comparison, that there are
persons
uglier than thy Julius?' She answered by a
look of astonishment, and eyes swimming in tears.
`Weepest thou, pretty one?' he asked. `What a
beautiful
hand, I hold!' `I have no protector, to punish
thee, wretch, nor strength to withdraw it. Findest
thou thy prize beautiful, coward,' she faintly replied.
`Indeed is it, Wakona, the prettiest I ever handled;
and I have felt pretty ones before.' `Would it restore
me to those, who would protect me, I would
cheerfully
cut off this hand, and give it thee.' `No! No!
pretty one. Keep it. I much prefer thee with the
living hand, as thou art.' At the same time he
gathered
in his palm, the silken curls, that hung on her
neck. `These curls,' he said, `are divine, and fit
ornaments
for Venus at the drawing room of Jove.'
`Give me scissors, Julius, and I will cut these curls,
and give thee, or aught else, that might bribe thee
from thy robber purpose.' `No. Sweet one; the
locks, the lovely head, the hand, the person, all, are
mine, without thy giving. In a little time, I dare
swear, the heart will follow; and those eyes will
survey
me with love and pleasure, as marked, as the
disdain
,
that now flashes in them.' `Julius, is it indeed,
then, a monstrous and horrible fact, that such a
form can contain not a bad mind only, but the heart of
a fiend?' `Am I then handsome, pretty one, and a
fiend, at the same time? I do not take, my bird. I
swallow neither the compliment, nor the fiend. Ah!
Wakona, canst thou say in thy heart, that it is
fiendish
,
to love to distraction and death, that face, that
love-kindling eyethat admirable formthose curls,
that hand? Why, dear, there is nothing more of a
fiend in it, than there is in loving honey, and sugar,
and wine, and disliking vinegar and rhubarb.' `I
would not say to you, Julius, that this is not witty, for
I would soothe you. Time was, when I had even
kind thoughts, and a partial preference for you, when,
in the face and person, I imagined the mirror of a
mind as fair.' `Deardear; I do not take, I say
bird of paradise. I love thee to distraction and death;
and time was, when I wished your love in return
and offered you, as the boon, what the proudest have
sought in vain. But such compliments are now apart
from business. My sweet one, my love, my dove, my
undefiled, my Wakona, thy handsome Julius had done
with wooing and kneeling, and is all for action. When
the shades have descended upon this pretty, snug,
country-seatah, my dove, thou wilt no longer think
me a fiend; and how ready thou wilt be, pretty one,
after a day or two, the next time I propose marriage,
to say ay, and amen.' `Julius Landino, thou art,
indeed
,
a fiend. A very vampyre fiend hath taken
residence
in this form. Would, that all could see
externals
,
as I see them now. I should loathe you less,
abhorred wretch, were you in the form of
Maniteewah
.
There would be no mockery then, no label of
heaven, on the essence of hell.' `Ah! pretty one, now
I takethou art thrice more fair, with that pretty
glow of indignation and contempt, than when
attempting
to wheedle me with a compliment.' `Julius, I
fear you not. A mind, poised on its If, is out of the
reach of outrage or debasement. I have no more
words for you, Sir. You shall know more of me,
when occasion calls for it.'
She discovered, that high minded daring, in this
way, awed him, and that his licentious and cowardly
spirit quailed under the flashing of her eye. She said
sternly to him, `let me pass, and resist at your peril.'
His color changed; he shrunk back, and stood aside,
and allowed her to pass.
`You see, Jessy,' he observed in a manner, that
evidenced
,
he was struggling for calmness, `I allow you
the customary indulgence of a lover on the bridal day.
These hours, and this range are yours. Go and amuse
yourself, where you please. You may search for the
means of elopement. Nothing, but Omnipotence can
deliver you. If you return not to this tent by noon,
my faithful Shienne will bring you here by force.
Go, then, and allow me to hope, that, ere night arrives,
your good sense will have distated to you submission,
if not affection.'
The hated form of his licentious and base female
minion of pleasure was out of her sight; and as she
once more respired the free and open air, her
suffocating
palpitations gradually became less distressing;
and she commenced a faithful survey of the means,
resources and purposes, which might arm, and fit her
for what was before her. They, who are gifted with
a sound mind, and who retain in the last extreme of
pressure the firmness and self-possession of innocence,
find within them powers of preparation for such
emergencies
,
of which, in the hours of calmness and
security
,
they dreamed not; and could not have believed,
that such dormant treasures were locked up within
them. It occurred to her, even in the distraction of
the moment, when she first saw Maniteewah, that she
had imagined, she discovered pity for her in the
expression
of her countenance, loathsome as it was.
`The beauty of this wretch,' she reflected, `has
proved
the Apple of Sodom. Why may not the other
extreme be a false semblance? I have found a fiend
iu Julius. May not heaven have sent me deliverance
in this odious form?' The hope radiated through her
heart, like a ray from aboveand, such is the power
of association, she directed her steps towards this
loathsome being, almost with feelings of affection.
From afar she saw the deformed and dreaded object
approaching her, and renewing within her childish
terrors, as she again neared her. She felt how
unworthy
it would be, to shrink from the harmless
repulsiveness
of mere appearance. She rather
approached
,
than shunned this deformed mockery of woman.
The strange being seemed flattered by this mark of
daring. She came in front of the fair captive. `
Knowest
thou our speech, fair pale face?' she said. Jessy
answered, `she did.' `Thou fliest me not, Wakona,
like yonder vile slave of her own cowardly terrors.
I will reward thy confidence.' So saying, in a tone
sufficiently like other Indian women, to show her of
their race, but otherwise grating and unearthly, she
began to sing`The wild creatures of the woods
destroy
not their own kinds. But the accursed pale
faces
prey upon each other. The white eagle would
clutch the Wakon bird.' Then the deep Indian
chorus
VOL. I. 23
followed. The next stanza ran in this strain.
`Mind the word of the Maniteewah, fair daughter of
the pale face, change the cupchange the cup!give
him the sleep, which he hath medicined for thee. The
Wahcondah will help. The little white men of the
mountains will help. Courage, fair daughter of the
pale face.' Another chorus followed. She then
added. `Go, daughter of the pale faceHold a talk
with thy Wahcondah. The noble chief will come,
with the help of the little white men of the mountains.
Change the cupchange the cup! Go forth, and
feel the beams of the sun.' With these words the
song closed, and the horrible object returned to her
recesses, motioning her not to follow.
Obeying the mysterious intimations, Jessy walked
into the open prairie, and felt the cheering influences
of the sun, banishing chill from her frame. Her heart
ascended above the hills, `whence our help cometh,'
for direction and firmness. She revolved all the
chances
of events before her, tasked her purposes, probed
her conscience, and made her final resolves for such
emergencies, as her apprehensions pointed out to her.
She had little heart to survey, or to feel the beauty
and grandeur of this strange and solitary prison. But
so deep was her admiration of the beautiful and the
wonderful of nature, that it may not be said, that she
sauntered round the walls of the enclosure, without
some occasional gleams of pleasant sensation, in view
of the singular character of this smiling, rock-walled
garden, scooped out of the mountains. In prayer, in
self communion, in humble attempts to establish
unshaken
resolve for probable trials, the hours passed,
while she sometimes stooped, and plucked a flower,
and scattered its petals to the wind; sometimes sat
by the little transparent spring, percolating from the
base of the mountains; and sometimes walked
listlessly
forward, every moment looking, as the convict
awaiting execution, to the progress of the sun along
the firmament. The sun had passed the meridian,
when she saw two Indians approaching her. Having
taken no sustenance since her departure from the
valley
,
she felt herself sinking from faintness. `I will
go with them,' she said; `I will take food, and strive
to sustain myself for whatever I have to encounter.
I will even make efforts to soothe this abandoned
wretchand may God support the oppressed.' The
Indians, with a manner of as much respect and
humanity
as their office would allow, motioned her to
follow them in silence. As they passed on, they were
joined by Baptiste, who bowed, and babbled, as was
his fashion. His object appeared to be, to persuade
her to be courteous and complaisant to Julius. `He
was all kindness to them,' he said, `who pleased him,
and only headstrong and farouche to those, who
thwarted his fancies, or wounded his vanity.' Upon
the word the unhappy prisoner, calling in aid all her
powers, implored him to have mercy upon her, and in
some way to aid her, in escaping from his
persecutions
.
He affected, as usual, the most entire devotion
to her purposes; but she saw clearly enough, that it
was all hollow affectation, and that he was the base
and polluted instrument of all the purposes of Julius.
He was unwearied in the theme of his beauty and
wealth, and the extent, to which he had been courted
in his own country, and the honor, he conferred on
the object of his preference, and the happiness she
ought to find, in being favored with it.
In the endurance of such odious soothing, she
arrived
at the tent. She entered it with a cheek
alternately
flushed and pale. Julius was sitting there, in
company with his Indians. He instantly motioned
them to retire, and ordered Baptiste to remain in
waiting
.
The table was spread with venison, wild fowl, and
various kinds of food, from Indian supply, and from
Astoria. Glasses and wine were on the table; and
the whole, to one whose palpitations of heart, and
whose extreme terror had been less, would have had
in contrast with the position and circumstances, a
strange mockery of the semblance of comfort and even
luxury. He begged her to be seated, and to take
refreshments
.
With apparent docility, she seated
herself
at the table. `I shall take food, Julius, thanking
the despicable robber, that in tearing me away from
my parents, his purpose seems not to have been, to
starve me to death. Man of gallantry! Man of honor!
I shall take food with far different purposes, from
those, to which you will attribute the act;' and she
began, without waiting for entreaty, or ceremony, to
eat of the plainest food before her. Deportment so
wide from his preconceived expectations, he was
pleased to observe, astounded him. She saw that he
was at a loss for words, that he bit his lips, and
evinced
the meditations and the sufferings of a fiend. He
occasionally took a piece of the foreign cake, and
sipped
wine, apparently at a loss for discourse. At
length he spoke quick, and with effort. `I am
charmed
,
however, notwithstanding your compliments, to
see you eat so heartily. I wish, I could persuade you
to pledge me in this wine.' `Most certainly I will,' she
replied, `for I am both faint and thirsty, and since I
have been dragged away by your Indians, I have
suffered through the long night and day from fatigue
and exhaustion and agony of heart. I have been
suffocated by the ruffian Shienne, and then turned
over to the society of Maniteewah. I shall need all
the sustentation that wine and high purpose can
impart
.
Fair faced and honorable friend, repair, I pray
you, to yonder spring, and with your own knightly
hands bring me water, with which to dash my wine,
for I am unused to take it unmixed; and I will pledge
you to all generous and honorable purposes.' His
cheek flushed, and he looked her full in the face.
`By  said he, `you are the most dmd rarity,
with which I have ever meta queer one, by heaven.
What infinite vivacity of spirit! What a charming
bride I shall have! I fly, for your purposes;' and he
took a goblet, and moved towards the spring, which
gurgled along at the distance of twenty paces. The
song of Maniteewah had rung in her ear in its
unearthly
tones, from the moment she had heard it;
`change the glass; change the glass.' A large, and
full glass sat by her plate, and another by his. She
changed them in a moment, and before he was so on
the return as to notice it. He sat down the goblet,
and she poured her wine into a tumbler, and filled it
with water. `You dilute it too much,' said he. `You
are unused to wine, I see.' `I am exceedingly
thirsty
,
my very honorable friend,' she replied. `I pledge
you, sir, to this sentimentMay Areskoui storm the
dastardly oppressor in his den, and put him to the
trial by fire at the stake.' `I pledge you my dove,
my Wakona, but not exactly to that sentiment; may
you solicit my hand. May I have the satisfaction of
passing you over, a despised and humbled thing,
according
to my purpose, to Nelesho, to whom you are
promised. You are mine, pretty one, understand
me, for lawless love. Thy beloved Areskoui is
neither
eagle to scale the mountains, nor omnipotent to
remove the poised stone. Long before the half breed
recreant can be here, I shall have accomplished all
my wishes. He may besiege this impregnable fortress
for a month; I should play the while with thy curls,
and laugh at him. But I have cared for that too; and
he will have sufficient occupation with thy future
master, Nelesho, at home.' They bowed in derision
to each other. The one raised his glass, and the
other the tumbler, and drank their contents together.
She continued to eat, and he in the same strain, to
23 *
taunt her with his purposes, and to deride her with
the utter hopelessness of rescue or relief.
Let her indescribable joy be imagined, as she
observed
his cheek flush, and his eye become glossy and
swimming, and his words maudlin and unconnected.
`By ' said he, `I believe you have played me a
trick of hell. I must sleep. My bird, you have
changed glasses.' `Indeed have I, vampyre; and I
hope for your sake, that yours contained poison more
deadly, than that of the asp. I have no doubt, that
you are capable of giving poison.' He attempted an
answer in the same spirit; but the weight of
unconquerable
sleep already pressed upon his eye-lids.
His begun words fell half formed from his lips, and
occasional stertor indicated, that some narcotic of
potent medication, infused in his wine, had taken
irresistible
effect. He reeled from his seat, and sank in
profound sleep on the ground.
She poured thanksgivings to the Almighty from a
full heart, and walked forth, receiving what had
happened
,
as an omen of escape from the power of the
villain. As she advanced in the direction of the cave,
she again met Maniteewah. `Hast thou heeded my
song, pale face?' she asked. `I have; and he sleeps,'
was the reply. `Go, then, to thy Wahcondah, and
implore him to send thee aid by the little white men
of the mountains. Thy tormentor will sleep, till this
time to-morrow's sun.' She again beckoned her to
go forth into the open prairie, and left her, as before.
The desolate heart of the fair captive, now relieved
from the pressure of intolerable and immediate
apprehensions
,
gave itself up to dreams of hope and relief.
She sat down in meditation on a rock, where the
spring issued from the mountains. It becomes
necessary
,
to turn back and contemplate the position of
things in the valley, where her abduction had brought
indescribable misery.
The customary guests, Frederic, Elder Wood and
Areskoui, were at William Weldon's dwelling, on
the evening of her departure. She, who was equally
the light of the eyes of each, did not appear. When
the dusk of evening had come, without her return,
Yensi became anxious. An alarm was raised. The
bower was explored. She was not to be seen. The
tracks of horses were remarked; and the footsteps of
men, who wore moccasins, leading to the bower. The
mystery was soon explained. Julius, Baptiste, and
a number of Shienne were gone. Some Shoshonee,
returning from their hunting, had seen too periogues
paddling rapidly down the river, and in one of them,
they had discovered a white woman, but too distant
to be recognized. To Areskoui every thing was
explained
in the twinkling of an eye. Alarm and horror
and wailing filled the dwelling of William Weldon.
Yensi fainted, and lost the horror of the hour in
unconsciousness
.
Ellswatta repaired to the habitation
of Nelesho. He was gone with his select warriors, as
was said, on a trapping expedition. But the
experienced
eye of the chief traced in the murky
countenances
of the Shienne, that they were well acquinted
with all that had happened. William Weldon's stern
and philosophic bosom was moved to distraction and
and despair. He tore his gray locks, imprecated
vengeance on the villains, who had robbed him of his
daughter, and cried with the royal bereaved one of
old time, `would to God, I had died for thee, my
daughter, my daughter.'
The Shoshonee were summoned to a hasty
counsel
.
Torches gleamed in the dusk of twilight. Arms
and a party were expeditiously collected. Frederic
and Areskoui consulted together. The community
of suffering brought them to a confession of full
confidence
.
`We are one,' they said, `for life or death, to
recover her.' They would have persuaded Elder
Wood to remain and strive to comfort the mourners.
But, he said, somewhat proudly, `I am a full blooded
Kentuckian, and you will not exclude me from a
partnership, at once for such righteous purposes, and
so full of danger.' Hatch, suspected to be in the
interests
of Julius, gave some frivolous pretext, as a
reason for remaining behind. William Weldon
suffered
from an agony, too acute, to allow him the
requisite
calmness to join the expedition, and his stay
was pronounced necessary for the care of his
unconscious
and half expiring wife. Ten warriors,
thoroughly
armed with knives, pistols and yagers, together
with Elder Wood, Areskoui, and Frederic, were
descending
the Sewasserna in a few hours after the
abduction
,
and with a rapidity not inferior to that of
those who bore Jessy away. It would be useless, to
think of depicting the misery of the bereaved family.
The Shoshonee, who witnessed the departing
expedition
on the shore, were many of them affected to
tears, by witnessing the grief and distraction of
William
Weldon. Wakona was the common idol of the
tribe; and loud and deep curses were imprecated upon
them, who had carried her off; and many charges,
counsels, and earnest good wishes were uttered for
the party thus attempting rescue. It would be equally
hopeless, to give the conversations, and describe the
mingled emotions of the pursuers, as under the dark
shadows of the mountains, and the light of the stars,
that twinkled above, they glided down the Sewasserna.
They passed the gap in nearly the same time with
those they pursued. As they opened on the prospect
beyond, `Yonder,' cried Areskoui, `are their
periogues
.'
To the eye of the whites no trace of periogues
appeared on the shore. But the more acute and
observant
Indians remarked, as they glided along, near
the shore, a narrow bayou, scarcely wide enough to
admit a periogue. It had been choked with
waterlilies
,
and other aquatic plants. They discerned in
a narrow line of clear surface, from which the twiny
stems of the aquatic foliage had been forced away,
that periogues had been pushed along that bayou.
The evidence was conclusive, and they landed,
moved
a few rods up the bayou, and the whites saw that
the Indians had reasoned right. There were the two
well known periogues, marked with the Shienne
totem
,
drawn up in such a way as to be wholly invisible
to people descending the river. `There they are
yonder,' cried Areskoui, `in the impregnable fastness
of the Manitouna. We have not the strength of the
Wahcondah, to remove the huge rock at the entrance,
nor the wings of the eagle, to scale the high walls,
and light among them. There they are provisioned,
no doubt for a long siege. They can escape when
they choose, and we have no means of entering for
rescue.'
He led them to the well known entrance. The
poised rock was firm upon the orifice. The
Shoshonee
clapped their hands to their mouths, and moving
them rapidly over their lips, uttered a war cry, that
fell away in a thousand broken snatches in echoes
among the mountains. In half a minute a well known
Shienne cry of counter defiance arose from within.
The countenance of the whole party evidenced their
desire of vengeance. Jessy also heard the cry from
within; and her acquaintance with Indian manners
informed her, that attempted rescue was at hand.
Maniteewah heard it, and was directly beside her.
`Courage, pale face,' she cried, `the little white men
of the mountains will aid them.'
The rescue party paused for deliberation. No one
could propound the slightest chance of success, or
imagine any other expedient, than to besiege them
patiently in their own den. `That expedient is
hopeless
,'
replied Areskoui. `They are, no doubt,
provisioned
for a long siege. If they were not, there is
water and shelter, and abundance of small game
within
;
and they could easily subsist there through all the
moons of the year.' Silent despondence sat upon
every
countenance. `Is there no way to scale the walls
on any point?' asked Frederic. `No more,' replied
Areskoui, `than to ascend to the abode of the Master
of Life.' `Will you two follow me?' said he,
addressing
himself to Elder Wood and Frederic. Frederic
sprang to him, and held him in close embrace. `I
will follow the noble young chief to the death; and if
Jessy should be recovered by your counsels and
daring
,
admit, that you are more worthy of her, than
myself.' `It is enough for me to say,' replied Elder
Wood, `that I was born in Kentucky; that I love
Jessy
,
as a daughter; that I shall never smile again,
until
we recover her; and that I fear God, and have no
other fear.' `Of you, my red brethren,' said
Areskoui
,
turning to his select Shoshonee, `I need not ask
the question. We have been together by flood and
by field, on mountain and plain, in sport and in the
death struggle. Follow me, then. Let us go up to
the haunts of the eagle. Let us scale the abode of
the little white men of the mountains.' At the word
he sprang away, and began to ascend the mountain,
bounding from rock to rock, drawing himself up by
bushes and vines, outstripping all the rest, and from
more elevated points indicating to those behind the
proper mode of ascent. It was a long, wearying, and
most laborious effort to gain the lowest summit, that
overlooked the Manitouna. It might be twelve
hundred
feet in height. They had some time since
reached
the elevation, where winter now reigned. Here,
on a large table rock, whose shallow pan of earth was
in different places covered with laurels, they stopped,
at once for rest, and survey of the scene below.
Frederic
had taken the precaution to carry with him a
pocket telescope. He applied it to his eye. Every
object in the prairie of the Manitouna was as
distinctly
visible, as if they had been at only ten paces
distance
.
`I see her! I see her!' he exclaimed. `There
she stands, holding forth her hands, as if she saw us,
and implored our aid.' He handed the telescope to
Areskoui. He saw her, too, as was seen by his
flashing
eye, and near her Maniteewah, whom he
recognized
by her uncouth and horrible appearance. The
smokes of habitancy were seen arising from the little
wood. Next, Elder Wood surveyed the scene below.
There could be no question. Jessy was there, and
her attitude was as of one imploring aid.
What was to be done? Frederic and Areskoui
were for a few moments too frantic in their eagerness,
to fix upon any thing. The young chief soonest
regained
his self-possession. `My purpose is taken,'
said he. `Who of you will follow me? The attempt
is dangerous, and it may be fatal. But we owe one
death to the Wahcondah, and I am ready to put mine
on the issue of this enterprize. See you yonder wood
below us? To that point we can slide on the frozen
snow. It may be, we can neither advance, or recede
from that point, if we reach it. It may be, we shall
be dashed on the rocks, before we reach it. But, if
we descend safely there, we shall have made the
greater portion of the descent, and another hazard
may land us safely, beside Wakona.' As he said this,
he began to break off the leafy laurel branches, and
to invest himself in them, apparently, that in passing
over sharp and jagged points of rocks, the firm and
thick foliage might guard his body from being
lacerated
.
Frederic followed his example. `I am with
you by contract,' he said, `for life or death.' Some of
his followers pronounced the attempt hopeless, and
wavered for a moment. But, seeing the confident
countenance of their chief, they too tore off the laurel
branches, and stood looking askance upon the shining
and fearful declivity below them. Elder Wood, though
last, showed himself not least in firmness. `I was born
in Kentucky,' said he. `Shall these dare that for mere
human love, which I dare not for the love of God and
souls? We can die but once; and for me, I trust,
come when it may, death will be gain.' They were all
quickly enveloped in laurel branches, fastened in
every
possible way to their bodies. Areskoui
admonished
each to take a sharp pointed stick in his hand,
by which to guide himself, while gliding over the
ice. Each manifested his own way of preparation.
Elder Wood looked upwards. The lovers held out
their hands towards the captive below. The
Shoshonee
sang a strain of the death song. It was
settled
,
that Areskoui should precede, and that the rest
should follow in an order, which was instantly
arranged
.
The noble countenance of the chief blenched
not, as he commenced the fearful experiment; and
fearful it was, to see the green mass, for such he
seemed
,
from his envelope of boughs, precipitated down
the glazed surface, with the swiftness of a descending
avalanche. In the twinkling of an eye, he had
disappeared
behind a projection covered with green
moss. Frederic followed, and the Indians and Elder
Wood each in their turn. The descent might be
eight hundred feet, and the declivity a fourth of a
league. An approving providence guided them
safely
down, though their invelope had been rudely
dissipated
,
and their leather dress had been much torn.
There was not one, who did not bleed from the
wounds received in the descent.
They found themselves brought up in a shelving
wood, the lower declivity of which overlooked the
wood below, and seemed little more than a hundred
feet from the level of the prairie. But that descent
was perpendicular, without a single apparent crevice
or fissure in the distance, by which the hands could
hold, or the fall be broken. Certain death, it seemed,
must be the result of a leap to the prairie. The
descent
,
by which they had slidden, it was hopeless to
think of ascending again. Thus were they placed
between the heavens and the earth, tantalized with
seeing themselves near the object of their pursuit,
and the level earth; and yet no way appeared, by
which that last descent could be accomplished, except
at the certain sacrifice of life. Add to this, that their
position no longer afforded them a view of the
captive
,
and the sun, sunk behind the peaks above them,
would soon be succeeded by the dimness and
uncertainty
of twilight. Their last condition seemed to
the two white men the most deplorable and hopeless
of all. They admitted at least, that nothing could be
done, until another morning should throw light upon
their counsels. `Acknowledge,' said Areskoui, `that
there are emergencies, when the red and untaught
dweller of the solitude commands more resources and
forecast, than the pale face. We will be on yonder
plain, and rescue Wakona, before the last gleams of
twilight are faded.' Frederic embraced him once
more. `Areskoui,' he cried, `thou art to us both mind
and arm, and we are infants compared with thee. I
know, thou wouldst not encourage false hopes; and
yet my thoughts cannot fix on even the semblance of
the means of descent.' `Let us see,' said Areskoui,
and began cutting off and tearing from the trees, grape
vines, which inveloped almost every tree in this fertile
declivity. When detached and straightened, they
were of prodigious length. From the leather of his
dress he cut straps and thongs, by which they were
tied together, according to necessity. By many of
their twiny stems they were made fast to a tree near
the verge of the precipice, and the heavier trunks
thrown down. The Indians, delighted with the
invention
,
VOL. I. 24
would have shouted with exultation. Areskoui
hushed them. `We must attack them by surprise, for
they are nearly our own numbers; and we descend
upon them precisely at the right moment of time,
when darkness will favor our attack.' `Thou art
indeed
,'
said Elder Wood, `as an angel of God, in
counsel
,
Areskoui.' `See now, Frederic, and
acknowledge
,
that all wisdom would not have died with us.
See there the science of the woods. There is a
ladder
of ropes, such as I have descended in sport, a
hundred
times in my young days.' Areskoui
deliberately
prepared his weapons, his pistols, his dirk, and slung
his yager after the fashion of his people. He insisted
upon making the first descent himself. When at the
foot he was to shake the ladder of vines, to give
notice
that it was ready for the descent of another.
The order of succession in descent was settled, as
before
,
and the intrepid young warrior fell down, like a
sailor on his rope, on his own ingenious contrivance.
Scarcely two minutes elapsed, before the notice was
given, that he was on the firm ground. Another and
another followed, and all reached the prairie in
safety
.
The point of descent was at some distance from
the tent. `See that our weapons are all in order,'
said Areskoui; `and let our hands be active, our eyes
true, and our hearts firm. I know not the number of
the Shienne, nor the prowess of Baptiste and Julius.
But we must prepare for fight. Let us advance to
the smokes in profound silence. When there, I will
precede, and explore.' They each examined his
weapons, and marched in Indian file towards the
wood. Arrived there, Areskoui requested each
individual
to lie close upon the leaves, while he
crawled
cautiously in advance. He soon returned,
informing
that the Shienne and Baptiste were all carousing
high. `Let us fall upon them in their perfect
security
,
and in the unguardedness of insanity from the
medicine
drink.' Accordingly they surrounded then
unheeded, uttered the dire Indian yell, and rushed in
upon the astounded, and intoxicated party. Almost
before they could stand to their arms, two or three
were wounded, and the remainder offered the custom
ary signal of submission. `Where is Wakona?' the
all cried together, as they were binding the vanquish
ed Shienne. They replied, with Maniteewah. They
were at the entrance of her wigwam in a moment
and, all, unconscious of the observances of form, em
braced the fair rescued one, as she made for the arm
of Elder Wood. She kissed his hand, as he strained
her to his bosom. `God, I thank thee,' said he, a
the tears streamed down his cheeks, `that this, my
daughter, was dead, and is alive again; was lost, and
is found.' `My father, my father!' said Jessy, `it i
worth all, I have suffered, this single moment of
rescue
.
Oh God, accept my full heart.' Areskoui held
one hand in strong grasp, and Frederic the other; and
exclamations of affection, too mighty for control, were
the order of this joyous moment. The repulsive
spectacle of the bark wigwam looked on, and
laughed
convulsively. `Am I worthy to be roeasted to death,
as a witch,' said she, `young chief? See, but for me
Wakona would have been the prey of a pale face of
her own race. I was in the power of the Shienne,
and dared no more. Enquire of Wakona, and if I
have deserved evil at your hand, I refuse not to die.'
This introduced questioning, what had become of
Julius
?
`The babbling pale faces,' said she, `are
together
;
the one in the deep medicine sleep, which he
had prepared for Wakona, and the other fled, like a
base coward, from his drinking to his master.'
As soon as Jessy had recovered calmness to relate
what was necessary for the elucidation of the earnest
curiosity of the moment, she explained, in a few words
the present posture of circumstances, and how it ha
occurred. The tent was secured. Baptiste and
Julius
were both ordered to be bound, and consigned,
as prisoners, along with the captured Shienne, to the
care of the Shoshonee. They found the villain, still
beautiful even in the stertor of intoxicated sleep from
the potent infusions of Indian narcotics. There
holay
on his mattrass, his cheek flushed, and the
expression
of anticipated villainy sealed upon his licentious
countenance. Baptiste begged mercy of Frederic
and Elder Wood. `Accursed villain,' said the former,
`you richly merit the halter, or the stake. Let
Areskoui
decide. I shall not interfere.' `Nor I,' firmly
answered Elder Wood. `It is not in a Kentuckian's
heart to be particularly merciful to such a villain as
thou hast proved.' `O mon Dieu! Mon Dieu!' cried
the terror stricken coward, `ayez pitie. Certainement,
cher comerade, you will not allow a brother trapper
to be roasted alive;' and he continued to implore
mercy
,
until they left the tent.
The question was, whether they should
immediately
commence their return, or remain, and take the
refreshment of a night's rest? Jessy, completely
exhausted
with fatigue, watching, terror and endurance
of every sort, required an hour's repose. Supper was
prepared, of the sumptuous regale intended for other
uses. The sleeping wretch was dragged forth into
the open air, to recover, and awaken at his leisure.
A blessing being duly invoked by Elder Wood, they
sat down to a repast, which hunger, joy and rapture,
and the presence of the recovered Jessy, rendered
delicious
.
Questions without answers, and
congratulations
and bursts of joyous emotion seasoned that
supper
.
Areskoui and Frederic and Elder Wood, in
their blankets round a fire that blazed high and bright
among the trees, kept watch at the tent door; while
Jessy, after having devoutly made her thanksgivings
to her Almighty deliverer, laid her down to sleep.
She awoke before midnight, aroused her friends,
and begged, if they were ready, to be on the return.
`My parents, my parents!' she said. `I dare not
indulge
longer in sleep. Let me be on the way to
relieve
their agony.' Julius, removed to the keen air
of the night, had recovered consciousness, and was
slowly aroused by Baptiste, who lay bound fast, with
five of the ringleaders of the Shienne beside him, to
a full acquaintance with his situation. He, too,
meanly
implored mercy, and insisted, that he had
entertained
none, but honorable designs, in reference to
Jessy. He was told, that the baseness of his
falsehood
would only tend to enhance the certainty and
severity of his punishment; and he remained as
straightly bound, as the rest.
As they were accelerating their preparations to be
on their return, Maniteewah appeared before them
in all her horrible decorations. `Young chief of the
Shoshonee and Shienne,' she said, `mercy and
protection
.
Wakona hath told thee, that I deserve it at
thy hand. Thou wilt not account it my crime, that I
have been a little while in the power of Nelesho and
the bad pale face.' `Thou hast performed that for
me,' replied the young chief, `which shall never be
forgotten. Ask, and whatever is in my power, I will
grant thee.' My demands are few, and easily
granted
,
she returned. `Allow me, when thou art chief,
after thy father has gone to the sunless valley, to
remain
here unmolested in this medicine grove of the
little white men of the mountains, as I have been
indulged
by thy father. Let the medicine men be
subservient
to my stronger spells. Let my authority with
the little powerful dwellers above be always
acknowledged
.'
In short, the purport of her request was,
that she might be recognized, sustained, and
continued
by the chief, to dwell there unmolested,
unquestioned
and alone, as high priestess of the mysteries of
24*
Manitouna. Her request was readily granted, and it
drew from Elder Wood and Frederic remarks of
astonishment, in view of the strong propensity of the
human heart every where to obtain prescribed
authority
,
and veneration. Here it was sought, at the
expense
of living in this dreary solitude, this living
sepulchre
of the mountains; and sustained by bearing
the form and wearing the habiliments of horrid and
disgusting ugliness. Such is superstition, and such
the love of spiritual power. The prisoners, with their
arms pinioned closely behind them, were driven
before
their victors; and Jessy, led by Elder Wood,
followed
them. Maniteewah brought up the rear,
singing
in her shrillest and most unearthly tones, `go forth,
red and pale face, joyfully. The little white men
guard you. The moon shine brightly on you. The
south breeze waft you. Wakona shall see her
parents
in joy.' The poised rock was removed. The
parties were extricated. The periogues raised their
sails to the breeze. The moon came forth, with her
broad disk resting on the mountains to illumine the
dark rolling stream. The bland south pushed them
rapidly against the current, constantly inspiring the
pleasant sensation of triumphing over nature and
difficulty
.
Elder Wood discoursed of the deep things of
God and eternity; and their unfailing obligations of
gratitude to the deliverer of the rescued one. The
pale gleams of the planet of night on the mountain
ices, the black peaks casting their shadows in the
stream, the frequent rustling of the falling leaves in
the water and in the forest, the position of the rescued
one, wrapped warmly in buffalo robes, and between
two lovers, the thought that she was returning to her
native valley and her parents, the dim, but glorious
perspective between the mountains, the season, the
deep noon of night, the long, dismal, famished howl of
wolves, far up the rock-bound mountains, the dark
outline
of the trees skirting the river, and the stars and
the blue betweenall conspired to fill her heart with
devotion and rapture.
The periogue which carried Julius and Baptiste
was rowed close beside that of the young chief and
his company. The two miscreants, the one in broken
English, and the other in the most earnest and
humble
tones of entreaty, were attempting to excite
compassion
.
The one implored them,
pour l'amour de Dieu
,
to forgive him; promising to redeem his
misconduct
by the most undeviating fidelity in future.
Julius
,
in stammering accents, and in the humiliation of
conscious guilt, went into a defence of his conduct,
averring, that love was the impulse, and marriage his
ultimate purpose. Jessy requested the chief, that
she might not be subjected to the persecution and
agony
of hearing his voice; and his boat was ordered to
advance beyond the rest, until they should be out of
the reach of his entreaties.
A sustained southern breeze wafted them steadily
on, until the sun arose, and poured his cheering and
glorious radiance upon the sublime spectacle, and
rolled
away the mists from his march over the
mountains
.
`Yonder,' said Jessy, `are the Eagle peaks
above my native dwelling. Oh God, I thank thee!
Heaven grant, that the hearts of my parents may not
be broken.' It would be long, such was the strength
of the current, before they would reach home, even
if the up-stream breeze did not lull; and some part of
that precious time must elapse in the necessity which
compelled them to land, and take breakfast. A fire
was kindled on shore, and a sumptuous breakfast
prepared
from the ample supply, provided by Julius at
the Manitouna. `Behold,' said Elder Wood, as the
venison smoked, and the coffee gave forth its fragrance,
`how God spreadeth for us a table in the wilderness,
and exalteth our horn, and hath put all our enemies
under our feet.' At the same time, the prisoners were
ordered to sit down on the rocks, and receive the
coarse fare, which regarded only the circumstance of
necessary sustenance. `This is the happiest
breakfast
,'
said Elder Wood, `I have ever made. I shall
never forget it.' `And mine;' `and mine,' said
Frederic
and Areskoui; `and mine,' added Jessy, with
swimming eyes, `but for a single deficiency.' The
heart of each had been softened, first by endurance of
danger, and fatigue; and now by excess of joy; and
story and congratulation, and sketches of the joy
preparing
for William Weldon and Yensi, and of their
future modes of spending their time together, now
that Areskoui and Frederic perfectly understood each
other, furnished their theme. Emotions of the heart,
that are estranged from words, were deeply felt, and
joy sparkled in every eye.
The guilty Julius passed pinioned before them on
his way to his periogue. It would be difficult to
imagine
a situation more humiliating and taunting, or
more calculated to place the party in the position,
which of right belonged to his guilt. Elder Wood
moralized upon the natural wages of inquity, in his
hearing, as he passed. `In that unhappy being,' said
he, `you see a picture and a demonstration of that
totally
corrupt human nature, of which I preach, and
the bible speaks. See heaven in the face, and hell in
the heart. Do you not remember, Jessy, the passage
which I marked for you?
Ne crede nimium colori
.
What a lesson to those, who choose merely by
external
beauty. See, in this order of things, the righteous
reaction of a just and avenging providence. See the
lost, but externally fair son of sin and Satan caught in
his own devices, and the jaw teeth of the oppressor
broken
.
See, too, the innocent sufferer returning in joy
to her father's house, and not an hair of her head
harmed. See, and admire in all this, the beautiful
order of an over-ruling providence, and learn to repose
unshaken trust in it.'
A Shoshonee runner had been previously dispatched,
to precede them to Shoshonee town, and premonish
the bereaved parents of all, that had happened. It
would be as useless, to attempt description of what
her parents felt, on learning that she was returning
safe and unharmed, as it would be to paint the agony
occasioned by her abduction. Horses were dispatched
for them; that by avoiding the meanders of the
Sewasserna
,
and crossing the mountains, they might be
able to reach home in half the time which would be
required to ascend the stream. The horses arrived,
while they were still at breakfast. On rising from
their joyful repast, they sent the prisoners on in their
periogue, under a sufficient guard, and took their own
pleasanter and shorter conveyance on horseback.
As they began to ascend the mountains, now glazed
with ice and glittering in the sun beams like a surface
of diamonds, the air indeed was keen, but bracing and
exhilarating, and inspired those delightful sensations
that spring from breathing an atmosphere highly
oxygenated, from feeling the consciousness of strong
and spirit-stirring existence, and from surveying the
summits of a hundred mountains from their own level,
and looking down upon a prostrate world. The
sublime
position causes man to feel himself an ethereal
being; and brings to his heart the high and animating
conviction, that, in ascending towards the sky, new
thoughts and aspirations, and the instinctive
movements
of his being admonish him, that he is advancing
towards his native home.
On the summit of the last mountain to be crossed,
far to the west was seen, at the same view, the sacred
mountain of the `little white men;' and to the east the
smokes of the Shoshonee habitations, rising up in lines
from their valley; just as they showed on the day of
Jessy's abduction. She folded her hands in
speechless
silence, pointing towards the smokes; and nature
claimed her full tribute of tears. While she wistfully
gazed, and wished that, `by one strong bound,' they
could spring into the valley; and while they fed their
horses, and took refreshments round the blazing
hunters' fire, Frederic requested some account of
the Indian tradition of the `little white men of the
mountains,' as beings, of whom he had often heard,
but never had received any clear and distinct tracing
of their history. Tutsaugee, or `the Changing Wind,'
was of the company, and withal a little mellow with
the brandy furnished by Julius. Being endowed by
nature with the Scotch gift, and his spirit at this time
moving nimbly and eloquently within him, he arose
from gnawing his venison bone, disengaged his
blanket
from his brawny right arm, according to custom,
and with the usual preludes and flourishes of oratory,
began as follows.
`Thou demandest, noble pale face, something of the
red man's medicine faith, touching these beings, of
whom thou hast so often heard, who make their abode
on yonder mountain tops, and choose their altar in the
Manitouna. I can see, by certain movements of thy
face, that thou thinkest cheaply of these powerful
little beings. Pale facethy people are not so polite,
as ours. We hear Elder Wood declare his medicine
talk; and whatsoever passes within, we preserve grave
countenances, and say nothing. But we well know,
that you are an unbelieving race in all points, but the
worth of beaver; and you have no politeness to
conceal
your want of faith. Hearken, pale face, and
thou shalt know the history of the `little white men of
the mountains.' Ten thousand moons have now
elapsed, since the time, when every hollow tree
contained
honey; and numberless fountains of these
ancient
hills of the Master of Life flowed, some with
rich and creamy milk; and others with the comforting
`medicine drink,' which I now feel warm at my
stomach
.
The deer and elk were in those days for
number
,
as the black snow fleas which you see there. The
buffaloes were for size, as little hills. There were
beasts of prey with tusks sharp, as the fangs of a
copperhead
,
and long as the horns of the elk. Then were
good times; for there were none but red men on the
earth. Listen, pale face. The words, that I now
speak, are words of sorrow, and my stomach is already
cold.'
At the same time he gave a knowing wink to an
Indian, who carried a canteen of brandy. `Give him
of the drink of joy,' said Areskoui, `to cheer him. For
he hath to relate a tale of sadness.' Tutsaugee held
his mouth to the canteen, until the tears started in his
eyes.
`In truth, pale face,' he continued, smacking his
lips, `thy medicine drink is good drink; and my heart
now reminds me again of these good old medicine
times, when there were none but red men, and the
streams ran milk and strong water. The earth was
then alive with red men, who fished beside waters so
full of choice fishes, that they leapt on shore, in
numbers
to yield an ample supply for the wants of the
people. The game was so abundant in the woods,
and the fowls of the sea and the forests were in
such numbers, and so tame, that the people needed
not, as now, practise the unerring closeness of the
winged arrow, or the mimic thunder and invisible
lead for their game. The south wind always blew;
and spring, arrayed in unfading green, and decked in
ever bright flowers, dwelt on the earth. The moon
never waxed, or waned; but always filled her horns.
The women were fairer than the daughters of the
sun; their faces were rounder, than the full moon;
and on yonder hill was a bank of vermilion, from
which they still reddened their fair cheeks, without
expense. Little looking glasses, with red frames were
as common as the flakes of talc on yon hill side. The
men, too, were strong, tall, and bold, and never told
the thing, that is not, and were alike without want or
fear. The stout warriors and the fair daughters of the
red men met, and courted, and loved, and were
married
,
without coquetery or appetite for money. The
deer and elk and buffaloes grew with tanned skins,
and the stout children were clad in them without
money
or trouble. When the beasts shed these
precious
wrought skins, they were instantly clothed with
others, fresher and more beautifully spotted, than that
of the fawn but two months old. Men's hands were
not then red with each other's blood. Under every
green tree was a table; and stout red warriors, and
beautiful vermilion cheeked girls sat down in love, and
feasted high. Neither the one or the other ever grew
old. Their teeth were always sound and white; and
their breath more fragrant than the flowering acacia,
and their club of black hair always nobly large, and
never whitened with snow. Ah! fathers, life was
then a thing worth possessing. Ah! that Tutsaugee
had lived then, or were to live in the happier days to
come. In those good days were built those mounds,
which now rise on the plains of the Missouri. Those
desolate sepulchres of the desert cause all the
wandering
red men, whose hearts are not scorched, to shed
tears, as they behold them rise in their path in the
unpeopled
and trackless prairie; and remember, that
they are full of the bones of a gone by world of red
men. Ah! my fathers, our medicine men declare,
that they often see their dusky forms descend on the
slant beams of the setting sun, accompanied by their
women and children. As soon as the moon pours her
silver beams upon the mountains and valleys, they
wander around these mounds, and the places where
they loved and were happy in the spring time of their
days. The ears of the medicine men hear the deep
songs of grief, which they pour over these graves of
their whole race.
`In those days, the mighty buffalo would not
trample
on an infant in his way. The tongue of the
copper
head, as it vibrated from the fiery jaws, was
salutary
to heal wounds, as it voluntarily licked them; and
the long tusked mountain bear employed his terrible
teeth only, in currying the necks of the buffalo cows
in love, as they held out their necks for that bland
office. Pale facemy throat waxes dry, as I come to
sing of grief.'
The canteen was once more handed to Tutsaugee,
to moisten and assuage his sorrow. Tears started to
his eyes, as he took down the canteen from his lips;
the genuine, poetical tears of the joy of grief. He
smacked again, and proceeded.
`Listen, fathers. Those times were too good to
last. Good things waste quick; while bad ones are,
like old age and the winter ices. The red men of
those times were too full, too fat and happy, and their
spirits within them became like those of young
warriors
,
who have swallowed too much of the white
man's drink of joy. Two old medicine men, in those
days, saw at the side of a sacred fountain, where they
had been quaffing the drink of joy themselves, little
white men floating by them in the air. At first they
only observed faces dimly seen. See! see! said they
to each other. The faces were little, smooth, and of
snow whiteness; and they just showed above a bank
of yellow mist. Soon after, as they looked again, the
hair rose on their headslong arms were seen behind
the misty curtain, hanging down from half formed
shoulders, and the taper fingers were as yet no more
than the feathery wreathings of vapour, that spring
up from the bosom of the lake, at the rising sun. The
VOL. I. 25
wonderful tale spread; and the young men laughed
aloud, and said, that their medicine fathers had drunk
too deeply of the strong waters. But some young
and brave warriors, soon after, saw the same little
white men, full formed and distinct. Their shoulders
were decked with the wings of butterflies, and their
bodies with robes of thistle down. Their faces, long
arms, taper fingers and tiny feet seemed as if
moulded
of snow, and their eyes, shining, and mischievous,
and deep in their heads, glistened like glow-worms.
Tiny and feeble as they seemed, in their sports they
overturned rocks, tore up trees, and danced, and
caused whirl-winds to rise about them. When they
ceased dancing, they darted away to the summer
clouds, and flashes of lightning and peals of thunder
followed their track along the clouds. The warriors
were stricken with fear, and dared not walk abroad
alone. But, Wakona, the red women of those days
were not like thy mother. There was no end either
to their curiosity, their frolic spirit, or their
pernicious
courage. They laughed at the fears of the
warriors; and wished only, that these little white
beings
of power might reveal themselves to them.
Their husbands trembled, and besought them, not to
expose themselves in that mad way. But nothing
would satisfy them, short of wandering abroad on the
sides of the mountains, by the light of the moon,
straining their eyes, and sometimes crying out,
sacrilegiously
,
`come, little white men, come, and see the
fair red faced maidens.' These powerful little
spirits
of mist were never far off, when they were
invoked
for purposes of mischief. The red girls came
home with satisfied countenances, looking strangely
glad, but saying nothing. We saw, that more had
happened, than they chose to tell. But the wives and
daughters grew thenceforward still more mischievous;
and seemed to have poison and fire in their veins,
instead of blood. The hazle rod, applied in
discipline
to their backs, after the good ancient fashion of
the red men, wrought no reforming effect. Soon
afterwards, children were born to them with pale
faces, of a complexion intermediate between the red
mothers and the little white men. The eyes of the
accursed little babe imps shone like live coals, and
they knew all sorts of medicine tricks almost from
their birth.'
`Oh! hand the canteen. Grief and thirst make
my throat, like the roasted kettle.' After an
energetic
draught, the orator resumed.
`From that time, every thing on the earth began to
turn upside down. The mountain bears fought with
the mammoth, and the buffaloes and elks with the
deer. Wolves came forth in troops. The dams of
the great waters burst. A roar of terrible sounds
was heard, as though the Master of Life had put forth
all the sleeping thunders in his magazine in the sky.
The waters came rolling on from the rising sun, in
one mighty wave, which had a front higher than the
tops of the trees. The sun came north about,
looking
from a throne of bloody mist, surrounded by a
thousand rainbows, whose ground color was as of
blood. The old council men, the young warriors,
the fair red girls, the old mothers, the mammoths, and
all the big beasts, wild and tame, the birds in the air,
falling with spent and exhausted wingallall were
whelmed in the wave. The great beasts sunk, where
their bones are now dug up by the pale faces, and
sold for a show. Masses of floating earth settled over
the funeral piles, that reverently covered the
innumerable
bodies of the red men, and formed the
sepulchres
of the desert. The few wise and good
medicine
men took their wives and children, and fled to
these mountains, as they heard and understood the
sounds of the coming waters. On the top of yonder
Manitou hill, that puts forth those rugged peaks,
black with rocks and glittering with ices, that never
melt, they rested, and saw the ruins of a drowned
world below. Then they drank tears instead of
water
,
and fed on dark thoughts, without a drop of
warming
medicine drink to cheer their spirits.'
Here Tutsaugee wistfully eyed the canteen; but
Areskoui motioned him that he had had enough, and
that it was time to come to a finish.
`The face of the sky was terrible to behold. The
sun continued to come north about, walking through
piles of bloody mist. Black clouds hung motionless
in the sky. The little white men were often seen
capering in masses from cloud to cloud; and their
little
deep eyes were bright as the fleaky lightning.
A malicious joy shone in their faces, as they looked
down upon the drowned world, and the wave of a
lake without a shore. Their faces were whiter than
the petals of the Pannocco, or the mountain snow.
Their huge heads were out of proportion with their
bodies; and their arms hung down below their knees,
as they strode along the clouds. Soon afterwards,
they were seen descending from their clouds to the
summit of yonder Manitou mountain, where the
remnant
of the people of the submerged world was
congregated
.
Fathers, I blush for our ancient mothers.
Though often warned, sometimes with good words,
sometimes with a sharp and harsh talk, often with
tears, and sometimes with the hazle rod of good
counsel
,
nothing would answer them, nothing cure them
of their propensity to be walking on the mountain top
by moon light. They had no fear of these little
mischievous
men of power; not they. They saw the fair
red women, and they sailed down from their clouds;
and a sound of joy arose, like that of the medicine
corn dance. The husbands and fathers fled in terror;
and left their wives and daughters fearless and alone.
Fathers, the sun ceased to roam north about. White
and natural and peaceful clouds sailed once more
over the mild blue. The waters fell by degrees. The
trees budded. The earth sent up an odor of waters
that had sunk away, and of fresh starting grass, of
half formed leaves, of the fragrant acacia, catalpas,
magnolias, the wild apple, and a thousand mingled
smells of starting flowers. The steaming cloud of
aroma went up, a grateful fragrance to the Master
of Life. The red men bowed towards the Master of
Life, and went down in joy from the mountain top, to
walk once more upon the green, level earth. But,
behold, the babes, that were born to the mothers,
were no longer true sons of the red men. They
showed, that their mothers had looked too intently
upon the little white men of the mountains. They
were cunning and mischievous from their birth; and
ran away from their mothers to deeds of mischief, as
the young duckling to the water, or the partridge with
the egg-shell still on its head. The red fathers cared
little for these gratuitous offerings of the little white
men, and would have put them all to death. The
fathers of these babes were warned of this purpose,
and took them up into their clouds; and sailed with
them over the great salt lake towards the rising sun.
There this mixed race had sons and daughters. The
red men were appeased, and once more dwelt with
their wives, and spread over all these forests and
prairies
towards the rising sun. There was, it is true,
but one to a thousand, that had lived, before the
world was deluged. They were a musing and sad
race, the fathers of the present races of red men,
and they lived by fishing and the chase. A few
hundred
moons, only, have passed, since the mixed race
over the great salt lake, taught by their cursed little
white fathers, came swimming, in white winged
canoes
,
over the great salt lake. They tricked the red
25*
men out of their lands and beaver; and made
medicine
covenants, and broke them, and cried still
landland!sell us land! red men. They taught us
in return to use the thunder of the Master of Life,
and the black seeds of fire. They taught us
treachery
and cheating. They sold us the poison medicine,
mischievous, but good.'
Tutsaugee looked wistfully at the canteen, and
hemmedbut his significant looks were disregarded.
`The pale faces have been steadily driving us before
them towards the point, where the sun sinks in the
salt lake of the west. The Wahcondah had
compassion
on his red children, and was angry with the
mischievous
little dwellers in the clouds. He raised a
mighty wind, and blew millions of them into the great
salt lake, as the flies fall in the summer pool. Other
millions he pegged fast to the rocks with sharp thorns,
where they have ever since been fluttering, and
struggling
to escape. Most of them were killed, or thus
fastened. But too many still remain. Their last
habitation was on yonder mountain. They often go
down to dance in the Manitouna, and Maniteewah
could tell you much more, than you have yet heard
about them, if she would. Our women are still
perniciously
disposed to run after them, and fear them not.
They are oftentimes seen in the summer, before night
thunder showers, chasing fire flies; and sometimes,
by the clear sun light, walking, like little snow wreaths,
up the sides of the mountain; busy, full of frolic
motion
,
and their little burning eyes as deep in the head,
and the expression as mischievous as ever.
Sometimes
they chase butterflies about the spring
fountains
;
and sometimes they are seen seated, and shining
on the summit of a rock inaccessible to mortal foot.
Their heads are still monstrous, and disproportioned
to their tiny bodies. Their arms still hang down
below
their knees; and their faces are still white, as the
petals of the pannocco. When they appear, the wild
turkies gobble; the wolves howl; the dogs whine, and
retreat into their cabins; and the game all hides in
the deep woods. We often see circles on the sides
of the mountains, where they have run round the
trees, and where the green grass became red, withered,
and sear under their foot prints. The corn, that they
fly over, withers; and the hair of the red men rises
on their flesh, as they behold. But to this time, our
daughters fear them not. We much fear, that in a
few hundred moons, all our children will resemble the
pale face. Tutsaugee has said.'
Frederic clapped, and thundered applause of bravo!
bravissimo! `Tutsaugee has spoken, like a medicine
man,' said Areskoui. `If I have spoken well,' said
Tutsaugee, `give me more of the medicine drink, to
allay thirst and grief. I shall not be comforted from
my sorrowful remembrances, till I see yonder peaks
spinning round.'
Elder Wood heard the sly orator at first with a
sneering countenance. But, as he proceeded, the
attention
of the minister, became first fixed, and then
profound. When the Indian had done, and was
receiving
his fee from the canteen, Elder Wood arose,
clapped his hands, and cried, `I have found! I have
found! I call on you, Frederic, and you, Jessy, to
observe
,
and bear witness, that here, in the wild and
visionary
traditions of this poor, fuddling heathen, (this
he spoke in his own speech) you have a clear and
wonderfully distinct shadowing forth of the fall of
man, and the history of the deluge. Wonderful
coincidence
!
Wonderful coincidence! This will tell in
a book to a charm;' and he smoked his pipe with a
nervous velocity, in self complacent cogitations upon
his erudite invention.
Their dinner was over, their horses refreshed, and
they set forth anew to descend the mountains, with
the streaming smoke of William Weldon's dwelling
full in view, as the pole star of his returning daughter.
But the night overtook them, still on the slope of the
table summit of the mountains. They kindled their
evening fires, under the shelter of a rock, made their
cheerful supper, sang their evening hymn, and listened
to the prayers and thanksgivings of Elder Wood.
Jessy, inveloped in buffalo robes, laid down on a
couch of leaves, and fatigue procured her a dreamless
sleep.
They took their breakfast, before the dawn, and
resumed their journey. Their first advances were
painful, from the sharp influences of the frost. But,
when at last the sun began to show his red and warm
forehead above the summit cliffs of the opposite
mountain
,
as the chaos of the deep and misty valley, and the
dark glens, of the thousand caves, crags and
declivities
of the mountains were defined into distinct
visibility
,
from the pervading brightness, what a
spectacle
!
It was the first time Jessy had ever seen such
a sunrise. The mists curled in a thousand graceful
forms. The beasts and birds poured forth their
varied
demonstrations, that they admired the fresh and
radiant scene, and felt the joy of renovated being in
common with man. With what fervor the heart of
Jessy rose to the Eternal Author of this sublime scene,
as she reached forth her arms towards the natal spot,
now more distinctly in view, and even the pines
becoming
visible. The morning smoke arose. It bore
testimony, that the dear inmates still lived, and had
awakened with the rest of creation. `Thou art my
God,' she said, `as Thou art my father's God; and
Thou shalt be my guide even unto death.'
The sun mounted high and bright in the heavens;
and the snows were melting, as they descended
towards
the valley. They paused, from time to time,
to listen to the grand sounds of the new formed streams
from the snows and ices, as they roared deep in the glens,
or leapt down the sides of the mountains. The splendid
red bird, warmed into melody by the influence of this
transitory spring, came forth from its tangled covert
of brambles, and chaunted its long drawn and mellow
song.
At length their feet pressed the level of the vale.
The precincts of the town opened to view. Groups
of Indians received them on the banks of the
Sewasserna
,
with reiterated embraces and acclamations.
The rejoicing song was caught, and perpetuated from
mouth to mouth, and preceded them to the dwelling
of William Weldon. Even Hatch, who could have
given, had he chosen it, ample intelligence of the
origin
of this expedition, and by a word could have
prevented
all that had happened, was among the rest
offering
his congratulations. He was one of those
thrifty personages, who have always a hearty welcome
for the prosperous, be they whom they may. A
moment
afterwards, and she was in the arms of her
parents
,
and the burst of nature and unutterable joy had
its course. The Indians, meanwhile, were singing
and dancing; and the cry was heard from assembled
thousands, `Wakona hath come! The young chief
hath come!' Nor were there wanting not loud, but
deep imprecations of vengeance upon the refractory
and treacherous Shienne, of whom a few were
present
,
to witness this joyful scene. The daughter
received
alternately the embrace of father and mother.
`Oh Tien, Universal Jehovah, God of Israel, God of
my fathers, I thank thee from my full heart,' cried the
mother. `Now, Lord, lettest Thou thy servant
depart
in peace,' cried the father. `It is enough; my
hands feel; and my eyes see; and thou hast returned
safe and in honor.' Long and repeated were these
embraces of parental and filial affection. Again and
again was the dear daughter strained anew to the
breast, and it was long before the almost suffocating
spasm passed away. Hundreds of Shoshonee looked
on with a glad participation in this scene, which showed
that the human heart every where has the same
sympathy
with real and deep feeling. Nor was it the
least impressive part of the daughter's return, that the
wretch who had given occasion for all this grief and
joy, shortly after arrived, bound strongly with cords,
a fiendish witness of the horror and detestation
inspired
by her abduction, as measured by the joy of
her return. There he lay, a detested and despised
thing, occasionally pointed at by the Indians, whose
dialect he now sufficiently understood, to know, that
they were saying, `the vile pale face must burn.
We must offer him a sacrifice to the Wahcondah of
the red men.'
The returned daughter once more tenanted her
natal habitation. Father and mother, and Elder
Wood, and Frederic and Areskoui, and his parents,
sat round her, and the minister repeated the eventful
story of the rescue. Areskoui was clearly the hero
of it; and as Elder Wood painted, in his own
energetic
phrase, the noble intrepidity of the chief, when,
seeing Jessy in the vale of Manitouna, he determined
to throw himself down the icy precipices a thousand
feet, and excited the rest by his example, to dare the
same self devotion, William Weldon could not
restrain
a new burst of parental affection; but rose from
his seat, strained the noble young chief in his arms,
and declared that to him he owed the life and honor
of his daughter. `Son,' cried his parents, `thou art
worthy of us and Wakona.' Elder Wood resumed
his eulogy, and forgot not to descant on the power of
his invention, when arrived at length, almost within
comparative reach of their object, they saw
themselves
tantalized by inability to descend, or ascend;
and at their `wit's end,' in search of devices, to reach
a lower point with safety, except at an unavailing
destruction
of life. When the expedient of the nature
formed ladder of grape-vines occurred to the
invention
of the young chief, Ellswatta refrained not the
native ugh! of Indian gratulation. He arose erect
on his toes, flourished his arm, and exclaimed `who
will say that the red men have less medicine thoughts,
than the pale face?' As in the bulletin of a battle,
each one of the expedition came in for his due share
of praise, and received his meed of intrepidity and
self exposure. Jessy related her proportion of
suffering
,
and those points of incident, which she alone was
qualified to narrate. Her bland tresses floated, as
formerly, on her fair neck. Joy had restored to her
the wonted brilliance of her beauty; and the languor
of fatigue and suffering that still remained, only
softened
the glow and the suffusion of joy on her cheek.
`How passed you the time of my absence?' she
asked
,
at length, in her turn. `I will not believe, that it
was not the source of grief and suffering. Relate, dear
parents, to your returned daughter, how you
sustained
it.' They could give no more, than the general
tale of the actings of human nature in the endurance
of exquisite suffering. They took no food, and knew
no sleep. They had seated themselves in the mute
silence of despair, at one time raising their eyes to
heaven, and at another time to the place selected for
the family sepulchre; in this intolerable anguish,
longing
for the repose of the grave. The father
sometimes
read aloud the penitential psalms of David, or
the deep strains of the afflicted man of Uz. `Why
was this dear one given us, thus to be taken away?
Why died we not from the cradle? Why was life
given to them, that are in bitterness of spirit, and light
to them, that are in darkness?' Then they said, `the
Lord gave. He hath taken away. Blessed be his
name. The comfort, we had in her, is sufficient,
We will live all the days of our appointed time on the
treasured remembrance. Very pleasant hast thou
been to us, dear lost one. Thou wert more gentle
than the dove. Would God we had died for thee, our
daughter.' `Then we strove to restrain the sinful
expression of our grief. We said, `the way of the
Eternal is pathless in the great deep. He hath his
purpose in all this; and we ought to enquire,
wherefore
our souls are so disquieted? and yet to trust in
Him for the rescue and return of our daughter.'
Towards the close of the first day of her abduction,
they walked to her bower, and there found relief for
their suffocating spirits in tears. There were her
drawings. There were her footsteps. Every spot,
where she had walked, was consecrated. Every one, to
whom they knew her in any way attached, was bound
to them by a tie, stronger than death. Then their
fluctuating views and feelings suggested to them the
courage, affection, noble disinterestedness and
enterprize
of those, who joined for her rescue; and they
said, `God will strengthen and enlighten them; and
the teeth of the oppressor will be broken; and she
will return to us with songs of joy.' Then again they
framed dark, but natural imaginings of her struggles,
her cries, her sufferings in the hands of her brutal
oppressor
.
The object, the purpose, the views of the
wretch and his Indians, and the alternate destination
of the daughter, all these, when the darkness of night
again overshadowed them, and the autumnal wind
moaned in the pines, and the wolves howled from afar,
were left to the undefined and perpetually varying
grouping of the imagination. `But why talk of
sorrow
,'
they said, `which has all vanished in joy? Let
us bless God, and forget the day of his visitation for
all purposes, except to swell our present thankfulness
and our unlimited trust in Him for all the future.'
`See, said Elder Wood, `what a world is this, is
which our lot is cast! How nearly the sounds of
thanksgiving rise to the wailings of grief and agony!
Let us remember, that the joy, too, will again pass, and
be replaced by days of darkness. Oh! that this might
persuade you, and that I could convince you to build
on another foundation, than such a changing scene of
things. At the moment, while we are rejoicing over
the return of a lost daughter to her parents, how many
thousands are mourning over their dead, and
conveying
the remains of those, most dear to them, to their
long home!'
`Thou sayest right, Elder Wood,' said Jessy. `Thou
art right, while our hearts are still tender, and our
joy overflowing, to temper it with these views, as
painful, as they are true. Let us devote ourselves to
thy God. Let us feel, that we are pilgrims, and
indulge
our joys with a chastened and moderated spirit.
Let our chief thoughts be on eternal re-union in the
Father's house, in the everlasting mansions in which
there are neither tears, accident nor death.'
Upon the word Elder Wood took up the bible and
psalm book. He read various affecting passages,
appropriate
to the occasion. When the hymn was given
out, with the sweet voice of Jessy, and with that of
hundreds of sympathising Indians withoutand the
sounds borne along through the mouths of the red men,
though harsh and discordant, produced the solemn
impression that never fails to result from many human
voices joined. The party then all fell on their knees,
and accompanied with full hearts the loud and earnest
thanksgivings of Elder Wood.
When the prayers and praises were concluded,
`allow me,' said Jessy, `before we separate, to return
to each one of my deliverers thanks, since there is
nothing
,
but words to repay.' To each one of the Indians,
VOL. L. 26
who had been of the party, that came to her rescue,
she gave her hand, and made some appropriate and
grateful acknowledgement, after their own phrase
and figure. `To you, Areskoui,' she said, `my
brother
,
and the soul of honor, I owe more than life. I
will engrave on my memory thy descent from the
mountain to my relief. I can never forget all, that
preceded, and followed.' The young chief pressed
the offered hand to his lips, and Josepha, in her
energetic
Spanish dialect, claimed permission to embrace
her. `And you, Frederic, will not turn away from
the grateful thanks of the rescued object of your
generous daring.' He approached with glowing
cheek, and received her acknowledgements, paid
with an averted face and moistened eye, which, he
might have seen, were the offspring neither of
unkindness
nor indifference.
What a night was that to Julius, which followed
the return of Jessy! Had he not suffered from a guilty
conscience and a coward fear of death, no doubt, he
would that night have terminated his wretched life
with his own hands. He shrunk from a self-inflicted
death, to which his fellow captives urged him. His
deep acquaintance with human nature, in revolving
his chances, led him to see a vista of light and hope in
the future. Conscience and his fears whispered,
`wretch, they will burn thee on the morrow.' Then
revenge cried from the secret chambers of his
thoughts, and he was not without his secret hopes,
that he should yet turn the tables on his victors, and
still achieve his guilty purposes. Terrible
perverseness
and pertinacity of human guilt! Never had he
seen his escaped victim so lovely, and taking such a
place in his unhallowed thoughts, as when emotions,
more than mortal, gave a celestial radiance to her
eye, and expression to her countenance, on her return
to her parents. `Fool, that I was,' said he to himself.
`All my purposes might have been accomplished, had
I not allowed this simple girl to outwit me. It is her
time now. It will be mine next. They will not burn
me.' But still there was enough of terror in his
position
,
to cause, that no sleep visited his eyes, for that
night.
A morning followed, corresponding to the
expected
business of the daydark, misty, chill; one of the
gloomy days of the last of November. The
announced
trial was of a character to assemble the whole
population of both the tribes. The drums beat. The
medicine men took their places in the council house,
in silent and solemn gravity. The chiefs arranged
themselves with unwonted regard to ceremonial. A
number of stakes and piles of faggots, on the level
space between the council house and the river,
manifested
to the prisoners, that the work of preparation
had been going on through the night. The Shienne,
ranged round their chief, Nelesho, were painted black
and green, as indicating undecided purposes. The
Shoshonee more generally wore black, the color of
anger, war, and stern resolve. Ellswatta, too, it was
observed, was in black. After a brief consultation
together, among the chiefs, the common and
subordinate
Shienne, who had been concerned in the
abduction
,
were beaten with rods, and dismissed. Though
the infliction was severe, and unsparingly laid on, not
a groan, not a writhe of pain escaped them;
notwithstanding
their lacerated backs showed that there was
ample cause of pain. The same punishment was
awarded Baptiste. But although inflicted with a
much more tender hand, the Canadian danced and
yelled in no gentle measures, and in cries as various
and voluble as his customary speech. As he danced,
and cried, `
mon Dieu
,' and `
ayez pitie
,' the Indian
character
and temperament broke forth, in the most
unanimous
shouts of laughter. Even the girls, who had
given him the tenderest thoughts, not excepting even
his wife, laughed as heartily as the rest. This
inverted
sympathy could not have been in the slightest
degree
an emollient for his scathed back. Finding, too,
that the enjoyment of the joke of his cries, would tend
to prolong, and redouble the endurance, he made the
first great effort of his life, and shrugged not exactly
in the style of that, which graced his common
parlance
.
He ground his teeth at every stripe, cried
`sacre! dem! never mind! sacre crapeau! my turn by
and by.' He was complimented, as they released
him, that a few more whippings would discipline him
to become a real red man, and no woman.
The two chief Shienne in the concern of the
abduction
were next brought forward, and placed, strongly
pinioned, in the centre of the council house. The
council fire burned near them. The chiefs smoked
long, and silently, before a word was said. Ellswatta
then arose. His manner was calm, but stern. `My
red children,' he said, `hearken. He, who would
stain the totem of our nation, by attempting the
violation
of female honor, deserves to be burned. Our
name, for sacredness in this kind of honor, has spread
from the rising to the setting sun. Here is a pale
face, who came amongst us and received adoption
into
our tribe. He experienced from us ample
hospitality
and protection, as one of our own children.
The parents of Wakona admitted him with the
confidence
which allows no doubt, into their family. He
requited it by seducing base and wicked Shienne to
aid him, in stealing away from this family their only
child. I will not name the crime, which, we believe,
he meditated to commit. It is too base, for a red
man to permit on his tongue, or even to stain his
thoughts. He carried her to the medicine prison of
the little white men of the mountains. Your young
chief, and these pale faces pursued him, with these
our faithful Shoshonee, who are here before you.
They descended the medicine mountain, by the aid
of the Wahcondah. Wakona was brought back by
the bravery and good conduct of our red children and
our white brothers, in peace. What shall be done to
the base Shienne, and the recreant pale face? Pale
faces, she is of your race. Declare your thoughts.'
Every one knew, that Hatch had been privy to the
plot of abduction, though proof might be wanting, and
was a partizan of Nelesho. The brass in his
countenance
was exchanged for a blush, when asked his
opinion. A consciousness of the predicament, in
which he stood before them, was equally manifest in
every other countenance, as in his own. He had
imagined
,
this affair would have terminated in another
way. He stammered, as he gave his opinion. `The
person in trial,' he said, `was young, handsome, rich,
and had been rather favored, as he had heard, by
Jessy. He loved, and had eloped with her, intending
marriage. If it had taken place, she would,
probably
,
have been a loving and happy wife. At any rate,
no crime had been committed; and the most that
could be said of it, was, that it was the freak of a wild
young man, dictated by love. He rejoiced in the
return of Wakona. He was for acquitting the
prisoner
.'
Ellswatta gravely notched a mark on a long
white rod. `What sayest thou, young pale face, who
camest here, as his companion? Thou hast proved
thyself brave, honest and true in this business. We
wait thy sentence.' The pale face of the prisoner
was now raised, marked with a conflict of various and
terrible emotions. Frederic hastened to give his
voice. `I am a child in counsel,' he said, `compared
with these wise and aged fathers. I once called him
friend, and I cannot give my voice against him,
although
I think him worthy to die.' `In so saying,
replied Ellswatta, `according to our usages, thou hast
26*
declared thy opinion.' He marked a notch on a
corresponding
black rod. `And thou,' medicine man of
the pale face, he continued, turning to Elder Wood.
`Thou knowest the will of thy Master of Life; and
art wise, to discern the thing, that is true and right.
Thou canst make, what is in darkness, bright as the
morning; what sayest thou of yonder pale face?' The
countenance of the Kentucky minister betrayed
irresolution
.
He made a speech of some length. He
said, `that, by the laws of the whites, such crimes,
when committed, were punished by death; but, that
they made a distinction between the manifest
intention
,
and the overt act. The end of the young man,
no doubt, was too horrible to name. The means were
cruel and detestable, beyond all words to describe
them. He hoped, it would not be thought, in giving
his opinion, that he did not detest, and abhor the act,
as much, as any one. He hoped that none would be
found, to go beyond him, in sympathy for the
sufferings
of the parents, or indignation for the outrage
practised; to say nothing of what was intended. No
punishment, he thought, could be sufficiently severe;
or meet the horrible aggravation of the offence; or
make adequate atonement to the injured party. But
then, he could not forget, that death would cut him
off from repentance. He could not forget, that he
had parents beyond the seas; that it was the crime of
youth, and of the guilty appetite, miscalled love.
The beauty and innocence of the party, however,
they might have been temptations, he admitted, were
no extenuation of the guilt. He gave his opinion,
that he should be forthwith transported out of the
valley, and punished with death, if ever found visiting
it again. He deemed, that, when there was any
doubt in the case, it was right to incline to the side of
mercy.' His opinion was notched on the white rod.
`And, what sayest thou, father of Wakona,' asked
the chief. `I say,' replied William Weldon, `that
my heart is too full of joy and affection, to allow my
thoughts sufficient calmness and impartiality, to
decide
upon a case, which touches life.' His opinion
was notched on the white rod.
`We will now take the voice of our own people,'
said the chief. `What is thy decision, Nelesho?'
Every countenance was turned towards him, to see
how he would deport himself in this emergency. He
had labored for self command; and he had obtained
it. The prisoner arose from his recumbent position,
and looked wistfully upon him, as feeling, that life or
death hung on his word, and opinion. Nelesho arose,
threw his buffaloe robe from his shoulder, squared
himself, and showed a form, that seemed of more than
carthly power. He had taken counsel of disdain, and
as it seemed, contempt of life. `Thou askest
Nelesho
,
Shoshonee chief, how he would dispose of
yonder
pale face? They are both pale faces. They are
both beautiful. Do not the birds, and the deer, and
all the dwellers of the air and the streams and the
woods, wed under such circumstances? How
camest
thou, Ellswatta, by the mother of Areskoui?
Yonder
pale face is said to be a very great man among
his own people. The Master of Life marked in the
most signal manner, that Wakona ought to have been to
Nelesho. He offered her his love, and she rejected
it with disdain. Why should she render so many
wretched with her scorn? Did the Master of Life
give her the beautiful face and the medicine charm,
merely to create torment? The young pale face
loved her, did he? So does the other pale face, and
Areskoui, and I know not how many more. She has
received, I fear, charms of potency from the little
white men of the mountains; else she could not so
melt away the strong hearts of the red warriors, and
the young pale faces. Our fathers were wont to put
to death those women, who communed with the little
white men of the mountains. It would seem
strange counsel, if Nelesho were to propose, to burn
Wakona, who medicines all, that come in her way,
as though in communication with the mischievous
spirits, and let the pale face whom she has medicined,
escape. It is right, that the young and beautiful
should love the young and beautiful. My mind is,
therefore, that we release the prisoner, and compel
Wakona to receive him for a husband. Let us have
a marriage between them, and let us all rejoice
together
.
If they become weary of each other, as is
likely, Nelesho will still take her, as his squaw.' The
reckless and undaunted insolence of Nelesho was
received
with a distinct grunt of approbation from a few
of his Shienne; and with a loud, general and long
drawn groan of indignation from the Shoshonee, and
most of all, from Areskoui. He arose, pale with
wrath, and with a countenance of more uncontrolled
fierceness, than he was ever seen to have worn before.
Every eye was upon him. Ellswatta saw, that his son
would commit himself, and lose his reputation for
calmness and self control. `Areskoui,' he said, `a
more opportune time will come, for what thou wouldst
say. No one is answerable for the folly of his heart,
unless
it escape from his lips.' The young chief stood
rebuked, swallowed his words, cast a withering look
upon Nelesho, which was met by a corresponding
expression
of defiance and disdain, and sat down.
The sub-chiefs and warriors were now called upon
in turn, to give their declaration of opinion in the
case. Burn! Burn! was the general voice of the
Shoshonee. `Burn the pale face and the base
Shienne
,
who have stained our totem.' A few of the
Shienne, too, who wavered between allegiance to
Ellswatta, and subservience to Nelesho, gave their
voices in the same way. The greater portion of the
Shienne, without any of the insolence of their chief,
gave their suffrage for releasing all the prisoners. On
counting the notches on the sticks of mercy and
vengeance
,
it was found that the far greater number was
on the latter.
It was an impressive specimen of the actings of the
fierce democracy of nature, where the unwritten laws,
though founded only in opinion, operate with terrible,
prompt and certain efficacy. On this occasion, deep
feelings of mutual jealousy and hate had been
developed
between the Shienne and Shoshonee, and
between
rival and hating chiefs and partizans, in fierce
and defying speeches, and in that menacing and proud
independence, which constitutes such a prominent
feature in Indian deliberations. The partizans of a
particular speaker cheered him, as he proceeded, by
the deep grunt of Indian approbation; and the low
murmur was like the gently mustering winds, that
precede a tempest. The tumultuous adoption and
renunciation of opinion was like the swelling and
sinking
of the tempest, when acting in its fury.
After all the opinions had been declared, and
collected
,
the counsel chiefs again smoked awhile, and
were silent, looking on the ground. They then raised
their calumets, and flourished them first to the rising,
and then to the setting sunthen to the south, and
the north. Ellswatta threw his buffalo robe from his
right shoulder, and gave the decision of the council
with equal calmness and firmness. `My red children,
warriors of the Shoshonee and Shienne, listen. The
Master of Life hath taught us, to mingle calmness
with determination, and justice with mercy. The
red people, from the salt lake at the rising to that at
the setting sun, have received it from their
forefathers
and the Master of Life, that the honor of
women
is a bright line in their totema medicinea
thing of inviolate sanctity. The pale faces babble all
sorts of slanders and falsehoods against us. But even
they allow us this honor. It is our right. Sooner
than stain it, we will all sacrifice our lives. I say
nothing
of the outrage of carrying off Wakona, and of
the groans of her parents, while she was gone. I will
not expound what, we all believe, was intended; for
to speak it would wither the honor and scorch the
tongue of a red man. He hath, moreover, seduced
the allegiance of the Shienne, and sown the seeds of
insubordination and rebellion. I say nothing of the
show and effect of this, which you have all heard in
the speech of the insolent Shienne chief. He caused,
also, that the lives of all the party of rescue were put
at hazard, in their throwing themselves down the
medicine mountain, when, it would seem, that no
power, but the Master of Life, could have saved them.
For these crimes the red men determine, that yonder
pale face shall burn, or fall on his knees before
Wakona
,
in view of all the nation, and demand her
forgiveness
;
which, if he receive not, he still burns.
But if he receive it, he suffers wis-ton-gah, or running
the gauntlet; and is then to be carried out of the tribe,
cursed, and forbidden ever to enter it again, on pain
of death.
`Touching our two recreant red children we also
pass, that they draw lots, who of the two, shall burn,
or undergo the same humiliation of asking forgiveness
of Wakona on bended knees, and then endure the
wis-ton-gah, and be banished from the town of the
Shienne
,
to dwell at the remote point of the north pass of
the mountains. It is said. Let it be done.'
A general grunt of approbation ran through the vast
assembly. Nelesho and his few factious partizans
cast a knowing eye over the crowd, and saw, that in
this case, there were none to sustain them in
opposition
,
and that purposes of treason and revolt were as
yet premature. Judgment and justice and wisdom
and mercy were so blended in the award, that there
seemed a general feeling of pride and respect, in
regard
to the aged and wise chief, as though a second
Daniel had come to judgment.
Immediately four young warriors, executioners of
the nation, with pistols and hatchets in their girdles,
arose, and advanced towards the prisoners. The two
Shienne were blindfolded. Prepared lots were
placed
before them, and drawn. The fortunate drawer
was immediately liberated; and, disgraced, and
shunned
by every eye, he moodily withdrew from the
assembly
.
A message was despatched to Jessy; and
she came in her beauty, in a case as trying to one of
her character, as could be imagined. Life hung
upon
her act, and she could not hesitate. But the whole
transaction, and every thing that preceded it, was of
a character to harrow her feelings. She was pale
but every one could have seen, that mercy had the
ascendency on her countenance. A general murmur
of delight ran over the crowd, as the lovely girl,
alternately
pale, and rosy red, sat down between her
parents.
The four warriors seized Julius. All conceivable
human passions were marked on his fair face. `Lead
me to Wakona,' he said; but in a voice almost
inarticulate
.
They led him to her. Pride struggled for
a moment in his bosom, and its influence was as of
spasm. Love of life prevailed. He fell on his
knees, amidst a low murmuring hiss, which rose
spontaneously
from the whole multitude. `Pardon, Jessy,
and let me live. Thou wast lovely; and I fell.
Pardon
.
I depart in guilt and shame to expiate my
crimes in repentance, and in remembrance of thee
and of this humiliation, which will gnaw upon my
bosom
,
like the never dying worm.' Such were his
words, while on his knees before her. To see a youth,
so fair and noble in appearance, in such extreme
humiliation
,
must have softened a heart, far harder than
hers. `Julius,' she replied, in words distinctly
audible
,
go; repent, and may God forgive thee, as I do.
Let me never see thee more.'
The act was followed by a general groan, the last
expression of Indian contempt. Nelesho threw off
his robe, as if from excessive warmth, put his fingers
to his mouth, giving the true Indian yell, ugh! ugh!
it arose even from many a woman present; while the
Shienne cried, `thy countenance is fair, pale face, but
thy soul is that of an old woman. Release the
despised
pale face for the Wistongah,' was the general
cry. In a moment there was formed, all the way
from the council house to the river, a compact mass
of warriors and women intermixed, each armed with
a beechen switch, of which hundreds had been
prepared
for the alternative. Children and aged, male
and female, all pressed to the ranks, to have a share
in this high frolic; and the very struggle to get
forward
and administer the switch, was the cause that
he suffered little in the application. They let him
loose, amidst shouts of laughter, and so many switches
were brandished at him, that one fell upon the other.
The ranks were disordered, in eagerness each to whip
him. He stumbled and fell; and the interval was
filled with those who were pressed down in eagerness
to get at him. The fallen all caught the switches
together
,
and the shout of merriment rent the sky.
He was soon raised, the path cleared, and he ran on,
staggering on this side and on that, getting quite as
many stripes from the women as the men. The
discipline
,
on the whole, was rather severe, and when he
arrived at the river, he was was thoroughly scored from
head to foot, and was carried away, to receive at the
house of Hatch such unction and consoling words, as
might prepare him to be transported out of the nation,
which was to take place on the following morning.
Meanwhile Hatch was answerable, with his life, to
have him forthcoming for transportation in the
morning.
The drums beat, and the chiefs assembled in the
council house, surrounded by the nation, as before, to
witness the termination of the council in the
alternative
of the remaining Shienne prisoner. Once more
Jessy was seated to receive his humiliation, if he chose
to make it. It was so signified to him. He
indignantly
spurned the offer. `What! a Shienne
warrior
get on his knees to a woman! No. No. You
can burn a Shienne, but you cannot quail his spirit.'
The terrible sentence was uttered, that he must burn,
and so implicit was the deep deference to modes
sanctioned
by immemorial usage, that not a groan, not a
sign of disapprobation arose from all that mingled
crowd, in which the unhappy prisoner had parents, a
wife, and children, and a whole train of intimates and
friends. The chief arose, and waved his hand
towards
the West. `The sun has gone,' he said, to
bathe his forehead in the great salt lake. Let the
Master of Life look upon our doings. Let him see
us cleanse the stained totem of our nation, when he
looks upon his red children in the brightness of the
morning. The council was dissolved, and the
prisoner
placed under a guard for the terrible ceremony of
the morning. But during the night the guard was
beset, and the prisoner liberated; and the
information
in the morning was, that he had fled to the
Black-feet
,
who had long opened an asylum for fugitives from
the Shoshonee.
During this winter every second warrior of the two
tribes was detached on different trapping
expeditions
;
and the annals of the nation resumed their
customary
aspect. The influence of Elder Wood, as a
missionary, had become a very considerable element
of influence in the nation. The heart of the good
VOL. I. 27
man began to exult in the hope, that he should yet
gather much fruit from among these interesting
heathens
for the Redeemer, and be known in the annals of
the church, as the Apostle of the Shoshonee. Two
Indian girls received baptism, and were added to his
little church. Various other demonstrations of his
growing success filled his heart with joy. Winter
howled through the leafless forest, and swept along
the most sunny vallies; holding undivided empire upon
the icy summits of the mountains. When the
mountain
breeze descended to the valley, it was as if the
concentered essence of frost had descended with it.
Even the hardy and much enduring warriors came in
from their traps. But the warm abodes under the
over arching wall were plentifully stored with venison,
prairie potatoes, and dried salmon; and Indian
festivity
,
holiday and song sojourned in those nature wrought
abodes of comfort.
Jessy, warned by the dreadful disaster that had
recently
befallen her, went little abroad; and never,
except when accompanied by numbers, who were able
to protect her. The guilty Julius had, indeed, been
deported, and left with a periogue and a curse at the
Great Falls of the Oregon, to make his way to
Astoria
alone, as he might. But a thousand
circumstances
,
which could be summed up only by intimate
acquaintance
with the manners of the people, indicated,
that though the master spirit was gone, the influence
of his money and his counsels remained. There was
too much reason to fear, that through Baptiste, Hatch
and Nelesho, he still held the threads of disaffection
and revolt in his hands at Astoria, where, it was
understood
he arrived safely, after his deportation from
the valley. Ellswatta well understood all this. But
the usages of that patriarchal government gave no
countenance to punishment, except upon the clearest
and most palpable conviction; and the grand maxim
of the chief was, in the peculiar position of the two
tribes, to forbear towards the Shienne, as long as
forbearance
was possible.
A strange sympathy had grown up, in place of the
former estrangement, that existed for awhile between
Frederic and Areskoui. The former became a constant
inmate in the dwelling of the latter. In walking, in
hunting, in their visits at William Weldon's, they were
inseparable companions. It was understood, that the
young chief had resumed the relinquished studies of
his early youth, and under the instruction of Frederic,
was making patient and rapid advances in learning;
and that he was indefatigable in his efforts to
understand
,
and copy the observances, common courtesies,
and modes of the white people. The fruit of these
instructions was marked by every one. Sometimes
it created painful respect, and sometimes it inspired
smiles in Jessy, to remark the stately and somewhat
stiff ceremonial of the young chief, in that
intermediate
stage, where his manners had lost the listless
independent
ease of his native deportment, without
acquiring
the graceful finish of civilized manners.
The compact between the two inmates was similar
in character, though based more deeply in truth and
honor, than that, which had originally existed
between
Frederic and Julius, when they first came to
the valley. Their covenant ran, that they would be
friends, faithful and totem friends, in the language of
Areskoui; that no jealousy, distrust or concealment
should belong to their intercourse; that the chief
should deport himself invariably to his friend, as his
father had to William Weldon; that they would
spend their days together; and that if Wakona,
unsolicited
,
should show favor to either, the other should
relinquish any thought of attempting hindrance. `But,'
said Areskoui, `it were better, that we continue to
live, as we now live; sustaining to her the relation of
brothers to a dear sister; and then neither of us shall
wring the heart of the other by the cruel triumph of
possession.' In a moment of privacy, which occurred
soon afterwards, Areskoui, in very guarded, but
sufficiently
intelligible language, announced the terms of
this treaty to Jessy. `Wakona,' he said, `I hope, that
thou wilt henceforward gladden my heart by that
same smiling and unconstrained confidence, which
thou wert wont to bestow upon me in the thrice
happy
,
and never to be forgotten days of our infancy.
Wakona, thy smiles clear the sky, and bring good
fortune
.
Flower of the valleys, thou seest, that I love
the pale face, who dwelleth with me, and who giveth,
and receiveth all my confidence. I implore thee,
therefore, never again to look upon me with the
averted
eye of distrust, or fear, that I shall vex thee more
with talk of my love.'
A thousand reasons rendered such an intercourse
the first wish of her heart, and peace of mind was again
restored to her. The intercourse was cheerful,
unrestrained
and delightful; more than compensating for
the want of the unconscious communion of their young
days, by possessing more of character and heart, and
the guarded feelings of higher interest from the
relations
of sex, age, and more self respect, and matured
thoughts. When the storm poured without, and all
nature
was invested with its covering of snow, and
imprisoned
in chains of ice, the nation, sheltered in their
warm cabins under the great arch of nature, told their
tales, and prosecuted their loves, and laid down their
schemes for the occupations of the spring; or shivered
with horror at superstitious legends of the
Maniteewah
,
and of the little white men of the mountains.
Elder Wood, the while, sat in one corner of William
Weldon's spacious parlor, with his table, lamp and
religious
books before him. Ellswatta and Josepha,
half reclined on their buffaloe robes, in earnest
converse
with William Weldon and Yensi. Frederic
touched his flute with the inspiration of love. The
fingers of Jessy wandered over her harp. The
evening
tea and coffee smoked, and diffused their fragrance.
A cheerful fire blazed; and lamps at the remote point
of the apartment threw an impressive brilliance upon
the dark red cave of the glorious and lofty arch of
living
stone above.
`There is gladness,' said Areskoui, as on such an
evening, a northern storm poured columns of snow and
sleet down the valley, `there is gladness in this scene
of comfort and peace.' `It contrasts delightfully,'
said Frederic, `with the howling of the storm, and the
keenness of the frost; and the consciousness, how soon
the poor, unsheltered traveller without, would perish
under the wrath of winter. How sweet are the
security
,
abundance and comfort within. How doubly
dear the faces of those, to whom we are united by
domestic and friendly ties. We look round, and
here is our paradise, our home, our world.'
`My daughter,' said William, aroused by the
enthusiasm
of Frederic, `sing to us the touching air,
you gave us the other evening.' Without
waiting
for the painful repetition of entreaty, she sang, to
a tender and plaintive air,
`It was a winter's evening, and fast came down the snow.'
The sweet notes and the touching words drew tears
from the small audience, and aroused the attention of
even Elder Wood from his holier meditations. `Jessy,
my daughter,' said the good man, `in society they
would tell you, you sing like an angel. I say to you
in truth, that the beautiful ballad on your lips has
drawn tears even from these eyes, which are not used
to weeping. Jessy, you have made me think painfully
of Kentucky.'
Sometimes the conversation was playful, and
intermingled
with stories by Ellswatta, of conflicts with
27*
the Blackfeet, the Spanish, grizzly bears and
panthers
,
and gambols in the brine of the western sea, as
he pursued sea lions and seals to their retreats
beneath
the billows. He recounted, and it made no
mean romance, the story, how he won Josepha with
his sword and his bow. The Spanish woman
laughed
heartily at his version, and occasionally commented,
and showed fine eyes and teeth, and informed him,
that Yensi would, perhaps, hear from her an entirely
different account of the whole matter. Sometimes
it turned on higher and holier themes, friendship, the
comfort and security and peace of the lowly tenants
of the vale. Sometimes it dwelt on comparisons of
their position and enjoyments, with those of the
dwellers
in the great world; and sometimes Elder Wood
gave the key note to the theme of religion, and then
it turned upon the enduring character of religious
satisfaction, the power of that faith, that triumphs over
death, and the eternal hopes of the life to come.
Each member of this small social circle was
inexpressibly
dear to the other. The conversation, thus
colored
by friendship, thus concentered by affection, thus
diversified by guests from such remote quarters, and
minds of such opposite training, and naturally
partaking
much of Indian simplicity, and picture
painting
power, called their thoughts into full and
delightful
exercise; and their remembrances and affections
from their deepest cells.
During the day, if the weather was not inclement,
the two friends hunted, by tracing the foot prints of
their game in the snow, or angled in the ponds under
the ice; or found the covert of the wild turkeys and
bustards, or the open places in the Sewasserna, where
the geese and swans remained through the winter;
and loaded with game, they entered with the
departure
of light the abode of William Weldon, to feast,
and spend the long winter evenings in the renewal of
the delightful talks and amusements and music of the
preceding evening. Jessy, too, had for the ear of her
mother and Elder Wood, relations still more
interesting
,
than the hunting chronicle of the preceding day,
as detailed by the two friends. There are sickness
and sorrow every where; and she had been, through
the day, a ministering angel beside the sick and the
sorrowful and the destitute in the humble Indian
abodes of the nation. Her mother, without professing
the religion of Elder Wood, felt these obligations, and
encouraged these exertions on the part of her
daughter
.
Their stock of medicines and comforts for the
sick and destitute was comparatively great; for the
Indians are naturally thoughtless, and reckless of the
future. It was by such acts, long practised among
the humblest of the nation, that Jessy had won the
love and veneration of the people. But it was not
for blessings, or humble applause, or to have the tale
told, that Jessy went to the squalid abode,
administered
food and medicine, wiped the sweat of pain and
agony from the face of the sick, and imparted
counsel
,
consolation and hope to the dying. Her record
was on high. She felt, that she owed these painful
duties to God and to her kind; and when she could
reflect, that she had faithfully performed them through
the day, a calm serenity came over her evening
thoughts, a perennial and healthful satisfaction, of a
far higher order than even the spirit-stirring
recollections
of the active young hunters, as they narrated
the adventures and pleasures of the chase of the past
day.
The hopes of Elder Wood, too, were elevated with
indefinite anticipations of success. The popularity
of Areskoui was manifestly advancing; and the star
of Nelesho was waxing pale in proportion. There
was every reason to believe, when Ellswatta
should be gathered to his fathers, that Areskoui would
be more deeply fixed in the loyalty and affection of
the united nation, than even his father had been.
This young chief, Elder Wood had sanguine hopes,
would profess the Christian religion. He had written
this on the tablet of his heart; and his ardent
imagination
had gone on, rioting in the glorious vision, that
the nation would follow their chief; and that he would
be finally written Apostle of the converted nation of
the Shoshonee. His creative mind ran on to the
civilization consequent upon the Christianization of
the people. He saw fields and fences and houses and
roads and canals and orchards, and the church with
its spire. He heard the sound of the church-going
bell. He saw himself invested with the united
consideration
and sanctity of prophet, priest and king.
He went further. His serious and imaginative spirit
transcended the bounds of time and space, and the
limits of the grave. He saw the books opened, his
red converts ascending the holy hill of Zion, and
recognizing
him in the everlasting mansions, as the
instrument
of their being brought home to God. Kings,
and those, whose names are written on marble, have
no illusions so benevolent and glorious, as this picture
of the present and final results of a Christian
community
,
thus portrayed in the imagination of Elder
Wood.
Alas! for the frailty of human nature. It was
unquestionably
love, which led the young chief to think
seriously and to converse earnestly upon the subject
with Elder Wood. He had said to Jessy, to
Frederic
and himself, that he would be contented with the
sisterly regard, the disinterested and common
kindness
of his sister, such as she could share in equal
proportions between him and Frederic. But, in
saying
this, he had deceived himself. He was of a
nature
,
in which all affections and passions take strong
and deep root. This sentiment had been
incorporated
with the first germs of natural and moral
development
.
Every year and every scene, and every
visit and every conversation, had strengthened the
sentiment. It had rooted deeply, and thrown out
wide branches, and unconsciously pervaded all his
thoughts and associations; and mingled with every
plan and colored every future prospect, until it had
become a tyrannic and master feeling, not to be
reasoned
with, or controlled; but, like disease and
constitutional
madness and the influence and acting of
the brute powers of nature, endured, as he might
sustain
them.
Though Elder Wood had the warmest regard for
Frederic, there were more points of union between
him and the young chief, than between him and his
own countryman. Areskoui was, in the way, to which
allusion has just been made, identified with all his
bright visions of the future, on earth and in heaven.
Elder Wood knew not himself, that he wished Jessy
might become the wife of the chief. But he was
unconsciously
swayed to that wish. His representations
of Areskoui to her were always, more or less, colored
by that wish. Unhappily, this purpose, latent to him,
was clear to her; and deeming it matter of design, it
tended in a degree to counteract its own purpose, and
induced her to regard his animated statements and
his warm eulogy rather with distrust, than confidence.
Long and confidential were the communications,
which the young chief held with him, touching the
evidences, the doctrines and the immortal hopes of
the Christian religion. The system, as a whole, met
his respect and his cordial acceptation; though he very
frankly demurred to the narrow and exclusive views
of the minister. But however the conversation
began
,
whatever turn it took, it always ended upon two
points, whether there were unions in heaven, like
those on earth; and whether he thought, there was
any chance, that Jessy would ever entertain for him
sentiments beyond simple regard? `Father,' he would
say, `you affirm, that all is disappointment and sorrow
here below. My heart is sad, and fondly seeks to rest
in some hope, that its earnest longings may somewhere
be satisfied. Ah! if it may be in heaven! I will strive
to go to heaven; for Wakona will never love me on
earth; and you affirm, that in that country, all the
adventitious
advantages of complexion, speech, form,
deportment
,
and cultivation, will be done away, and
every
thing will be settled on the test of superior worth
and goodness. There I will show Wakona, what she
has thrown from her on such considerations. There
she shall read the mind and the heart of the young
chief.' Then, he would earnestly and anxiously ask,
`father, if all these circumstances, by which we know
each other on earth, shall be changed, how shall
minds know each other in heaven?'
All these conflicts and solicitudes in the heart of
Areskoui became matter of unconscious relation to
Jessy in the conversations of Elder Wood. To
present his catechumen in the attitude of hopeless
self-conflict, despairing love, and seeking only the
good of the object of his affections even in rejection;
such, in all simplicity of heart, was the plan of the
minister; and many an unconscious and unwitnessed
tear, in her silent meditations, had she bestowed
upon
the sorrows of Areskoui, as thus painted to her
imagination by the man of God.
On the other hand, she had her own peculiar
bitterness
of heart, from another source. In Frederic
she saw dignity, nobleness and strength of character,
as in the other. He had not grown up with her from
infancy, raising between them associations, that had
been formed gradually and imperceptibly. He was
descended from her own race, educated, capable of
eliciting her thoughts, and divining her undeclared
wishes. The chief was always stern, always solemn,
always in earnest. This one could glide in a
moment
,
by a transition natural and decorous, from gay
to grave. He was playful and sprightly, when the
occasion called. He had wit or wisdom, eloquence
or profoundness, according to the exigency of
conversation
.
All these views had developed in a short
time; and had been seen in the light of a
discriminating
judgment. The one in that world, where,
although
she knew it only by books, or the accounts of
her friends, the standard of her estimation was fixed,
would be called savage! Savage! that word of
horrid
import, a word, to which, from all her mother's
prejudices, she had learned to attach the most
repulsive
meaninga savage, and then her imagination
ran out to paint all the subsequent consequences of
an union with a savage. The other was high minded,
but docile and gentle, showing her in every word,
movement and look, the appropriate attractions and
influences of society. But the one had loved her
almost
from a child; had performed for her parents and
herself a thousand kindnesses, had recently displayed
the most noble intrepidity, and had rescued her from
a condition, worse than death. Would not the other
have preceded in the same daring, and the same
purpose
?
But, what if he would? He was silent,
reserved
,
seemingly proud, had never made professions
except by looks; and had since more than retracted
them, by a manner, which he could not have
sustained
,
had he continued to love. There were times,
when such views piqued her pride. `Is it true, then,'
she said, `that all, that has been said about my
personal
attractions, is mere flattery and illusion?' From this
view, native self respect roused her indignantly to
reflect, `I am sufficient, with the love of my parents,
for myself. The whole view is an illusion. It is good
to be alone. All these struggles are worthy only of
wayward children, who cry, because every inclination
cannot be gratified. I will think of neither, and will
calculate to remain for the future, as I have been
for the past.'
In such alternations of thought and feeling in the
inmates at William Weldon's habitation, the winter
passed away. It had been of uncommon length and
severity. The keen north wind, charged with sleet
and snow, had swept down the valley, almost without
intermission. Avalanches had, more than once,
slidden
from the mountains, and filled different points of
the vale. The bursting of the ice in the blue lake,
and in the still places of the Sewasserna, had sounded
like frequent thunder-bolts. The trees all bent their
branches in curves towards the ground with their
weight of snow. The grouse, bustards and wild
turkeys
had crowded round the abodes of the nation for
food, more strongly drawn by hunger, than repelled
by their dread of man. Often, too, had Jessy marked
the sustaining wisdom of a wonder-working
providence
,
as she saw, in the most cutting rigor of the
snows and frosts, little sparrows of the brightest
plumage
,
and with bodies scarcely larger than an acorn,
hopping on the shrubs in front of her dwelling,
chirping
and active and alert, under a temperature which
seemed by its bitterness to threaten all animal
existence
.
Though not inclined to superstition, she had
often felt the thrill of painful and dark thoughts come
over her bosom, as she retired to her apartment, and
heard the fierce storm pour, and the snows drive, and
the wind whistle, and ran over in thought the
incessant
predictions of the medicine men, that the
unusually
severe winter was a precursor of a bloody and
fatal summer.
END OF VOLUME FIRST.